
 
 
 
 Produced by An Anonymous Volunteer
 
 
 
 
 
 THE CLOUDS
 
 By Aristophanes
 
 
 Trans. William James Hickie
 
 
 
      * All Greek from the original edition has been
      transliterated into Roman characters.
 
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
      Strepsiades
      Phidippides
      Servant of Strepsiades
      Disciples of Socrates
      Socrates
      Chorus of Clouds
      Just Cause
      Unjust Cause
      Pasias
      Amynias
      Witness
      Chaerephon
 
 
      Scene: The interior of a sleeping-apartment:
      Strepsiades, Phidippides, and two servants are in their
      beds; a small house is seen at a distance. Time:
      midnight.
 
      Strepsiades (sitting up in his bed). Ah me! Ah me! O
      King Jupiter, of what a terrible length the nights are!
      Will it never be day? And yet long since I heard the
      cock. My domestics are snoring; but they would not have
      done so heretofore! May you perish then, O war! For many
      reasons; because I may not even punish my domestics.
      Neither does this excellent youth awake through the
      night; but takes his ease, wrapped up in five blankets.
      Well, if it is the fashion, let us snore wrapped up.
 
 
      [Lies down, and then almost immediately starts up
      again.]
 
      But I am not able, miserable man, to sleep, being
      tormented by my expenses, and my stud of horses, and my
      debts, through this son of mine. He with his long hair,
      is riding horses and driving curricles, and dreaming of
      horses; while I am driven to distraction, as I see the
      moon bringing on the twentieths;  for the interest is
      running on. Boy! Light a lamp, and bring forth my
      tablets, that I may take them and read to how many I am
      indebted, and calculate the interest.
 
      [Enter boy with a light and tablets.]
 
      Come, let me see; what do I owe? Twelve minae  to
      Pasias. Why twelve minae to Pasias? Why did I borrow
      them? When I bought the blood-horse. Ah me, unhappy!
      Would that it had had its eye knocked out with a stone
      first!
 
      Phidippides (talking in his sleep). You are acting
      unfairly, Philo! Drive on your own course.
 
      Strep. This is the bane that has destroyed me; for even
      in his sleep he dreams about horsemanship.
 
      Phid. How many courses will the war-chariots run?
 
      Strep. Many courses do you drive me, your father. But
      what debt came upon me after Pasias? Three minae to
      Amynias for a little chariot and pair of wheels.
 
      Phid. Lead the horse home, after having given him a good
      rolling.
 
      Strep. O foolish youth, you have rolled me out of my
      possessions; since I have been cast in suits, and others
      say that they will have surety given them for the
      interest.
 
      Phid. (awakening) Pray, father, why are you peevish, and
      toss about the whole night?
 
      Strep. A bailiff out of the bedclothes is biting
      me.
 
      Phid. Suffer me, good sir, to sleep a little.
 
      Strep. Then, do you sleep on; but know that all these
      debts will turn on your head.
 
      [Phidippides falls asleep again.]
 
      Alas! Would that the match-maker had perished miserably,
      who induced me to marry your mother. For a country life
      used to be most agreeable to me, dirty, untrimmed,
      reclining at random, abounding in bees, and sheep, and
      oil-cake. Then I, a rustic, married a niece of Megacles,
      the son of Megacles, from the city, haughty, luxurious,
      and Coesyrafied. When I married her, I lay with her
      redolent of new wine, of the cheese-crate, and abundance
      of wool; but she, on the contrary, of ointment, saffron,
      wanton-kisses, extravagance, gluttony, and of Colias and
      Genetyllis.  I will not indeed say that she was idle;
      but she wove. And I used to show her this cloak by way
      of a pretext and say "Wife, you weave at a great
      rate."
 
      Servant re-enters.
 
      Servant. We have no oil in the lamp.
 
      Strep. Ah me! Why did you light the thirsty lamp? Come
      hither that you may weep!
 
      Ser. For what, pray, shall I weep?
 
      Strep. Because you put in one of the thick wicks.
 
      [Servant runs out]
 
      After this, when this son was born to us, to me,
      forsooth, and to my excellent wife, we squabbled then
      about the name: for she was for adding hippos  to the
      name, Xanthippus, or Charippus, or Callipides; but I was
      for giving him the name of his grandfather, Phidonides.
      For a time therefore we disputed; and then at length we
      agreed, and called him Phidippides. She used to take
      this son and fondle him, saying, "When you, being grown
      up, shall drive your chariot to the city, like Megacles,
      with a xystis." But I used to say, "Nay, rather, when
      dressed in a leathern jerkin, you shall drive goats from
      Phelleus, like your father." He paid no attention to my
      words, but poured a horse-fever over my property. Now,
      therefore, by meditating the whole night, I have
      discovered one path for my course extraordinarily
      excellent; to which if I persuade this youth I shall be
      saved. But first I wish to awake him. How then can I
      awake him in the most agreeable manner? How?
      Phidippides, my little Phidippides?
 
      Phid. What, father?
 
      Strep. Kiss me, and give me your right hand!
 
      Phid. There. What's the matter?
 
      Strep. Tell me, do you love me?
 
      Phid. Yes, by this Equestrian Neptune.
 
      Strep. Nay, do not by any means mention this Equestrian
      to me, for this god is the author of my misfortunes.
      But, if you really love me from your heart, my son, obey
      me.
 
      Phid. In what then, pray, shall I obey you?
 
      Strep. Reform your habits as quickly as possible, and go
      and learn what I advise.
 
      Phid. Tell me now, what do you prescribe?
 
      Strep. And will you obey me at all?
 
      Phid. By Bacchus,  I will obey you.
 
      Strep. Look this way then! Do you see this little door
      and little house?
 
      Phid. I see it. What then, pray, is this, father?
 
      Strep. This is a thinking-shop of wise spirits. There
      dwell men who in speaking of the heavens persuade people
      that it is an oven, and that it encompasses us, and that
      we are the embers. These men teach, if one give them
      money, to conquer in speaking, right or wrong.
 
      Phid. Who are they?
 
      Strep. I do not know the name accurately. They are
      minute philosophers, noble and excellent.
 
      Phid. Bah! They are rogues; I know them. You mean the
      quacks, the pale-faced wretches, the bare-footed
      fellows, of whose numbers are the miserable Socrates and
      Chaerephon.
 
      Strep. Hold! Hold! Be silent! Do not say anything
      foolish. But, if you have any concern for your father's
      patrimony, become one of them, having given up your
      horsemanship.
 
      Phid. I would not, by Bacchus, even if you were to give
      me the pheasants which Leogoras  rears!
 
      Strep. Go, I entreat you, dearest of men, go and be
      taught.
 
      Phid. Why, what shall I learn?
 
      Strep. They say that among them are both the two
      causes--the better cause, whichever that is, and the
      worse: they say that the one of these two causes, the
      worse, prevails, though it speaks on the unjust side.
      If, therefore you learn for me this unjust cause, I
      would not pay any one, not even an obolus of these
      debts, which I owe at present on your account.
 
      Phid. I can not comply; for I should not dare to look
      upon the knights, having lost all my colour.
 
      Strep. Then, by Ceres,  you shall not eat any of my
      good! Neither you, nor your blood-horse; but I will
      drive you out of my house to the crows.
 
      Phid. My uncle Megacles will not permit me to be without
      a horse. But I'll go in, and pay no heed to you.
 
      [Exit Phidippides.]
 
      Strep. Though fallen, still I will not lie prostrate:
      but having prayed to the gods, I will go myself to the
      thinking-shop and get taught. How, then, being an old
      man, shall I learn the subtleties of refined
      disquisitions? I must go. Why thus do I loiter and not
      knock at the door?
 
      [Knocks at the door.]
 
      Boy! Little boy!
 
      Disciple (from within). Go to the devil! Who it is that
      knocked at the door?
 
      Strep. Strepsiades, the son of Phidon, of Cicynna.
 
      Dis. You are a stupid fellow, by Jove! who have kicked
      against the door so very carelessly, and have caused the
      miscarriage of an idea which I had conceived.
 
      Strep. Pardon me; for I dwell afar in the country. But
      tell me the thing which has been made to miscarry.
 
      Dis. It is not lawful to mention it, except to
      disciples.
 
      Strep. Tell it, then, to me without fear; for I here am
      come as a disciple to the thinking-shop.
 
      Dis. I will tell you; but you must regard these as
      mysteries. Socrates lately asked Chaerephon  about a
      flea, how many of its own feet it jumped; for after
      having bit the eyebrow of Chaerephon, it leaped away
      onto the head of Socrates.
 
      Strep. How then did he measure this?
 
      Dis. Most cleverly. He melted some wax; and then took
      the flea and dipped its feet in the wax; and then a pair
      of Persian slippers stuck to it when cooled. Having
      gently loosened these, he measured back the distance.
 
      Strep. O King Jupiter! What subtlety of thought!
 
      Dis. What then would you say if you heard another
      contrivance of Socrates?
 
      Strep. Of what kind? Tell me, I beseech you!
 
      Dis. Chaerephon the Sphettian asked him whether he
      thought gnats buzzed through the mouth or the breech.
 
      Strep. What, then, did he say about the gnat?
 
      Dis. He said the intestine of the gnat was narrow and
      that the wind went forcibly through it, being slender,
      straight to the breech; and then that the rump, being
      hollow where it is adjacent to the narrow part,
      resounded through the violence of the wind.
 
      Strep. The rump of the gnats then is a trumpet! Oh,
      thrice happy he for his sharp-sightedness! Surely a
      defendant might easily get acquitted who understands the
      intestine of the gnat.
 
      Dis. But he was lately deprived of a great idea by a
      lizard.
 
      Strep. In what way? Tell me.
 
      Dis. As he was investigating the courses of the moon and
      her revolutions, then as he was gaping upward a lizard
      in the darkness dropped upon him from the roof.
 
      Strep. I am amused at a lizard's having dropped on
      Socrates.
 
      Dis. Yesterday evening there was no supper for us.
 
      Strep. Well. What then did he contrive for provisions?
 
      Dis. He sprinkled fine ashes on the table, and bent a
      little spit, and then took it as a pair of compasses and
      filched a cloak from the Palaestra.
 
      Strep. Why then do we admire Thales?  Open open quickly
      the thinking-shop, and show to me Socrates as quickly as
      possible. For I desire to be a disciple. Come, open the
      door.
 
      [The door of the thinking-shop opens and the pupils of
      Socrates are seen all with their heads fixed on the
      ground, while Socrates himself is seen suspended in the
      air in a basket.]
 
      O Hercules, from what country are these wild beasts?
 
      Dis. What do you wonder at? To what do they seem to you
      to be like?
 
      Strep. To the Spartans who were taken at Pylos.  But why
      in the world do these look upon the ground?
 
      Dis. They are in search of the things below the earth.
 
      Strep. Then they are searching for roots. Do not, then,
      trouble yourselves about this; for I know where there
      are large and fine ones. Why, what are these doing, who
      are bent down so much?
 
      Dis. These are groping about in darkness under Tartarus.
 
      Strep. Why then does their rump look toward heaven?
 
      Dis. It is getting taught astronomy alone by itself.
 
      [Turning to the pupils.]
 
      But go in, lest he meet with us.
 
      Strep. Not yet, not yet; but let them remain, that I may
      communicate to them a little matter of my own.
 
      Dis. It is not permitted to them to remain without in
      the open air for a very long time.
 
      [The pupils retire.]
 
      Strep. (discovering a variety of mathematical
      instruments) Why, what is this, in the name of heaven?
      Tell me.
 
      Dis. This is Astronomy.
 
      Strep. But what is this?
 
      Dis. Geometry.
 
      Strep. What then is the use of this?
 
      Dis. To measure out the land.
 
      Strep. What belongs to an allotment?
 
      Dis. No, but the whole earth.
 
      Strep. You tell me a clever notion; for the contrivance
      is democratic and useful.
 
      Dis. (pointing to a map) See, here's a map of the whole
      earth. Do you see? This is Athens.
 
      Strep. What say you? I don't believe you; for I do not
      see the Dicasts  sitting.
 
      Dis. Be assured that this is truly the Attic territory.
 
      Strep. Why, where are my fellow-tribesmen of Cicynna?
 
      Dis. Here they are. And Euboea here, as you see, is
      stretched out a long way by the side of it to a great
      distance.
 
      Strep. I know that; for it was stretched by us and
      Pericles.  But where is Lacedaemon?
 
      Dis. Where is it? Here it is.
 
      Strep. How near it is to us! Pay great attention to
      this, to remove it very far from us.
 
      Dis. By Jupiter, it is not possible.
 
      Strep. Then you will weep for it.
 
      [Looking up and discovering Socrates.]
 
      Come, who is this man who is in the basket?
 
      Dis. Himself.
 
      Strep. Who's "Himself"?
 
      Dis. Socrates.
 
      Strep. O Socrates! Come, you sir, call upon him loudly
      for me.
 
      Dis. Nay, rather, call him yourself; for I have no
      leisure.
 
      [Exit Disciple.]
 
      Strep. Socrates! My little Socrates!
 
      Socrates. Why callest thou me, thou creature of a day?
 
      Strep. First tell me, I beseech you, what are you doing.
 
      Soc. I am walking in the air, and speculating about the
      sun.
 
      Strep. And so you look down upon the gods from your
      basket, and not from the earth?
 
      Soc. For I should not have rightly discovered things
      celestial if I had not suspended the intellect, and
      mixed the thought in a subtle form with its kindred air.
      But if, being on the ground, I speculated from below on
      things above, I should never have discovered them. For
      the earth forcibly attracts to itself the meditative
      moisture. Water-cresses also suffer the very same thing.
 
      Strep. What do you say? Does meditation attract the
      moisture to the water-cresses? Come then, my little
      Socrates, descend to me, that you may teach me those
      things, for the sake of which I have come.
 
      [Socrates lowers himself and gets out of the basket.]
 
      Soc. And for what did you come?
 
      Strep. Wishing to learn to speak; for by reason of
      usury, and most ill-natured creditors, I am pillaged and
      plundered, and have my goods seized for debt.
 
      Soc. How did you get in debt without observing it?
 
      Strep. A horse-disease consumed me--terrible at eating.
      But teach me the other one of your two causes, that
      which pays nothing; and I will swear by the gods, I will
      pay down to you whatever reward you exact of me.
 
      Soc. By what gods will you swear? For, in the first
      place, gods are not a current coin with us.
 
      Strep. By what do you swear? By iron money, as in
      Byzantium?
 
      Soc. Do you wish to know clearly celestial matters, what
      they rightly are?
 
      Strep. Yes, by Jupiter, if it be possible!
 
      Soc. And to hold converse with the Clouds, our
      divinities?
 
      Strep. By all means.
 
      Soc. (with great solemnity). Seat yourself, then, upon
      the sacred couch.
 
      Strep. Well, I am seated!
 
      Soc. Take, then, this chaplet.
 
      Strep. For what purpose a chaplet? Ah me! Socrates, see
      that you do not sacrifice me like Athamas!
 
      Strep. No; we do all these to those who get initiated.
 
      Strep. Then what shall I gain, pray?
 
      Soc. You shall become in oratory a tricky knave, a
      thorough rattle, a subtle speaker. But keep quiet.
 
      Strep. By Jupiter! You will not deceive me; for if I am
      besprinkled, I shall become fine flour.
 
      Soc. It becomes the old man to speak words of good omen,
      and to hearken to my prayer. O sovereign King,
      immeasurable Air, who keepest the earth suspended, and
      through bright Aether, and ye august goddesses, the
      Clouds, sending thunder and lightning, arise, appear in
      the air, O mistresses, to your deep thinker!
 
      Strep. Not yet, not yet, till I wrap this around me lest
      I be wet through. To think of my having come from home
      without even a cap, unlucky man!
 
      Soc. Come then, ye highly honoured Clouds, for a display
      to this man. Whether ye are sitting upon the sacred
      snow-covered summits of Olympus, or in the gardens of
      Father Ocean form a sacred dance with the Nymphs, or
      draw in golden pitchers the streams of the waters of the
      Nile, or inhabit the Maeotic lake, or the snowy rock of
      Mimas, hearken to our prayer, and receive the sacrifice,
      and be propitious to the sacred rites.
 
      [The following song is heard at a distance, accompanied
      by loud claps of thunder.]
 
      Chorus. Eternal Clouds! Let us arise to view with our
      dewy, clear-bright nature, from loud-sounding Father
      Ocean to the wood-crowned summits of the lofty
      mountains, in order that we may behold clearly the
      far-seen watch-towers, and the fruits, and the
      fostering, sacred earth, and the rushing sounds of the
      divine rivers, and the roaring, loud-sounding sea; for
      the unwearied eye of Aether sparkles with glittering
      rays. Come, let us shake off the watery cloud from our
      immortal forms and survey the earth with far-seeing eye.
 
      Soc. O ye greatly venerable Clouds, ye have clearly
      heard me when I called.
 
      [Turning to Strepsiades.]
 
      Did you hear the voice, and the thunder which bellowed
      at the same time, feared as a god?
 
      Strep. I too worship you, O ye highly honoured, and am
      inclined to reply to the thundering, so much do I
      tremble at them and am alarmed. And whether it be
      lawful, or be not lawful, I have a desire just now to
      ease myself.
 
      Soc. Don't scoff, nor do what these poor-devil-poets do,
      but use words of good omen, for a great swarm of
      goddesses is in motion with their songs.
 
      Cho. Ye rain-bringing virgins, let us come to the
      fruitful land of Pallas,  to view the much-loved country
      of Cecrops,  abounding in brave men; where is reverence
      for sacred rites not to be divulged;  where the house
      that receives the initiated is thrown open in holy
      mystic rites; and gifts to the celestial gods; and
      high-roofed temples, and statues; and most sacred
      processions in honour of the blessed gods; and
      well-crowned sacrifices to the gods, and feasts, at all
      seasons; and with the approach of spring the Bacchic
      festivity, and the rousings of melodious choruses, and
      the loud-sounding music of flutes.
 
      Strep. Tell me, O Socrates, I beseech you, by Jupiter,
      who are these that have uttered this grand song? Are
      they some heroines?
 
      Soc. By no means; but heavenly Clouds, great divinities
      to idle men; who supply us with thought and argument,
      and intelligence and humbug, and circumlocution, and
      ability to hoax, and comprehension.
 
      Strep. On this account therefore my soul, having heard
      their voice, flutters, and already seeks to discourse
      subtilely, and to quibble about smoke, and having
      pricked a maxim with a little notion, to refute the
      opposite argument. So that now I eagerly desire, if by
      any means it be possible, to see them palpably.
 
      Soc. Look, then, hither, toward Mount Parnes;  for now I
      behold them descending gently.
 
      Strep. Pray where? Show me.
 
      Soc. See! There they come in great numbers through the
      hollows and thickets; there, obliquely.
 
      Strep. What's the matter? For I can't see them.
 
      Soc. By the entrance.
 
      [Enter Chorus]
 
      Strep. Now at length with difficulty I just see them.
 
      Soc. Now at length you assuredly see them, unless you
      have your eyes running pumpkins.
 
      Strep. Yes, by Jupiter! O highly honoured Clouds, for
      now they cover all things.
 
      Soc. Did you not, however, know, nor yet consider, these
      to be goddesses?
 
      Strep. No, by Jupiter! But I thought them to be mist,
      and dew, and smoke.
 
      Soc. For you do not know, by Jupiter! that these feed
      very many sophists, Thurian soothsayers, practisers of
      medicine, lazy-long-haired-onyx-ring-wearers,
      song-twisters for the cyclic dances, and meteorological
      quacks. They feed idle people who do nothing, because
      such men celebrate them in verse.
 
      Strep. For this reason, then, they introduced into their
      verses "the dreadful impetuosity of the moist,
      whirling-bright clouds"; and the "curls of
      hundred-headed Typho"; and the "hard-blowing tempests";
      and then "aerial, moist"; "crooked-clawed birds,
      floating in air"; and "the showers of rain from dewy
      Clouds". And then, in return for these, they swallow
      "slices of great, fine mullets, and bird's-flesh of
      thrushes."
 
      Soc. Is it not just, however, that they should have
      their reward, on account of these?
 
      Strep. Tell me, pray, if they are really clouds, what
      ails them, that they resemble mortal women? For they are
      not such.
 
      Soc. Pray, of what nature are they?
 
      Strep. I do not clearly know: at  any rate they resemble
      spread-out fleeces, and not women, by Jupiter! Not a
      bit; for these have noses.
 
      Soc. Answer, then, whatever I ask you.
 
      Strep. Then say quickly what you wish.
 
      Soc. Have you ever, when you; looked up, seen a cloud
      like to a centaur, or a panther, or a wolf, or a bull?
 
      Strep. By Jupiter, have I! But what of that?
 
      Soc. They become all things, whatever they please. And
      then if they see a person with long hair, a wild one of
      these hairy fellows, like the son of Xenophantes, in
      derision of his folly, they liken themselves to
      centaurs.
 
      Strep. Why, what, if they should see Simon,  a plunderer
      of the public property, what do they do?
 
      Soc. They suddenly become wolves, showing up his
      disposition.
 
      Strep. For this reason, then, for this reason, when they
      yesterday saw Cleonymus the recreant, on this account
      they became stags, because they saw this most cowardly
      fellow.
 
      Soc. And now too, because they saw Clisthenes, you
      observe, on this account they became women.
 
      Strep. Hail therefore, O mistresses! And now, if ever ye
      did to any other, to me also utter a voice reaching to
      heaven, O all-powerful queens.
 
      Cho. Hail, O ancient veteran, hunter after learned
      speeches! And thou, O priest of most subtle trifles!
      Tell us what you require? For we would not hearken to
      any other of the recent meteorological sophists, except
      to Prodicus;  to him, on account of his wisdom and
      intelligence; and to you, because you walk proudly in
      the streets, and cast your eyes askance, and endure many
      hardships with bare feet, and in reliance upon us
      lookest supercilious.
 
      Strep. O Earth, what a voice! How holy and dignified and
      wondrous!
 
      Soc. For, in fact, these alone are goddesses; and all
      the rest is nonsense.
 
      Strep. But come, by the Earth, is not Jupiter, the
      Olympian, a god?
 
      Soc. What Jupiter? Do not trifle. There is no Jupiter.
 
      Strep. What do you say? Who rains then? For first of all
      explain this to me.
 
      Soc. These to be sure. I will teach you it by powerful
      evidence. Come, where have you ever seen him raining at
      any time without Clouds? And yet he ought to rain in
      fine weather, and these be absent.
 
      Strep. By Apollo, of a truth you have rightly confirmed
      this by your present argument. And yet, before this, I
      really thought that Jupiter caused the rain. But tell me
      who is it that thunders. This makes me tremble.
 
      Soc. These, as they roll, thunder.
 
      Strep. In what way? you all-daring man!
 
      Soc. When they are full of much water, and are compelled
      to be borne along, being necessarily precipitated when
      full of rain, then they fall heavily upon each other and
      burst and clap.
 
      Strep. Who is it that compels them to borne along? Is it
      not Jupiter?
 
      Soc. By no means, but aethereal Vortex.
 
      Strep. Vortex? It had escaped my notice that Jupiter did
      not exist, and that Vortex now reigned in his stead. But
      you have taught me nothing as yet concerning the clap
      and the thunder.
 
      Soc. Have you not heard me, that I said that the Clouds,
      when full of moisture, dash against each other and clap
      by reason of their density?
 
      Strep. Come, how am I to believe this?
 
      Soc. I'll teach you from your own case. Were you ever,
      after being stuffed with broth at the Panathenaic
      festival,  then disturbed in your belly, and did a
      tumult suddenly rumble through it?
 
      Strep. Yes, by Apollo! And immediately the little broth
      plays the mischief with me, and is disturbed and rumbles
      like thunder, and grumbles dreadfully: at first gently
      pappax, pappax; and then it adds papa-pappax; and
      finally, it thunders downright papapappax, as they do.
 
      Soc. Consider, therefore, how you have trumpeted from a
      little belly so small; and how is it not probable that
      this air, being boundless, should thunder so loudly?
 
      Strep. For this reason, therefore, the two names also
      Trump and Thunder, are similar to each other. But teach
      me this, whence comes the thunderbolt blazing with fire,
      and burns us to ashes when it smites us, and singes
      those who survive. For indeed Jupiter evidently hurls
      this at the perjured.
 
      Soc. Why, how then, you foolish person, and savouring of
      the dark ages and antediluvian, if his manner is to
      smite the perjured, does he not blast Simon, and
      Cleonymus, and Theorus? And yet they are very perjured.
      But he smites his own temple, and Sunium the promontory
      of Athens, and the tall oaks. Wherefore, for indeed an
      oak does not commit perjury.
 
      Strep. I do not know; but you seem to speak well. For
      what, pray, is the thunderbolt?
 
      Soc. When a dry wind, having been raised aloft, is
      inclosed in these Clouds, it inflates them within, like
      a bladder; and then, of necessity, having burst them, it
      rushes out with vehemence by reason of its density,
      setting fire to itself through its rushing and
      impetuosity.
 
      Strep. By Jupiter, of a truth I once experienced this
      exactly at the Diasian  festival! I was roasting a
      haggis for my kinsfolk, and through neglect I did not
      cut it open; but it became inflated and then suddenly
      bursting, befouled my eyes and burned my face.
 
      Cho. O mortal, who hast desired great wisdom from us!
      How happy will you become among the Athenians and among
      the Greeks, if you be possessed of a good memory, and be
      a deep thinker, and endurance of labour be implanted in
      your soul, and you be not wearied either by standing or
      walking, nor be exceedingly vexed at shivering with
      cold, nor long to break your fast, and you refrain from
      wine, and gymnastics, and the other follies, and
      consider this the highest excellence, as is proper a
      clever man should, to conquer by action and counsel, and
      by battling with your tongue.
 
      Strep. As far as regards a sturdy spirit, and care that
      makes one's bed uneasy, and a frugal spirit and
      hard-living and savory-eating belly, be of good courage
      and don't trouble yourself; I would offer myself to
      hammer on, for that matter.
 
      Soc. Will you not, pray, now believe in no god, except
      what we believe in--this Chaos, and the Clouds, and the
      Tongue--these three?
 
      Strep. Absolutely I would not even converse with the
      others, not even if I met them; nor would I sacrifice to
      them, nor make libations,  nor offer frankincense.
 
      Cho. Tell us then boldly, what we must do for you? For
      you shall not fail in getting it, if you honour and
      admire us, and seek to become clever.
 
      Strep. O mistresses, I request of you then this very
      small favour, that I be the best of the Greeks in
      speaking by a hundred stadia.
 
      Cho. Well, you shall have this from us, so that
      hence-forward from this time no one shall get more
      opinions passed in the public assemblies than you.
 
      Strep. Grant me not to deliver important opinions; for I
      do not desire these, but only to pervert the right for
      my own advantage, and to evade my creditors.
 
      Cho. Then you shall obtain what you desire; for you do
      not covet great things. But commit yourself without fear
      to our ministers.
 
      Strep. I will do so in reliance upon you, for necessity
      oppresses me, on account of the blood-horses, and the
      marriage that ruined me. Now, therefore, let them use me
      as they please. I give up this body to them to be
      beaten, to be hungered, to be troubled with thirst, to
      be squalid, to shiver with cold, to flay into a leathern
      bottle, if I shall escape clear from my debts, and
      appear to men to be bold, glib of tongue, audacious,
      impudent, shameless, a fabricator of falsehoods,
      inventive of words, a practiced knave in lawsuits, a
      law-tablet, a thorough rattle, a fox, a sharper, a
      slippery knave, a dissembler, a slippery fellow, an
      impostor, a gallows-bird, a blackguard, a twister, a
      troublesome fellow, a licker-up of hashes. If they call
      me this, when they meet me, let them do to me absolutely
      what they please. And if they like, by Ceres, let them
      serve up a sausage out of me to the deep thinkers.
 
      Cho. This man has a spirit not void of courage, but
      prompt. Know, that if you learn these matters from me,
      you will possess among mortals a glory as high as
      heaven.
 
      Strep. What shall I experience?
 
      Cho. You shall pass with me the most enviable of mortal
      lives the whole time.
 
      Strep. Shall I then ever see this?
 
      Cho. Yea, so that many be always seated at your gates,
      wishing to communicate with you and come to a conference
      with you, to consult with you as to actions and
      affidavits of many talents, as is worthy of your
      abilities.
 
      [To Socrates.]
 
      But attempt to teach the old man by degrees whatever you
      purpose, and scrutinize his intellect, and make trial of
      his mind.
 
      Soc. Come now, tell me your own turn of mind; in order
      that, when I know of what sort it is, I may now, after
      this, apply to you new engines.
 
      Strep. What? By the gods, do you purpose to besiege me?
 
      Soc. No; I wish to briefly learn from you if you are
      possessed of a good memory.
 
      Strep. In two ways, by Jove! If anything be owing to me,
      I have a very good memory; but if I owe unhappy man, I
      am very forgetful.
 
      Soc. Is the power of speaking, pray, implanted in your
      nature?
 
      Strep. Speaking is not in me, but cheating is.
 
      Soc. How, then, will you be able to learn?
 
      Strep. Excellently, of course.
 
      Soc. Come, then, take care that, whenever I propound any
      clever dogma about abstruse matters, you catch it up
      immediately.
 
      Strep. What then? Am I to feed upon wisdom like a dog?
 
      Soc. This man is ignorant and brutish--I fear, old man,
      lest you will need blows. Come, let me see; what do you
      do if any one beat you?
 
      Strep. I take the beating; and then, when I have waited
      a little while, I call witnesses to prove it; then
      again, after a short interval, I go to law.
 
      Soc. Come, then, lay down your cloak.
 
      Strep. Have I done any wrong?
 
      Soc. No; but it is the rule to enter naked.
 
      Strep. But I do not enter to search for stolen goods.
 
      Soc. Lay it down. Why do you talk nonsense?
 
      Strep. Now tell me this, pray. If I be diligent and
      learn zealously, to which of your disciples shall I
      become like?
 
      Soc. You will no way differ from Chaerephon in
      intellect.
 
      Strep. Ah me, unhappy! I shall become half-dead.
 
      Soc. Don't chatter; but quickly follow me hither with
      smartness.
 
      Strep. Then give me first into my hands a honeyed cake;
      for I am afraid of descending within, as if into the
      cave of Trophonius.
 
      Soc. Proceed; why do you keep poking about the door?
 
      [Exeunt Socrates and Strepsiades]
 
      Cho. Well, go in peace, for the sake of this your
      valour. May prosperity attend the man, because, being
      advanced into the vale of years, he imbues his intellect
      with modern subjects, and cultivates wisdom!
 
      [Turning to the audience.]
 
      Spectators, I will freely declare to you the truth, by
      Bacchus, who nurtured me! So may I conquer, and be
      accounted skillful, as that, deeming you to be clever
      spectators, and this to be the cleverest of my comedies,
      I thought proper to let you first taste that comedy,
      which gave me the greatest labour. And then I retired
      from the contest defeated by vulgar fellows, though I
      did not deserve it. These things, therefore, I object to
      you, a learned audience, for whose sake I was expending
      this labour. But not even thus will I ever willingly
      desert the discerning portion of you. For since what
      time my Modest Man and my Rake  were very highly praised
      here by an audience, with whom it is a pleasure even to
      hold converse, and I (for I was still a virgin, and it
      was not lawful for me as yet to have children) exposed
      my offspring, and another girl took it up, and owned it,
      and you generously reared and educated it, from this
      time I have had sure pledges of your good will toward
      me. Now, therefore, like that well-known Electra, has
      this comedy come seeking, if haply it meet with an
      audience so clever, for it will recognize, if it should
      see, the lock of its brother.  But see how modest she is
      by nature, who, in the first place, has come, having
      stitched to her no leathern phallus hanging down, red at
      the top, and thick, to set the boys a laughing;  nor yet
      jeered the bald-headed, nor danced the cordax;  nor does
      the old man who speaks the verses beat the person near
      him with his staff, keeping out of sight wretched
      ribaldry; nor has she rushed in with torches, nor does
      she shout iou, iou;  but has come relying on herself and
      her verses. And I, although so excellent a poet, do not
      give myself airs, nor do I seek to deceive you by twice
      and thrice bringing forward the same pieces; but I am
      always clever at introducing new fashions, not at all
      resembling each other, and all of them clever; who
      struck Cleon  in the belly when at the height of his
      power, and could not bear to attack him afterward when
      he was down. But these scribblers, when once Hyperbolus
      has given them a handle, keep ever trampling on this
      wretched man and his mother. Eupolis,  indeed, first of
      all craftily introduced his Maricas, having basely, base
      fellow, spoiled by altering my play of the Knights,
      having added to it, for the sake of the cordax, a
      drunken old woman, whom Phrynichus long ago poetized,
      whom the whale was for devouring. Then again Hermippus
      made verses on Hyperbolus; and now all others press hard
      upon Hyperbolus, imitating my simile of the eels.
      Whoever, therefore, laughs at these, let him not take
      pleasure in my attempts; but if you are delighted with
      me and my inventions, in times to come you will seem to
      be wise.
 
 
 
       I first invoke, to join our choral band, the mighty
      Jupiter, ruling on high, the monarch of gods; and the
      potent master of the trident, the fierce upheaver of
      earth and briny sea; and our father of great renown,
      most august Aether, life-supporter of all; and the
      horse-guider, who fills the plain of the earth with
      exceeding bright beams, a mighty deity among gods and
      mortals.
 
 
 
       Most clever spectators, come, give us your attention;
      for having been injured, we blame you to your faces. For
      though we benefit the state most of all the gods, to us
      alone of the deities you do not offer sacrifice nor yet
      pour libations, who watch over you. For if there should
      be any expedition without prudence, then we either
      thunder or drizzle small rain.  And then, when you were
      for choosing as your general the Paphlagonian tanner,
      hateful to the gods, we contracted our brows and were
      enraged; and thunder burst through the lightning; and
      the Moon forsook her usual paths; and the Sun
      immediately drew in his wick to himself, and declared he
      would not give you light, if Cleon should be your
      general. Nevertheless you chose him. For they say that
      ill counsel is in this city; that the gods, however,
      turn all these your mismanagements to a prosperous
      issue. And how this also shall be advantageous, we will
      easily teach you. If you should convict the cormorant
      Cleon of bribery and embezzlement, and then make fast
      his neck in the stocks, the affair will turn out for the
      state to the ancient form again, if you have mismanaged
      in any way, and to a prosperous issue.
 
 
      Hear me again, King Phoebus, Delian Apollo, who
      inhabitest the high-peaked Cynthian rock!  And thou,
      blessed goddess, who inhabitest the all-golden house of
      Ephesus,  in which Lydian damsels greatly reverence
      thee;  and thou, our national goddess, swayer of the
      aegis, Minerva,  guardian of the city! And thou, reveler
      Bacchus, who, inhabiting the Parnassian rock, sparklest
      with torches, conspicuous among the Delphic Bacchanals!
 
 
      When we had got ready to set out hither, the Moon met
      us, and commanded us first to greet the Athenians and
      their allies;  and then declared that she was angry, for
      that she had suffered dreadful things, though she
      benefits you all, not in words, but openly. In the first
      place, not less than a drachma every month for torches;
      so that also all, when they went out of an evening, were
      wont to say, "Boy, don't buy a torch, for the moonlight
      is beautiful." And she says she confers other benefits
      on you, but that you do not observe the days at all
      correctly, but confuse them up and down; so that she
      says the gods are constantly threatening her, when they
      are defrauded of their dinner, and depart home, not
      having met with the regular feast according to the
      number of the days. And then, when you ought to be
      sacrificing, you are inflicting tortures and litigating.
      And often, while we gods are observing a fast, when we
      mourn for Memnon or Sarpedon,  you are pouring libations
      and laughing. For which reason Hyperbolus, having
      obtained the lot this year to be Hieromnemon,  was
      afterward deprived by us gods of his crown; for thus he
      will know better that he ought to spend the days of his
      life according to the Moon.
 
      [Enter Socrates]
 
      Soc. By Respiration, and Chaos, and Air, I have not seen
      any man so boorish, nor so impracticable, nor so stupid,
      nor so forgetful; who, while learning some little petty
      quibbles, forgets them before he has learned them.
      Nevertheless I will certainly call him out here to the
      light. Where is Strepsiades? Come forth with your couch.
 
      Strep. (from within). The bugs do not permit me to bring
      it forth.
 
      Soc. Make haste and lay it down; and give me your
      attention.
 
      [Enter Strepsiades]
 
      Strep. Very well.
 
      Soc. Come now; what do you now wish to learn first of
      those things in none of which you have ever been
      instructed? Tell me. About measures, or rhythms, or
      verses?
 
      Strep. I should prefer to learn about measures; for it
      is but lately I was cheated out of two choenices  by a
      meal-huckster.
 
      Soc. I do not ask you this, but which you account the
      most beautiful measure; the trimetre or the tetrameter?
 
      Strep. Make a wager then with me, if the semisextarius
      be not a tetrameter.
 
      Soc. Go to the devil! How boorish you are and dull of
      learning. Perhaps you may be able to learn about
      rhythms.
 
      Strep. But what good will rhythms do me for a living?
 
      Soc. In the first place, to be clever at an
      entertainment, understanding what rhythm is for the
      war-dance, and what, again, according to the dactyle.
 
      Strep. According to the dactyle? By Jove, but I know it!
 
      Soc. Tell me, pray.
 
      Strep. What else but this finger? Formerly, indeed, when
      I was yet a boy, this here!
 
      Soc. You are boorish and stupid.
 
      Strep. For I do not desire, you wretch, to learn any of
      these things.
 
      Soc. What then?
 
      Strep. That, that, the most unjust cause.
 
      Soc. But you must learn other things before these;
      namely, what quadrupeds are properly masculine.
 
      Strep. I know the males, if I am not mad-krios, tragos,
      tauros, kuon, alektryon.
 
      Soc. Do you see what you are doing? You are calling both
      the female and the male alektryon in the same way.
 
      Strep. How, pray? Come, tell me.
 
      Soc. How? The one with you is alektryon, and the other
      is alektryon also.
 
      Strep. Yea, by Neptune! How now ought I to call them?
 
      Soc. The one alektryaina and the other alektor.
 
      Strep. Alektryaina? Capital, by the Air! So that, in
      return for this lesson alone, I will fill your kardopos
      full of barley-meal on all sides.
 
      Soc. See! See! There again is another blunder! You make
      kardopos, which is feminine, to be masculine.
 
      Strep. In what way do I make kardopos masculine?
 
      Soc. Most assuredly; just as if you were to say
      Cleonymos.
 
      Strep. Good sir, Cleonymus had no kneading-trough, but
      kneaded his bread in a round mortar. How ought I to call
      it henceforth?
 
      Soc. How? Call it kardope, as you call Sostrate.
 
      Strep. Kardope in the feminine?
 
      Soc. For so you speak it rightly.
 
      Strep. But that would make it kardope, Kleonyme.
 
      Soc. You must learn one thing more about names, what are
      masculine and what of them are feminine.
 
      Strep. I know what are female.
 
      Soc. Tell me, pray.
 
      Strep. Lysilla, Philinna, Clitagora, Demetria.
 
      Soc. What names are masculine?
 
      Strep. Thousands; Philoxenus, Melesias, Amynias.
 
      Soc. But, you wretch! These are not masculine.
 
      Strep. Are they not males with you?
 
      Soc. By no means; for how would you call Amynias, if you
      met him?
 
      Strep. How would I call? Thus: "Come hither, come hither
      Amynia!"
 
      Soc. Do you see? You call Amynias a woman.
 
      Strep. Is it not then with justice, who does not serve
      in the army? But why should I learn these things, that
      we all know?
 
      Soc. It is no use, by Jupiter! Having reclined yourself
      down here--
 
      Strep. What must I do?
 
      Soc. Think out some of your own affairs.
 
      Strep. Not here, pray, I beseech you; but, if I must,
      suffer me to excogitate these very things on the ground.
 
      Soc. There is no other way.
 
      [Exit Socrates.]
 
      Strep. Unfortunate man that I am! What a penalty shall I
      this day pay to the bugs!
 
      Cho. Now meditate and examine closely; and roll yourself
      about in every way, having wrapped yourself up; and
      quickly, when you fall into a difficulty, spring to
      another mental contrivance. But let delightful sleep be
      absent from your eyes.
 
      Strep. Attatai! Attatai!
 
      Cho. What ails you? Why are you distressed?
 
      Strep. Wretched man, I am perishing! The Corinthians,
      coming out from the bed, are biting me, and devouring my
      sides, and drinking up my life-blood, and tearing away
      my flesh, and digging through my vitals, and will
      annihilate me.
 
      Cho. Do not now be very grievously distressed.
 
      Strep. Why, how, when my money is gone, my complexion
      gone, my life gone, and my slipper gone? And furthermore
      in addition to these evils, with singing the
      night-watches, I am almost gone myself.
 
      [Re-enter Socrates]
 
      Soc. Ho you! What are you about? Are you not meditating?
 
      Strep. I? Yea, by Neptune!
 
      Soc. And what, pray, have you thought?
 
      Strep. Whether any bit of me will be left by the bugs.
 
      Soc. You will perish most wretchedly.
 
      Strep. But, my good friend, I have already perished.
 
      Soc. You must not give in, but must wrap yourself up;
      for you have to discover a device for abstracting, and a
      means of cheating.
 
      [Walks up and down while Strepsiades wraps himself up in
      the blankets.]
 
      Strep. Ah me! Would, pray, some one would throw over me
      a swindling contrivance from the sheep-skins.
 
      Soc. Come now; I will first see this fellow, what he is
      about. Ho you! Are you asleep?
 
      Strep. No, by Apollo, I am not!
 
      Soc. Have you got anything?
 
      Strep. No; by Jupiter, certainly not!
 
      Soc. Nothing at all?
 
      Strep. Nothing, except what I have in my right hand.
 
      Soc. Will you not quickly cover yourself up and think of
      something?
 
      Strep. About what? For do you tell me this, O Socrates!
 
      Soc. Do you, yourself, first find out and state what you
      wish.
 
      Strep. You have heard a thousand times what I wish.
      About the interest; so that I may pay no one.
 
      Soc. Come then, wrap yourself up, and having given your
      mind play with subtilty, revolve your affairs by little
      and little, rightly distinguishing and examining.
 
      Strep. Ah me, unhappy man!
 
      Soc. Keep quiet; and if you be puzzled in any one of
      your conceptions, leave it and go; and then set your
      mind in motion again, and lock it up.
 
      Strep. (in great glee). O dearest little Socrates!
 
      Soc. What, old man?
 
      Strep. I have got a device for cheating them of the
      interest.
 
      Soc. Exhibit it.
 
      Strep. Now tell me this, pray; if I were to purchase a
      Thessalian witch, and draw down the moon by night,  and
      then shut it up, as if it were a mirror, in a round
      crest-case, and then carefully keep it--
 
      Soc. What good, pray, would this do you?
 
      Strep. What? If the moon were to rise no longer
      anywhere, I should not pay the interest.
 
      Soc. Why so, pray?
 
      Strep. Because the money is lent out by the month.
 
      Soc. Capital! But I will again propose to you another
      clever question. If a suit of five talents should be
      entered against you, tell me how you would obliterate
      it.
 
      Strep. How? How? I do not know but I must seek.
 
      Soc. Do not then always revolve your thoughts about
      yourself; but slack away your mind into the air, like a
      cock-chafer  tied with a thread by the foot.
 
      Strep. I have found a very clever method of getting rid
      of my suit, so that you yourself would acknowledge it.
 
      Soc. Of what description?
 
      Strep. Have you ever seen this stone in the chemist's
      shops, the beautiful and transparent one, from which
      they kindle fire?
 
      Soc. Do you mean the burning-glass?
 
      Strep. I do. Come what would you say, pray, if I were to
      take this, when the clerk was entering the suit, and
      were to stand at a distance, in the direction of the
      sun, thus, and melt out the letters of my suit?
 
      Soc. Cleverly done, by the Graces!
 
      Strep. Oh! How I am delighted, that a suit of five
      talents has been cancelled!
 
      Soc. Come now, quickly seize upon this.
 
      Strep. What?
 
      Soc. How, when engaged in a lawsuit, you could overturn
      the suit, when you were about to be cast, because you
      had no witnesses.
 
      Strep. Most readily and easily.
 
      Soc. Tell me, pray.
 
      Strep. Well now, I'll tell you. If, while one suit was
      still pending, before mine was called on, I were to run
      away and hang myself.
 
      Soc. You talk nonsense.
 
      Strep. By the gods, would I! For no one will bring
      action against me when I am dead.
 
      Soc. You talk nonsense. Begone; I can't teach you any
      longer.
 
      Strep. Why so? Yea, by the gods, O Socrates!
 
      Soc. You straightaway forget whatever you learn. For
      what now was the first thing you were taught? Tell me.
 
      Strep. Come, let me see: nay, what was the first? What
      was the fist? Nay, what was the thing in which we knead
      our flour? Ah me! What was it?
 
      Soc. Will you not pack off to the devil, you most
      forgetful and most stupid old man?
 
      Strep. Ah me, what then, pray will become of me,
      wretched man? For I shall be utterly undone, if I do not
      learn to ply the tongue. Come, O ye Clouds, give me some
      good advice.
 
      Cho. We, old man, advise you, if you have a son grown
      up, to send him to learn in your stead.
 
      Strep. Well, I have a fine, handsome son, but he is not
      willing to learn. What must I do?
 
      Cho. But do you permit him?
 
      Strep. Yes, for he is robust in body, and in good
      health, and is come of the high-plumed dames of Coesyra.
      I will go for him, and if he be not willing, I will
      certainly drive him from my house.
 
      [To Socrates.]
 
      Go in and wait for me a short time.
 
      [Exit]
 
      Cho. Do you perceive that you are soon to obtain the
      greatest benefits through us alone of the gods? For this
      man is ready to do everything that you bid him. But you,
      while the man is astounded and evidently elated, having
      perceived it, will quickly fleece him to the best of
      your power.
 
      [Exit Socrates]
 
      For matters of this sort are somehow accustomed to turn
      the other way.
 
      [Enter Strepsiades and Phidippides]
 
      Strep. By Mist, you certainly shall not stay here any
      longer! But go and gnaw the columns of Megacles.
 
      Phid. My good sir, what is the matter with you, O
      father? You are not in your senses, by Olympian Jupiter!
 
      Strep. See, see, "Olympian Jupiter!" What folly! To
      think of your believing in Jupiter, as old as you are!
 
      Phid. Why, pray, did you laugh at this?
 
      Strep. Reflecting that you are a child, and have
      antiquated notions. Yet, however, approach, that you may
      know more; and I will tell you a thing, by learning
      which you will be a man. But see that you do not teach
      this to any one.
 
      Phid. Well, what is it?
 
      Strep. You swore now by Jupiter.
 
      Phid. I did.
 
      Strep. Seest thou, then, how good a thing is learning?
      There is no Jupiter, O Phidippides!
 
      Phid. Who then?
 
      Strep. Vortex reigns, having expelled Jupiter.
 
      Phid. Bah! Why do you talk foolishly?
 
      Strep. Be assured that it is so.
 
      Phid. Who says this?
 
      Strep. Socrates the Melian, and Chaerephon, who knows
      the footmarks of fleas.
 
      Phid. Have you arrived at such a pitch of frenzy that
      you believe madmen?
 
      Strep. Speak words of good omen, and say nothing bad of
      clever men and wise; of whom, through frugality, none
      ever shaved or anointed himself, or went to a bath to
      wash himself; while you squander my property in bathing,
      as if I were already dead. But go as quickly as possible
      and learn instead of me.
 
      Phid. What good could any one learn from them?
 
      Strep. What, really? Whatever wisdom there is among men.
      And you will know yourself, how ignorant and stupid you
      are. But wait for me here a short time.
 
      [Runs off]
 
      Phid. Ah me! What shall I do, my father being crazed?
      Shall I bring him into court and convict him of lunacy,
      or shall I give information of his madness to the
      coffin-makers?
 
      [Re-enter Strepsiades with a cock under one arm and a
      hen under the other]
 
      Strep. Come, let me see; what do you consider this to
      be? Tell me.
 
      Phid. Alectryon.
 
      Strep. Right. And what this?
 
      Phid. Alectryon.
 
      Strep. Both the same? You are very ridiculous. Do not do
      so, then, for the future; but call this alektryaina, and
      this one alektor.
 
      Phid. Alektryaina! Did you learn these clever things by
      going in just now to the Titans?
 
      Strep. And many others too; but whatever I learned on
      each occasion I used to forget immediately, through
      length of years.
 
      Phid. Is it for this reason, pray, that you have also
      lost your cloak?
 
      Strep. I have not lost it; but have studied it away.
 
      Phid. What have you made of your slippers, you foolish
      man?
 
      Strep. I have expended them, like Pericles, for needful
      purposes.  Come, move, let us go. And then if you obey
      your father, go wrong if you like. I also know that I
      formerly obeyed you, a lisping child of six years old,
      and bought you a go-cart at the Diasia, with the first
      obolus I received from the Heliaea.
 
      Phid. You will assuredly some time at length be grieved
      at this.
 
      Strep. It is well done of you that you obeyed. Come
      hither, come hither O Socrates! Come forth, for I bring
      to you this son of mine, having persuaded him against
      his will.
 
      [Enter Socrates]
 
      Soc. For he is still childish, and not used to the
      baskets here.
 
      Phid. You would yourself be used to them if you were
      hanged.
 
      Strep. A mischief take you! Do you abuse your teacher?
 
      Soc. "Were hanged" quoth 'a! How sillily he pronounced
      it, and with lips wide apart! How can this youth ever
      learn an acquittal from a trial or a legal summons, or
      persuasive refutation? And yet Hyperbolus learned this
      at the cost of a talent.
 
      Strep. Never mind; teach him. He is clever by nature.
      Indeed, from his earliest years, when he was a little
      fellow only so big, he was wont to form houses and carve
      ships within-doors, and make little wagons of leather,
      and make frogs out of pomegranate-rinds, you can't think
      how cleverly. But see that he learns those two causes;
      the better, whatever it may be; and the worse, which, by
      maintaining what is unjust, overturns the better. If not
      both, at any rate the unjust one by all means.
 
      Soc. He shall learn it himself from the two causes in
      person.
 
      [Exit Socrates]
 
      Strep. I will take my departure. Remember this now, that
      he is to be able to reply to all just arguments.
 
      [Exit Strepsiades and enter Just Cause and Unjust Cause]
 
      Just Cause. Come hither! Show yourself to the
      spectators, although being audacious.
 
      Unjust Cause. Go whither you please; for I shall far
      rather do for you, if I speak before a crowd.
 
      Just. You destroy me? Who are you?
 
      Unj. A cause.
 
      Just. Ay, the worse.
 
      Unj. But I conquer you, who say that you are better than
      I.
 
      Just. By doing what clever trick?
 
      Unj. By discovering new contrivances.
 
      Just. For these innovations flourish by the favour of
      these silly persons.
 
      Unj. No; but wise persons.
 
      Just I will destroy you miserably.
 
      Unj. Tell me, by doing what?
 
      Just By speaking what is just.
 
      Unj. But I will overturn them by contradicting them; for
      I deny that justice even exists at all.
 
      Just Do you deny that it exists?
 
      Unj. For come, where is it?
 
      Just With the gods.
 
      Unj. How, then, if justice exists, has Jupiter not
      perished, who bound his own father?
 
      Just Bah! This profanity now is spreading! Give me a
      basin.
 
      Unj. You are a dotard and absurd.
 
      Just You are debauched and shameless.
 
      Unj. You have spoken roses of me.
 
      Just And a dirty lickspittle.
 
      Unj. You crown me with lilies.
 
      Just And a parricide.
 
      Unj. You don't know that you are sprinkling me with
      gold.
 
      Just Certainly not so formerly, but with lead.
 
      Unj. But now this is an ornament to me.
 
      Just You are very impudent.
 
      Unj. And you are antiquated.
 
      Just And through you, no one of our youths is willing to
      go to school; and you will be found out some time or
      other by the Athenians, what sort of doctrines you teach
      the simple-minded.
 
      Unj. You are shamefully squalid.
 
      Just And you are prosperous. And yet formerly you were a
      beggar saying that you were the Mysian Telephus,  and
      gnawing the maxims of Pandeletus out of your little
      wallet.
 
      Unj. Oh, the wisdom--
 
      Just Oh, the madness--
 
      Unj. Which you have mentioned.
 
      Just And of your city, which supports you who ruin her
      youths.
 
      Unj. You shan't teach this youth, you old dotard.
 
      Just Yes, if he is to be saved, and not merely to
      practise loquacity.
 
      Unj. (to Phidippides) Come hither, and leave him to
      rave.
 
      Just You shall howl, if you lay your hand on him.
 
      Cho. Cease from contention and railing. But show to us,
      you, what you used to teach the men of former times, and
      you, the new system of education; in order that, having
      heard you disputing, he may decide and go to the school
      of one or the other.
 
      Just. I am willing to do so.
 
      Unj. I also am willing.
 
      Cho. Come now, which of the two shall speak first?
 
      Unj. I will give him the precedence; and then, from
      these things which he adduces, I will shoot him dead
      with new words and thoughts. And at last, if he mutter,
      he shall be destroyed, being stung in his whole face and
      his two eyes by my maxims, as if by bees.
 
      Cho. Now the two, relying on very dexterous arguments
      and thoughts, and sententious maxims, will show which of
      them shall appear superior in argument. For now the
      whole crisis of wisdom is here laid before them; about
      which my friends have a very great contest. But do you,
      who adorned our elders with many virtuous manners, utter
      the voice in which you rejoice, and declare your nature.
 
      Just. I will, therefore, describe the ancient system of
      education, how it was ordered, when I flourished in the
      advocacy of justice, and temperance was the fashion. In
      the first place it was incumbent that no one should hear
      the voice of a boy uttering a syllable; and next, that
      those from the same quarter of the town should march in
      good order through the streets to the school of the
      harp-master, naked, and in a body, even if it were to
      snow as thick as meal. Then again, their master would
      teach them, not sitting cross-legged, to learn by rote a
      song, either "pallada persepolin deinan"  or "teleporon
      ti boama"  raising to a higher pitch the harmony which
      our fathers transmitted to us. But if any of them were
      to play the buffoon, or to turn any quavers, like these
      difficult turns the present artists make after the
      manner of Phrynis, he used to be thrashed, being beaten
      with many blows, as banishing the Muses. And it behooved
      the boys, while sitting in the school of the
      Gymnastic-master, to cover the thigh, so that they might
      exhibit nothing indecent to those outside; then again,
      after rising from the ground, to sweep the sand
      together, and to take care not to leave an impression of
      the person for their lovers. And no boy used in those
      days to anoint himself below the navel; so that their
      bodies wore the appearance of blooming health. Nor used
      he to go to his lover, having made up his voice in an
      effeminate tone, prostituting himself with his eyes. Nor
      used it to be allowed when one was dining to take the
      head of the radish, or to snatch from their seniors dill
      or parsley, or to eat fish, or to giggle, or to keep the
      legs crossed.
 
      Unj. Aye, antiquated and dipolia-like  and full of
      grasshoppers, and of Cecydes, and of the Buphonian
      festival!
 
      Just Yet certainly these are those principles by which
      my system of education nurtured the men who fought at
      Marathon. But you teach the men of the present day, so
      that I am choked, when at the Panathenaia a fellow,
      holding his shield before his person, neglects
      Tritogenia,  when they ought to dance. Wherefore, O
      youth, choose with confidence, me, the better cause, and
      you will learn to hate the Agora, and to refrain from
      baths, and to be ashamed of what is disgraceful, and to
      be enraged if any one jeer you, and to rise up from
      seats before your seniors when they approach, and not to
      behave ill toward your parents, and to do nothing else
      that is base, because you are to form in your mind an
      image of Modesty: and not to dart into the house of a
      dancing-woman, lest, while gaping after these things,
      being struck with an apple by a wanton, you should be
      damaged in your reputation: and not to contradict your
      father in anything; nor by calling him Iapetus, to
      reproach him with the ills of age, by which you were
      reared in your infancy.
 
      Unj. If you shall believe him in this, O youth, by
      Bacchus, you will be like the sons of Hippocrates, and
      they will call you a booby.
 
      Just. Yet certainly shall you spend your time in the
      gymnastic schools, sleek and blooming; not chattering in
      the market-place rude jests, like the youths of the
      present day; nor dragged into court for a petty suit,
      greedy, pettifogging, knavish; but you shall descend to
      the Academy  and run races beneath the sacred olives
      along with some modest compeer, crowned with white
      reeds, redolent of yew, and careless ease, of
      leaf-shedding white poplar, rejoicing in the season of
      spring, when the plane-tree whispers to the elm. If you
      do these things which I say, and apply your mind to
      these, you will ever have a stout chest, a clear
      complexion, broad shoulders, a little tongue, large
      hips, little lewdness. But if you practise what the
      youths of the present day do, you will have in the first
      place, a pallid complexion, small shoulders, a narrow
      chest, a large tongue, little hips, great lewdness, a
      long psephism;  and this deceiver will persuade you to
      consider everything that is base to be honourable, and
      what is honourable to be base; and in addition to this,
      he will fill you with the lewdness of Antimachus.
 
      Cho. O thou that practisest most renowned high-towering
      wisdom! How sweetly does a modest grace attend your
      words! Happy, therefore, were they who lived in those
      days, in the times of former men! In reply, then, to
      these, O thou that hast a dainty-seeming Muse, it
      behooveth thee to say something new; since the man has
      gained renown. And it appears you have need of powerful
      arguments against him, if you are to conquer the man and
      not incur laughter.
 
      Unj. And yet I was choking in my heart, and was longing
      to confound all these with contrary maxims. For I have
      been called among the deep thinkers the "worse cause" on
      this very account, that I first contrived how to speak
      against both law and justice; and this art is worth more
      than ten thousand staters, that one should choose the
      worse cause, and nevertheless be victorious. But mark
      how I will confute the system of education on which he
      relies, who says, in the first place, that he will not
      permit you to be washed with warm water. And yet, on
      what principle do you blame the warm baths?
 
      Just. Because it is most vile, and makes a man cowardly.
 
      Unj. Stop! For immediately I seize and hold you by the
      waist without escape. Come, tell me, which of the sons
      of Jupiter do you deem to have been the bravest in soul,
      and to have undergone most labours?
 
      Just. I consider no man superior to Hercules.
 
      Unj. Where, pray, did you ever see cold Herculean baths?
      And yet, who was more valiant than he?
 
      Just. These are the very things which make the bath full
      of youths always chattering all day long, but the
      palaestras empty.
 
      Unj. You next find fault with their living in the
      market-place; but I commend it. For if it had been bad,
      Homer would never have been for representing Nestor  as
      an orator; nor all the other wise men. I will return,
      then, from thence to the tongue, which this fellow says
      our youths ought not to exercise, while I maintain they
      should. And again, he says they ought to be modest: two
      very great evils. For tell me to whom you have ever seen
      any good accrue through modesty and confute me by your
      words.
 
      Just. To many. Peleus,  at any rate, received his sword
      on account of it.
 
      Unj. A sword? Marry, he got a pretty piece of luck, the
      poor wretch! While Hyperbolus, he of the lamps, got more
      than many talents by his villainy, but by Jupiter, no
      sword!
 
      Just. And Peleus married Thetis, too, through his
      modesty.
 
      Unj. And then she went off and left him; for he was not
      lustful, nor an agreeable bedfellow to spend the night
      with. Now a woman delights in being wantonly treated.
      But you are an old dotard. For (to Phidippides)
      consider, O youth, all that attaches to modesty, and of
      how many pleasures you are about to be deprived--of
      women, of games at cottabus, of dainties, of
      drinking-bouts, of giggling. And yet, what is life worth
      to you if you be deprived of these enjoyments? Well, I
      will pass from thence to the necessities of our nature.
      You have gone astray, you have fallen in love, you have
      been guilty of some adultery, and then have been caught.
      You are undone, for you are unable to speak. But if you
      associate with me, indulge your inclination, dance,
      laugh, and think nothing disgraceful. For if you should
      happen to be detected as an adulterer, you will make
      this reply to him, "that you have done him no injury":
      and then refer him to Jupiter, how even he is overcome
      by love and women. And yet, how could you, who are a
      mortal, have greater power than a god?
 
      Just. But what if he should suffer the radish through
      obeying you, and be depillated with hot ashes?  What
      argument will he be able to state, to prove that he is
      not a blackguard?
 
      Unj. And if he be a blackguard, what harm will he
      suffer?
 
      Just. Nay, what could he ever suffer still greater than
      this?
 
      Unj. What then will you say if you be conquered by me in
      this?
 
      Just. I will be silent: what else can I do?
 
      Unj. Come, now, tell me; from what class do the
      advocates come?
 
      Just. From the blackguards.
 
      Unj. I believe you. What then? From what class do
      tragedians come?
 
      Just. From the blackguards.
 
      Unj. You say well. But from what class do the public
      orators come?
 
      Just. From the blackguards.
 
      Unj. Then have you perceived that you say nothing to the
      purpose? And look which class among the audience is the
      more numerous.
 
      Just. Well now, I'm looking.
 
      Unj. What, then, do you see?
 
      Just. By the gods, the blackguards to be far more
      numerous. This fellow, at any rate, I know; and him
      yonder; and this fellow with the long hair.
 
      Unj. What, then, will you say?
 
      Just. We are conquered. Ye blackguards, by the gods,
      receive my cloak, for I desert to you.
 
      [Exeunt the Two Causes, and re-enter Socrates and
      Strepsiades.]
 
      Soc. What then? whether do you wish to take and lead
      away this your son, or shall I teach him to speak?
 
      Strep. Teach him, and chastise him: and remember that
      you train him properly; on the one side able for petty
      suits; but train his other jaw able for the more
      important causes.
 
      Soc. Make yourself easy; you shall receive him back a
      clever sophist.
 
      Strep. Nay, rather, pale and wretched.
 
      [Exeunt Socrates, Strepsiades, and Phidippides.]
 
      Cho. Go ye, then: but I think that you will repent of
      these proceedings. We wish to speak about the judges,
      what they will gain, if at all they justly assist this
      Chorus. For in the first place, if you wish to plough up
      your fields in spring, we will rain for you first; but
      for the others afterward. And then we will protect the
      fruits, and the vines, so that neither drought afflict
      them, nor excessive wet weather. But if any mortal
      dishonour us who are goddesses, let him consider what
      evils he will suffer at our hands, obtaining neither
      wine nor anything else from his farm. For when his
      olives and vines sprout, they shall be cut down; with
      such slings will we smite them. And if we see him making
      brick, we will rain; and we will smash the tiles of his
      roof with round hailstones. And if he himself, or any
      one of his kindred or friends, at any time marry, we
      will rain the whole night; so he will probably wish
      rather to have been even in Egypt than to have judged
      badly.
 
      [Enter Strepsiades with a meal-sack on his shoulder.]
 
      Strep. The fifth, the fourth, the third, after this the
      second; and then, of all the days I most fear, and
      dread, and abominate, immediately after this there is
      the Old and New. For every one to whom I happen to be
      indebted, swears, and says he will ruin and destroy me,
      having made his deposits against me; though I only ask
      what is moderate and just-"My good sir, one part don't
      take just now; the other part put off I pray; and the
      other part remit"; they say that thus they will never
      get back their money, but abuse me, as I am unjust, and
      say they will go to law with me. Now therefore let them
      go to law, for it little concerns me, if Phidippides has
      learned to speak well. I shall soon know by knocking at
      the thinking-shop.
 
      [Knocks at the door.]
 
      Boy, I say! Boy, boy!
 
      [Enter Socrates]
 
      Soc. Good morning, Strepsiades.
 
      Strep. The same to you. But first accept this present;
      for one ought to compliment the teacher with a fee. And
      tell me about my son, if he has learned that cause,
      which you just now brought forward.
 
      Soc. He has learned it.
 
      Strep. Well done, O Fraud, all-powerful queen!
 
      Soc. So that you can get clear off from whatever suit
      you please.
 
      Strep. Even if witnesses were present when I borrowed
      the money?
 
      Soc. Yea, much more! Even if a thousand be present.
 
      Strep. Then I will shout with a very loud shout: Ho!
      Weep, you petty-usurers, both you and your principals,
      and your compound interests! For you can no longer do me
      any harm, because such a son is being reared for me in
      this house, shining with a double-edged tongue, for my
      guardian, the preserver of my house, a mischief to my
      enemies, ending the sadness of the great woes of his
      father. Him do thou run and summon from within to me.
 
      [Socrates goes into the house.]
 
      O child! O son! Come forth from the house! Hear your
      father!
 
      [Re-enter Socrates leading in Phidippides]
 
      Soc. Lo, here is the man!
 
      Strep. O my dear, my dear!
 
      Soc. Take your son and depart.
 
      [Exit Socrates.]
 
      Strep. Oh, oh, my child! Huzza! Huzza! How I am
      delighted at the first sight of your complexion! Now,
      indeed, you are, in the first place, negative and
      disputatious to look at, and this fashion native to the
      place plainly appears, the "what do you say?" and the
      seeming to be injured when, I well know, you are
      injuring and inflicting a wrong; and in your countenance
      there is the Attic look. Now, therefore, see that you
      save me, since you have also ruined me.
 
      Phid. What, pray, do you fear?
 
      Strep. The Old and New.
 
      Phid. Why, is any day old and new?
 
      Strep. Yes; on which they say that they will make their
      deposits against me.
 
      Phid. Then those that have made them will lose them; for
      it is not possible that two days can be one day.
 
      Strep. Can not it?
 
      Phid. Certainly not; unless the same woman can be both
      old and young at the same time.
 
      Strep. And yet it is the law.
 
      Phid. For they do not, I think, rightly understand what
      the law means.
 
      Strep. And what does it mean?
 
      Phid. The ancient Solon  was by nature the commons'
      friend.
 
      Strep. This surely is nothing whatever to the Old and
      New.
 
      Phid. He therefore made the summons for two days, for
      the Old and New, that the deposits might be made on the
      first of the month.
 
      Strep. Why, pray, did he add the old day?
 
      Phid. In order, my good sir, that the defendants, being
      present a day before, might compromise the matter of
      their own accord; but if not, that they might be worried
      on the morning of the new moon.
 
      Strep. Why, then, do the magistrates not receive the
      deposits on the new moon, but on the Old and New?
 
      Phid. They seem to me to do what the forestallers do: in
      order that they may appreciate the deposits as soon as
      possible, on this account they have the first pick by
      one day.
 
      Strep. (turning to the audience) Bravo! Ye wretches, why
      do you sit senseless, the gain of us wise men, being
      blocks, ciphers, mere sheep, jars heaped together,
      wherefore I must sing an encomium upon myself and this
      my son, on account of our good fortune. "O happy
      Strepsiades! How wise you are yourself, and how
      excellent is the son whom you are rearing!" My friends
      and fellow-tribesmen will say of me, envying me, when
      you prove victorious in arguing causes. But first I wish
      to lead you in and entertain you.
 
      [Exeunt Strepsiades and Phidippides.]
 
      Pasias (entering with his summons-witness) Then, ought a
      man to throw away any part of his own property? Never!
      But it were better then at once to put away blushes,
      rather than now to have trouble; since I am now dragging
      you to be a witness, for the sake of my own money; and
      further, in addition to this, I shall become an enemy to
      my fellow-tribesman. But never, while I live, will I
      disgrace my country, but will summon Strepsiades.
 
      Strep. (from within) Who's there?
 
      Pas. For the Old and New.
 
      Strep. I call you to witness, that he has named it for
      two days. For what matter do you summon me?
 
      Pas. For the twelve minae, which you received when you
      were buying the dapple-gray horse.
 
      Strep. A horse? Do you not hear? I, whom you all know to
      hate horsemanship!
 
      Pas. And, by Jupiter! You swore by the gods too, that
      you would repay it.
 
      Strep. Ay, by Jove! For then my Phidippides did not yet
      know the irrefragable argument.
 
      Pas. And do you now intend, on this account, to deny the
      debt?
 
      Strep. Why, what good should I get else from his
      instruction?
 
      Pas. And will you be willing to deny these upon oath of
      the gods?
 
      Strep. What gods?
 
      Pas. Jupiter, Mercury, and Neptune.
 
      Strep. Yes, by Jupiter! And would pay down, too, a
      three-obol piece besides to swear.
 
      Pas. Then may you perish some day for your impudence!
 
      Strep. This man would be the better for it if he were
      cleansed by rubbing with salt.
 
      Pas. Ah me, how you deride me!
 
      Strep. He will contain six choae.
 
       Pas. By great Jupiter and the gods, you certainly shall
      not do this to me with impunity!
 
      Strep. I like your gods amazingly; and Jupiter, sworn
      by, is ridiculous to the knowing ones.
 
       Pas. You will assuredly suffer punishment, some time or
      other, for this. But answer and dismiss me, whether you
      are going to repay me my money or not.
 
      Strep. Keep quiet now, for I will presently answer you
      distinctly.
 
      [Runs into the house.]
 
      Pas. (to his summons-witness). What do you think he will
      do?
 
      Witness. I think he will pay you.
 
      [Re-enter Strepsiades with a kneading-trough]
 
      Strep. Where is this man who asks me for his money? Tell
      me what is this?
 
      Pas. What is this? A kardopos.
 
      Strep. And do you then ask me for your money, being such
      an ignorant person? I would not pay, not even an obolus,
      to any one who called the kardope kardopos.
 
      Pas. Then won't you pay me?
 
      Strep. Not, as far as I know. Will you not then pack off
      as fast as possible from my door?
 
      Pas. I will depart; and be assured of this, that I will
      make deposit against you, or may I live no longer!
 
      Strep. Then you will lose it besides, in addition to
      your twelve minae. And yet I do not wish you to suffer
      this, because you named the kardopos foolishly.
 
      [Exeunt Pasias and Witness, and enter Amynias]
 
      Amynias. Ah me! Ah me!
 
      Strep. Ha! Whoever is this, who is lamenting? Surely it
      was not one of Carcinus' deities  that spoke.
 
      Amyn. But why do you wish to know this, who I am?-A
      miserable man.
 
      Strep. Then follow your own path.
 
      Amyn. O harsh fortune! O Fates, breaking the wheels of
      my horses! O Pallas, how you have destroyed me!
 
      Strep. What evil, pray, has Tlepolemus  ever done you?
 
      Amyn. Do not jeer me, my friend; but order your son to
      pay me the money which he received; especially as I have
      been unfortunate.
 
      Strep. What money is this?
 
      Amyn. That which he borrowed.
 
      Strep. Then you were really unlucky, as I think.
 
      Amyn. By the gods, I fell while driving my horses.
 
      Strep. Why, pray, do you talk nonsense, as if you had
      fallen from an ass?
 
      Amyn. Do I talk nonsense if I wish to recover my money?
 
      Strep. You can't be in your senses yourself.
 
      Amyn. Why, pray?
 
      Strep. You appear to me to have had your brains shaken
      as it were.
 
      Amyn. And you appear to me, by Hermes, to be going to be
      summoned, if you will not pay me the money?
 
      Strep. Tell me now, whether you think that Jupiter
      always rains fresh rain on each occasion, or that the
      sun draws from below the same water back again?
 
      Amyn. I know not which; nor do I care.
 
      Strep. How then is it just that you should recover your
      money, if you know nothing of meteorological matters?
 
      Amyn. Well, if you are in want, pay me the interest of
      my money.
 
      Strep. What sort of animal is this interest?
 
      Amyn. Most assuredly the money is always becoming more
      and more every month and every day as the time slips
      away.
 
      Strep. You say well. What then? Is it possible that you
      consider the sea to be greater now than formerly?
 
      Amyn. No, by Jupiter, but equal; for it is not fitting
      that it should be greater.
 
      Strep. And how then, you wretch does this become no way
      greater, though the rivers flow into it, while you seek
      to increase your money? Will you not take yourself off
      from my house? Bring me the goad.
 
      [Enter Servant with a goad.]
 
       Amyn. I call you to witness these things.
 
      Strep. (beating him). Go! Why do you delay? Won't you
      march, Mr. Blood-horse?
 
      Amyn. Is not this an insult, pray?
 
      Strep. Will you move quickly?
 
       [Pricks him behind with the goad.]
 
      I'll lay on you, goading you behind, you outrigger? Do
      you fly?
 
      [Amynias runs off.]
 
      I thought I should stir you, together with your wheels
      and your two-horse chariots.
 
      [Exit Strepsiades.]
 
      Cho. What a thing it is to love evil courses! For this
      old man, having loved them, wishes to withhold the money
      that he borrowed. And he will certainly meet with
      something today, which will perhaps cause this sophist
      to suddenly receive some misfortune, in return for the
      knaveries he has begun. For I think that he will
      presently find what has been long boiling up, that his
      son is skilful to speak opinions opposed to justice, so
      as to overcome all with whomsoever he holds converse,
      even if he advance most villainous doctrines; and
      perhaps, perhaps his father will wish that he were even
      speechless.
 
      Strep. (running out of the house pursued by his son)
      Hollo! Hollo! O neighbours, and kinsfolk, and
      fellow-tribesmen, defend me, by all means, who am being
      beaten! Ah me, unhappy man, for my head and jaw! Wretch!
      Do you beat your father?
 
      Phid. Yes, father.
 
      Strep. You see him owning that he beats me.
 
      Phid. Certainly.
 
      Strep. O wretch, and parricide, and house-breaker!
 
      Phid. Say the same things of me again, and more. Do you
      know that I take pleasure in being much abused?
 
      Strep. You blackguard!
 
      Phid. Sprinkle me with roses in abundance.
 
      Strep. Do you beat your father?
 
      Phid. And will prove too, by Jupiter! that I beat you
      with justice.
 
      Strep. O thou most rascally! Why, how can it be just to
      beat a father?
 
      Phid. I will demonstrate it, and will overcome you in
      argument.
 
      Strep. Will you overcome me in this?
 
      Phid. Yea, by much and easily. But choose which of the
      two Causes you wish to speak.
 
      Strep. Of what two Causes?
 
      Phid. The better, or the worse?
 
      Strep. Marry, I did get you taught to speak against
      justice, by Jupiter, my friend, if you are going to
      persuade me of this, that it is just and honourable for
      a father to be beaten by his sons!
 
      Phid. I think I shall certainly persuade you; so that,
      when you have heard, not even you yourself will say
      anything against it.
 
      Strep. Well, now, I am willing to hear what you have to
      say.
 
      Cho. It is your business, old man, to consider in what
      way you shall conquer the man; for if he were not
      relying upon something, he would not be so licentious.
      But he is emboldened by something; the boldness of the
      man is evident. Now you ought to tell to the Chorus from
      what the contention first arose. And this you must do by
      all means.
 
      Strep. Well, now, I will tell you from what we first
      began to rail at one another. After we had feasted, as
      you know, I first bade him take a lyre, and sing a song
      of Simonides, "The Shearing of the Ram."  But he
      immediately said it was old-fashioned to play on the
      lyre and sing while drinking, like a woman grinding
      parched barley.
 
      Phid. For ought you not then immediately to be beaten
      and trampled on, bidding me sing, just as if you were
      entertaining cicadae?
 
      Strep. He expressed, however, such opinions then too
      within, as he does now; and he asserted that Simonides
      was a bad poet. I bore it at first, with difficulty
      indeed, yet nevertheless I bore it. And then I bade him
      at least take a myrtle-wreath and recite to me some
      portion of Aeschylus; and then he immediately said,
      "Shall I consider Aeschylus the first among the poets,
      full of empty sound, unpolished, bombastic, using rugged
      words?" And hereupon you can't think how my heart
      panted. But, nevertheless, I restrained my passion, and
      said, "At least recite some passage of the more modern
      poets, of whatever kind these clever things be." And he
      immediately sang a passage of Euripides, how a brother,
      O averter of ill! Debauched his uterine sister. And I
      bore it no longer, but immediately assailed him with
      many abusive reproaches. And then, after that, as was
      natural, we hurled word upon word. Then he springs upon
      me; and then he was wounding me, and beating me, and
      throttling me.
 
      Phid. Were you not therefore justly beaten, who do not
      praise Euripides, the wisest of poets?
 
      Strep. He the wisest! Oh, what shall I call you? But I
      shall be beaten again.
 
      Phid. Yes, by Jupiter, with justice?
 
      Strep. Why, how with justice? Who, O shameless fellow,
      reared you, understanding all your wishes, when you
      lisped what you meant? If you said bryn, I,
      understanding it, used to give you to drink. And when
      you asked for mamman, I used to come to you with bread.
      And you used no sooner to say caccan, than I used to
      take and carry you out of doors, and hold you before me.
      But you now, throttling me who was bawling and crying
      out because I wanted to ease myself, had not the heart
      to carry me forth out of doors, you wretch; but I did it
      there while I was being throttled.
 
      Cho. I fancy the hearts of the youths are panting to
      hear what he will say. For if, after having done such
      things, he shall persuade him by speaking, I would not
      take the hide of the old folks, even at the price of a
      chick-pea. It is thy business, thou author and upheaver
      of new words, to seek some means of persuasion, so that
      you shall seem to speak justly.
 
      Phid. How pleasant it is to be acquainted with new and
      clever things, and to be able to despise the established
      laws! For I, when I applied my mind to horsemanship
      alone, used not to be able to utter three words before I
      made a mistake; but now, since he himself has made me
      cease from these pursuits, and I am acquainted with
      subtle thoughts, and arguments, and speculations, I
      think I shall demonstrate that it is just to chastise
      one's father.
 
      Strep. Ride, then, by Jupiter! Since it is better for me
      to keep a team of four horses than to be killed with a
      beating.
 
      Phid. I will pass over to that part of my discourse
      where you interrupted me; and first I will ask you this:
      Did you beat me when I was a boy?
 
      Strep. I did, through good-will and concern for you.
 
      Phid. Pray tell me, is it not just that I also should be
      well inclined toward you in the same way, and beat you,
      since this is to be well inclined-to give a beating? For
      why ought your body to be exempt from blows and mine
      not? And yet I too was born free. The boys weep, and do
      you not think it is right that a father should weep? You
      will say that it is ordained by law that this should be
      the lot of boys. But I would reply, that old men are
      boys twice over, and that it is the more reasonable that
      the old should weep than the young, inasmuch as it is
      less just that they should err.
 
      Strep. It is nowhere ordained by law that a father
      should suffer this.
 
      Phid. Was it not then a man like you and me, who first
      proposed this law, and by speaking persuaded the
      ancients? Why then is it less lawful for me also in turn
      to propose henceforth a new law for the sons, that they
      should beat their fathers in turn? But as many blows as
      we received before the law was made, we remit: and we
      concede to them our having been thrashed without return.
      Observe the cocks and these other animals, how they
      punish their fathers; and yet, in what do they differ
      from us, except that they do not write decrees?
 
      Strep. Why then, since you imitate the cocks in all
      things, do you not both eat dung and sleep on a perch?
 
      Phid. It is not the same thing, my friend; nor would it
      appear so to Socrates.
 
      Strep. Therefore do not beat me; otherwise you will one
      day blame yourself.
 
      Phid. Why, how?
 
      Strep. Since I am justly entitled to chastise you; and
      you to chastise your son, if you should have one.
 
      Phid. But if I should not have one, I shall have wept
      for nothing, and you will die laughing at me.
 
      Strep. To me, indeed, O comrades, he seems to speak
      justly; and I think we ought to concede to them what is
      fitting. For it is proper that we should weep, if we do
      not act justly.
 
      Phid. Consider still another maxim.
 
      Strep. No; for I shall perish if I do.
 
      Phid. And yet perhaps you will not be vexed at suffering
      what you now suffer.
 
      Strep. How, pray? For inform me what good you will do me
      by this.
 
      Phid. I will beat my mother, just as I have you.
 
      Strep. What do you say? What do you say? This other,
      again, is a greater wickedness.
 
      Phid. But what if, having the worst Cause, I shall
      conquer you in arguing, proving that it is right to beat
      one's mother?
 
      Strep. Most assuredly, if you do this, nothing will
      hinder you from casting yourself and your Worse Cause
      into the pit along with Socrates. These evils have I
      suffered through you, O Clouds! Having intrusted all my
      affairs to you.
 
      Cho. Nay, rather, you are yourself  the cause of these
      things, having turned yourself to wicked courses.
 
      Strep. Why, pray, did you not tell me this, then, but
      excited with hopes a rustic and aged man?
 
      Cho. We always do this to him whom we perceive to be a
      lover of wicked courses, until we precipitate him into
      misfortune, so that he may learn to fear the gods.
 
      Strep. Ah me! it is severe, O Clouds! But it is just;
      for I ought not to have withheld the money which I
      borrowed. Now, therefore, come with me, my dearest son,
      that you may destroy the blackguard Chaerephon and
      Socrates, who deceived you and me.
 
      Phid. I will not injure my teachers.
 
      Strep. Yes, yes, reverence Paternal Jove.
 
      Phid. "Paternal Jove" quoth'a! How antiquated you are!
      Why, is there any Jove?
 
      Strep. There is.
 
      Phid. There is not, no; for Vortex reigns having
      expelled Jupiter.
 
      Strep. He has not expelled him; but I fancied this, on
      account of this Vortex here. Ah me, unhappy man! When I
      even took you who are of earthenware for a god.
 
      Phid. Here rave and babble to yourself.
 
      [Exit Phidippides]
 
      Strep. Ah me, what madness! How mad, then, I was when I
      ejected the gods on account of Socrates! But O dear
      Hermes, by no means be wroth with me, nor destroy me;
      but pardon me, since I have gone crazy through prating.
      And become my adviser, whether I shall bring an action
      and prosecute them, or whatever you think. You advise me
      rightly, not permitting me to get up a lawsuit, but as
      soon as possible to set fire to the house of the prating
      fellows. Come hither, come hither, Xanthias! Come forth
      with a ladder and with a mattock and then mount upon the
      thinking-shop and dig down the roof, if you love your
      master, until you tumble the house upon them.
 
      [Xanthias mounts upon the roof]
 
      But let some one bring me a lighted torch and I'll make
      some of them this day suffer punishment, even if they be
      ever so much impostors.
 
      1st Dis. (from within) Hollo! Hollo!
 
      Strep. It is your business, O torch, to send forth
      abundant flame.
 
      [Mounts upon the roof]
 
      1st Dis. What are you doing, fellow?
 
      Strep. What am I doing? Why, what else, than chopping
      logic with the beams of your house?
 
      [Sets the house on fire]
 
      2nd Dis. (from within) You will destroy us! You will
      destroy us!
 
      Strep. For I also wish this very thing; unless my
      mattock deceive my hopes, or I should somehow fall first
      and break my neck.
 
      Soc. (from within). Hollo you! What are you doing, pray,
      you fellow on the roof?
 
      Strep. I am walking on air, and speculating about the
      sun.
 
      Soc. Ah me, unhappy! I shall be suffocated, wretched
      man!
 
      Chaer. And I, miserable man, shall be burnt to death!
 
      Strep. For what has come into your heads that you acted
      insolently toward the gods, and pried into the seat of
      the moon? Chase, pelt, smite them, for many reasons, but
      especially because you know that they offended against
      the gods!
 
      [The thinking shop is burned down]
 
      Cho. Lead the way out; for we have sufficiently acted as
      chorus for today.
 
 
 
      [Exeunt omnes]
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Derek Davis
 
 
 
 
 
 PEACE
 
 By Aristophanes
 
 
 
 Original Transcriber's Note:
 Translator uncredited. Footnotes have been retained because they
 provide the meanings of Greek names, terms and ceremonies and explain
 puns and references otherwise lost in translation. Occasional Greek
 words in the footnotes have not been included. Footnote numbers,
 in brackets, start anew at (1) for each piece of dialogue, and each
 footnote follows immediately the dialogue to which it refers, labeled
 thus: f(1).
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 
 The 'Peace' was brought out four years after 'The Acharnians' (422
 B.C.), when the War had already lasted ten years. The leading motive is
 the same as in the former play--the intense desire of the less excitable
 and more moderate-minded citizens for relief from the miseries of war.
 
 Trygaeus, a rustic patriot, finding no help in men, resolves to ascend
 to heaven to expostulate personally with Zeus for allowing this wretched
 state of things to continue. With this object he has fed and trained a
 gigantic dung-beetle, which he mounts, and is carried, like Bellerophon
 on Pegasus, on an aerial journey. Eventually he reaches Olympus, only to
 find that the gods have gone elsewhere, and that the heavenly abode is
 occupied solely by the demon of War, who is busy pounding up the Greek
 States in a huge mortar. However, his benevolent purpose is not in vain;
 for learning from Hermes that the goddess Peace has been cast into a
 pit, where she is kept a fast prisoner, he calls upon the different
 peoples of Hellas to make a united effort and rescue her, and with their
 help drags her out and brings her back in triumph to earth. The play
 concludes with the restoration of the goddess to her ancient honours,
 the festivities of the rustic population and the nuptials of Trygaeus
 with Opora (Harvest), handmaiden of Peace, represented as a pretty
 courtesan.
 
 Such references as there are to Cleon in this play are noteworthy. The
 great Demagogue was now dead, having fallen in the same action as the
 rival Spartan general, the renowned Brasidas, before Amphipolis, and
 whatever Aristophanes says here of his old enemy is conceived in the
 spirit of 'de mortuis nil nisi bonum.' In one scene Hermes is descanting
 on the evils which had nearly ruined Athens and declares that 'The
 Tanner' was the cause of them all. But Trygaeus interrupts him with the
 words:
 
 "Hold-say not so, good master Hermes; Let the man rest in peace where
 now he lies. He is no longer of our world, but yours."
 
 Here surely we have a trait of magnanimity on the author's part as
 admirable in its way as the wit and boldness of his former attacks had
 been in theirs.
 
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
      TRYGAEUS
      TWO SERVANTS OF TRYGAEUS
      MAIDENS, DAUGHTERS OF TRYGAEUS
      HERMES
      WAR
      TUMULT
      HIEROCLES, a Soothsayer
      A SICKLE-MAKER
      A CREST-MAKER
      A TRUMPET-MAKER
      A HELMET-MAKER
      A SPEAR-MAKER
      SON OF LAMACHUS
      SON OF CLEONYMUS
      CHORUS OF HUSBANDMEN
 
 
 
 
 SCENE: A farmyard, two slaves busy beside a dungheap; afterwards, in
 Olympus.
 
 
 
 FIRST SERVANT Quick, quick, bring the dung-beetle his cake.
 
 SECOND SERVANT Coming, coming.
 
 FIRST SERVANT Give it to him, and may it kill him!
 
 SECOND SERVANT May he never eat a better.
 
 FIRST SERVANT Now give him this other one kneaded up with ass's dung.
 
 SECOND SERVANT There! I've done that too.
 
 FIRST SERVANT And where's what you gave him just now; surely he can't
 have devoured it yet!
 
 SECOND SERVANT Indeed he has; he snatched it, rolled it between his feet
 and bolted it.
 
 FIRST SERVANT Come, hurry up, knead up a lot and knead them stiffly.
 
 SECOND SERVANT Oh, scavengers, help me in the name of the gods, if you
 do not wish to see me fall down choked.
 
 FIRST SERVANT Come, come, another made from the stool of a young
 scapegrace catamite. 'Twill be to the beetle's taste; he likes it well
 ground.
 
 SECOND SERVANT There! I am free at least from suspicion; none will
 accuse me of tasting what I mix.
 
 FIRST SERVANT Faugh! come, now another! keep on mixing with all your
 might.
 
 SECOND SERVANT I' faith, no. I can stand this awful cesspool stench no
 longer, so I bring you the whole ill-smelling gear.
 
 FIRST SERVANT Pitch it down the sewer sooner, and yourself with it.
 
 SECOND SERVANT Maybe, one of you can tell me where I can buy a
 stopped-up nose, for there is no work more disgusting than to mix food
 for a beetle and to carry it to him. A pig or a dog will at least pounce
 upon our excrement without more ado, but this foul wretch affects the
 disdainful, the spoilt mistress, and won't eat unless I offer him a cake
 that has been kneaded for an entire day.... But let us open the door
 a bit ajar without his seeing it. Has he done eating? Come, pluck up
 courage, cram yourself till you burst! The cursed creature! It wallows
 in its food! It grips it between its claws like a wrestler clutching
 his opponent, and with head and feet together rolls up its paste like
 a rope-maker twisting a hawser. What an indecent, stinking, gluttonous
 beast! I know not what angry god let this monster loose upon us, but of
 a certainty it was neither Aphrodite nor the Graces.
 
 FIRST SERVANT Who was it then?
 
 SECOND SERVANT No doubt the Thunderer, Zeus.
 
 FIRST SERVANT But perhaps some spectator, some beardless youth, who
 thinks himself a sage, will say, "What is this? What does the beetle
 mean?" And then an Ionian,(1) sitting next him, will add, "I think
 'tis an allusion to Cleon, who so shamelessly feeds on filth all by
 himself."--But now I'm going indoors to fetch the beetle a drink.
 
      f(1) 'Peace' was no doubt produced at the festival of the
      Apaturia, which was kept at the end of October, a period
      when strangers were numerous in Athens.
 
 SECOND SERVANT As for me, I will explain the matter to you all,
 children, youths, grownups and old men, aye, even to the decrepit
 dotards. My master is mad, not as you are, but with another sort of
 madness, quite a new kind. The livelong day he looks open-mouthed
 towards heaven and never stops addressing Zeus. "Ah! Zeus," he cries,
 "what are thy intentions? Lay aside thy besom; do not sweep Greece
 away!"
 
 TRYGAEUS Ah! ah! ah!
 
 SECOND SERVANT Hush, hush! Mehinks I hear his voice!
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! Zeus, what art thou going to do for our people? Dost thou
 not see this, that our cities will soon be but empty husks?
 
 SECOND SERVANT As I told you, that is his form of madness. There you
 have a sample of his follies. When his trouble first began to seize him,
 he said to himself, "By what means could I go straight to Zeus?" Then
 he made himself very slender little ladders and so clambered up towards
 heaven; but he soon came hurtling down again and broke his head.
 Yesterday, to our misfortune, he went out and brought us back this
 thoroughbred, but from where I know not, this great beetle, whose groom
 he has forced me to become. He himself caresses it as though it were
 a horse, saying, "Oh! my little Pegasus,(1) my noble aerial steed, may
 your wings soon bear me straight to Zeus!" But what is my master doing?
 I must stoop down to look through this hole. Oh! great gods! Here!
 neighbours, run here quick! here is my master flying off mounted on his
 beetle as if on horseback.
 
      f(1) The winged steed of Perseus--an allusion to a lost
      tragedy of Euripides, in which Bellerophon was introduced
      riding on Pegasus.
 
 TRYGAEUS Gently, gently, go easy, beetle; don't start off so proudly, or
 trust at first too greatly to your powers; wait till you have sweated,
 till the beating of your wings shall make your limb joints supple. Above
 all things, don't let off some foul smell, I adjure you; else I would
 rather have you stop in the stable altogether.
 
 SECOND SERVANT Poor master! Is he crazy?
 
 TRYGAEUS Silence! silence!
 
 SECOND SERVANT (TO TRYGAEUS) But why start up into the air on chance?
 
 TRYGAEUS 'Tis for the weal of all the Greeks; I am attempting a daring
 and novel feat.
 
 SECOND SERVANT But what is your purpose? What useless folly!
 
 TRYGAEUS No words of ill omen! Give vent to joy and command all men to
 keep silence, to close down their drains and privies with new tiles and
 to stop up their own vent-holes.(1)
 
      f(1) Fearing that if it caught a whiff from earth to its
      liking, the beetle might descend from the highest heaven to
      satisfy itself.
 
 FIRST SERVANT No, I shall not be silent, unless you tell me where you
 are going.
 
 TRYGAEUS Why, where am I likely to be going across the sky, if it be not
 to visit Zeus?
 
 FIRST SERVANT For what purpose?
 
 TRYGAEUS I want to ask him what he reckons to do for all the Greeks.
 
 SECOND SERVANT And if he doesn't tell you?
 
 TRYGAEUS I shall pursue him at law as a traitor who sells Greece to the
 Medes.(1)
 
      f(1) The Persians and the Spartans were not then allied as
      the scholiast states, since a treaty between them was only
      concluded in 412 B.C., i.e. eight years after the production
      of 'Peace'; the great king, however, was trying to derive
      advantages out of the dissensions in Greece.
 
 SECOND SERVANT Death seize me, if I let you go.
 
 TRYGAEUS It is absolutely necessary.
 
 SECOND SERVANT Alas! alas! dear little girls, your father is deserting
 you secretly to go to heaven. Ah! poor orphans, entreat him, beseech
 him.
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER Father! father! what is this I hear? Is it true? What!
 you would leave me, you would vanish into the sky, you would go to the
 crows?(1) 'Tis impossible! Answer, father, an you love me.
 
      f(1) "Go to the crows," a proverbial expression equivalent
      to our "Go to the devil."
 
 TRYGAEUS Yes, I am going. You hurt me too sorely, my daughters, when you
 ask me for bread, calling me your daddy, and there is not the ghost
 of an obolus in the house; if I succeed and come back, you will have a
 barley loaf every morning--and a punch in the eye for sauce!
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER But how will you make the journey? 'Tis not a ship that
 will carry you thither.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, but this winged steed will.
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER But what an idea, daddy, to harness a beetle, on which
 to fly to the gods.
 
 TRYGAEUS We see from Aesop's fables that they alone can fly to the abode
 of the Immortals.(1)
 
      f(1) Aesop tells us that the eagle and the beetle were at
      war; the eagle devoured the beetle's young and the latter
      got into its nest and tumbled out its eggs.  On this the
      eagle complained to Zeus, who advised it to lay its eggs in
      his bosom; but the beetle flew up to the abode of Zeus, who,
      forgetful of the eagle's eggs, at once rose to chase off the
      objectionable insect.  The eggs fell to earth and were
      smashed to bits.
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER Father, father, 'tis a tale nobody can believe! that
 such a stinking creature can have gone to the gods.
 
 TRYGAEUS It went to have vengeance on the eagle and break its eggs.
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER Why not saddle Pegasus? you would have a more TRAGIC(1)
 appearance in the eyes of the gods.
 
      f(1) Pegasus is introduced by Euripides both in his
      'Andromeda' and his 'Bellerophon.'
 
 TRYGAEUS Eh! don't you see, little fool, that then twice the food would
 be wanted? Whereas my beetle devours again as filth what I have eaten
 myself.
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER And if it fell into the watery depths of the sea, could
 it escape with its wings?
 
 TRYGAEUS (EXPOSING HIMSELF) I am fitted with a rudder in case of need,
 and my Naxos beetle will serve me as a boat.(1)
 
      f(1) Boats, called 'beetles,' doubtless because in form they
      resembled these insects, were built at Naxos.
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER And what harbour will you put in at?
 
 TRYGAEUS Why is there not the harbour of Cantharos at the Piraeus?(1)
 
      f(1) Nature had divided the Piraeus into three basins--
      Cantharos, Aphrodisium and Zea.  (Cantharos) is Greek for
      dung-beetle.
 
 LITTLE DAUGHTER Take care not to knock against anything and so fall off
 into space; once a cripple, you would be a fit subject for Euripides,
 who would put you into a tragedy.(1)
 
      f(1) In allusion to Euripides' fondness for introducing lame
      heroes in his plays.
 
 TRYGAEUS I'll see to it. Good-bye! (TO THE ATHENIANS.) You, for love of
 whom I brave these dangers, do ye neither let wind nor go to stool
 for the space of three days, for, if, while cleaving the air, my steed
 should scent anything, he would fling me head foremost from the summit
 of my hopes. Now come, my Pegasus, get a-going with up-pricked ears and
 make your golden bridle resound gaily. Eh! what are you doing? What are
 you up to? Do you turn your nose towards the cesspools? Come, pluck up
 a spirit; rush upwards from the earth, stretch out your speedy wings and
 make straight for the palace of Zeus; for once give up foraging in your
 daily food.--Hi! you down there, what are you after now? Oh! my god!
 'tis a man emptying his belly in the Piraeus, close to the house where
 the bad girls are. But is it my death you seek then, my death? Will
 you not bury that right away and pile a great heap of earth upon it and
 plant wild thyme therein and pour perfumes on it? If I were to fall from
 up here and misfortune happened to me, the town of Chios(1) would owe a
 fine of five talents for my death, all along of your cursed rump. Alas!
 how frightened I am! oh! I have no heart for jests. Ah! machinist, take
 great care of me. There is already a wind whirling round my navel; take
 great care or, from sheer fright, I shall form food for my beetle....
 But I think I am no longer far from the gods; aye, that is the dwelling
 of Zeus, I perceive. Hullo! Hi! where is the doorkeeper? Will no one
 open?
 
      f(1) An allusion to the proverbial nickname applied to the
      Chians (in Greek)--'crapping Chian.' There is a further
      joke, of course, in connection with the hundred and one
      frivolous pretexts which the Athenians invented for exacting
      contributions from the maritime allies.
 
 (THE SCENE CHANGES AND HEAVEN IS PRESENTED.)
 
 HERMES Meseems I can sniff a man. (HE PERCEIVES TRYGAEUS ASTRIDE HIS
 BEETLE.) Why, what plague is this?
 
 TRYGAEUS A horse-beetle.
 
 HERMES Oh! impudent, shameless rascal! oh! scoundrel! triple scoundrel!
 the greatest scoundrel in the world! how did you come here? Oh!
 scoundrel of all scoundrels! your name? Reply.
 
 TRYGAEUS Triple scoundrel.
 
 HERMES Your country?
 
 TRYGAEUS Triple scoundrel.
 
 HERMES Your father?
 
 TRYGAEUS My father? Triple scoundrel.
 
 HERMES By the Earth, you shall die, unless you tell me your name.
 
 TRYGAEUS I am Trygaeus of the Athmonian deme, a good vine-dresser,
 little addicted to quibbling and not at all an informer.
 
 HERMES Why do you come?
 
 TRYGAEUS I come to bring you this meat.
 
 HERMES Ah! my good friend, did you have a good journey?
 
 TRYGAEUS Glutton, be off! I no longer seem a triple scoundrel to you.
 Come, call Zeus.
 
 HERMES Ah! ah! you are a long way yet from reaching the gods, for they
 moved yesterday.
 
 TRYGAEUS To what part of the earth?
 
 HERMES Eh! of the earth, did you say?
 
 TRYGAEUS In short, where are they then?
 
 HERMES Very far, very far, right at the furthest end of the dome of
 heaven.
 
 TRYGAEUS But why have they left you all alone here?
 
 HERMES I am watching what remains of the furniture, the little pots and
 pans, the bits of chairs and tables, and odd wine-jars.
 
 TRYGAEUS And why have the gods moved away?
 
 HERMES Because of their wrath against the Greeks. They have located War
 in the house they occupied themselves and have given him full power to
 do with you exactly as he pleases; then they went as high up as ever
 they could, so as to see no more of your fights and to hear no more of
 your prayers.
 
 TRYGAEUS What reason have they for treating us so?
 
 HERMES Because they have afforded you an opportunity for peace more than
 once, but you have always preferred war. If the Laconians got the very
 slightest advantage, they would exclaim, "By the Twin Brethren! the
 Athenians shall smart for this." If, on the contrary, the latter
 triumphed and the Laconians came with peace proposals, you would say,
 "By Demeter, they want to deceive us. No, by Zeus, we will not hear a
 word; they will always be coming as long as we hold Pylos."(1)
 
      f(1) Masters of Pylos and Sphacteria, the Athenians had
      brought home the three hundred prisoners taken in the latter
      place in 425 B.C.; the Spartans had several times sent
      envoys to offer peace and to demand back both Pylos and the
      prisoners, but the Athenian pride had caused these proposals
      to be long refused.  Finally the prisoners had been given up
      in 423 B.C., but the War was continued nevertheless.
 
 TRYGAEUS Yes, that is quite the style our folk do talk in.
 
 HERMES So that I don't know whether you will ever see Peace again.
 
 TRYGAEUS Why, where has she gone to then?
 
 HERMES War has cast her into a deep pit.
 
 TRYGAEUS Where?
 
 HERMES Down there, at the very bottom. And you see what heaps of stones
 he has piled over the top, so that you should never pull her out again.
 
 TRYGAEUS Tell me, what is War preparing against us?
 
 HERMES All I know is that last evening he brought along a huge mortar.
 
 TRYGAEUS And what is he going to do with his mortar?
 
 HERMES He wants to pound up all the cities of Greece in it.... But I
 must say good-bye, for I think he is coming out; what an uproar he is
 making!
 
 TRYGAEUS Ah! great gods! let us seek safety; meseems I already hear the
 noise of this fearful war mortar.
 
 WAR (ENTERS, CARRYING A HUGE MORTAR) Oh! mortals, mortals, wretched
 mortals, how your jaws will snap!
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! divine Apollo! what a prodigious big mortar! Oh, what
 misery the very sight of War causes me! This then is the foe from whom I
 fly, who is so cruel, so formidable, so stalwart, so solid on his legs!
 
 WAR Oh! Prasiae!(1) thrice wretched, five times, aye, a thousand times
 wretched! for thou shalt be destroyed this day.
 
      f(1) An important town in Eastern Laconia on the Argolic
      gulf, celebrated for a temple where a festival was held
      annually in honour of Achilles. It had been taken and
      pillaged by the Athenians in the second year of the
      Peloponnesian War, 430 B.C.  As he utters this imprecation,
      War throws some leeks, the root-word of the name Praisae,
      into his mortar.
 
 TRYGAEUS This does not concern us over much; 'tis only so much the worse
 for the Laconians.
 
 WAR Oh! Megara! Megara! how utterly are you going to be ground up! what
 fine mincemeat(1) are you to be made into!
 
      f(1) War throws some garlic into his mortar as emblematical
      of the city of Megara, where it was grown in abundance.
 
 TRYGAEUS Alas! alas! what bitter tears there will be among the
 Megarians!(1)
 
      f(1) Because the smell of bruised garlic causes the eyes to
      water.
 
 WAR Oh, Sicily! you too must perish! Your wretched towns shall be
 grated like this cheese.(1) Now let us pour some Attic honey(2) into the
 mortar.
 
      f(1) He throws cheese into the mortar as emblematical of
      Sicily, on account of its rich pastures.
 
      f(2) Emblematical of Athens.  They honey of Mount Hymettus
      was famous.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! I beseech you! use some other honey; this kind is worth
 four obols; be careful, oh! be careful of our Attic honey.
 
 WAR Hi! Tumult, you slave there!
 
 TUMULT What do you want?
 
 WAR Out upon you! Standing there with folded arms! Take this cuff o' the
 head for your pains.
 
 TUMULT Oh! how it stings! Master, have you got garlic in your fist, I
 wonder?
 
 WAR Run and fetch me a pestle.
 
 TUMULT But we haven't got one; 'twas only yesterday we moved.
 
 WAR Go and fetch me one from Athens, and hurry, hurry!
 
 TUMULT Aye, I hasten there; if I return without one, I shall have no
 cause for laughing. (EXIT.)
 
 TRYGAEUS Ah! what is to become of us, wretched mortals that we are? See
 the danger that threatens if he returns with the pestle, for War will
 quietly amuse himself with pounding all the towns of Hellas to pieces.
 Ah! Bacchus! cause this herald of evil to perish on his road!
 
 WAR Well?
 
 TUMULT (WHO HAS RETURNED) Well, what?
 
 WAR You have brought back nothing?
 
 TUMULT Alas! the Athenians have lost their pestle--the tanner, who
 ground Greece to powder.(1)
 
      f(1) Cleon, who had lately fallen before Amphipolis, in 422
      B.C.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! Athene, venerable mistress! 'tis well for our city he is
 dead, and before he could serve us with this hash.
 
 WAR Then go and seek one at Sparta and have done with it!
 
 TUMULT Aye, aye, master!
 
 WAR Be back as quick as ever you can.
 
 TRYGAEUS (TO THE AUDIENCE) What is going to happen, friends? 'Tis the
 critical hour. Ah! if there is some initiate of Samothrace(1) among you,
 'tis surely the moment to wish this messenger some accident--some sprain
 or strain.
 
      f(1) An island in the Aegean Sea, on the coast of Thrace and
      opposite the mouth of the Hebrus; the Mysteries are said to
      have found their first home in this island, where the
      Cabirian gods were worshipped; this cult, shrouded in deep
      mystery to even the initiates themselves, has remained an
      almost insoluble problem for the modern critic.  It was said
      that the wishes of the initiates were always granted, and
      they were feared as to-day the 'jettatori' (spell-throwers,
      casters of the evil eye) in Sicily are feared.
 
 TUMULT (WHO RETURNS) Alas! alas! thrice again, alas!
 
 WAR What is it? Again you come back without it?
 
 TUMULT The Spartans too have lost their pestle.
 
 WAR How, varlet?
 
 TUMULT They had lent it to their allies in Thrace,(1) who have lost it
 for them.
 
      f(1) Brasidas perished in Thrace in the same battle as Cleon
      at Amphipolis, 422 B.C.
 
 TRYGAEUS Long life to you, Thracians! My hopes revive, pluck up courage,
 mortals!
 
 WAR Take all this stuff away; I am going in to make a pestle for myself.
 
 TRYGAEUS 'Tis now the time to sing as Datis did, as he abused himself
 at high noon, "Oh pleasure! oh enjoyment! oh delights!" 'Tis now, oh
 Greeks! the moment when freed of quarrels and fighting, we should rescue
 sweet Peace and draw her out of this pit, before some other pestle
 prevents us. Come, labourers, merchants, workmen, artisans, strangers,
 whether you be domiciled or not, islanders, come here, Greeks of all
 countries, come hurrying here with picks and levers and ropes! 'Tis the
 moment to drain a cup in honour of the Good Genius.
 
 CHORUS Come hither all! quick, hasten to the rescue! All peoples of
 Greece, now is the time or never, for you to help each other. You see
 yourselves freed from battles and all their horrors of bloodshed. The
 day, hateful to Lamachus(1), has come. Come then, what must be done?
 Give your orders, direct us, for I swear to work this day without
 ceasing, until with the help of our levers and our engines we have drawn
 back into light the greatest of all goddesses, her to whom the olive is
 so dear.
 
      f(1) An Athenian general as ambitious as he was brave.  In
      423 B.C. he had failed in an enterprise against Heracles, a
      storm having destroyed his fleet.  Since then he had
      distingued himself in several actions, and was destined,
      some years later, to share the command of the expedition to
      Sicily with Alcibiades and Nicias.
 
 TRYGAEUS Silence! if War should hear your shouts of joy he would bound
 forth from his retreat in fury.
 
 CHORUS Such a decree overwhelms us with joy; how different to the edict,
 which bade us muster with provisions for three days.(1)
 
      f(1) Meaning, to start a military expedition.
 
 TRYGAEUS Let us beware lest the cursed Cerberus(1) prevent us even from
 the nethermost hell from delivering the goddess by his furious howling,
 just as he did when on earth.
 
      f(1) Cleon.
 
 CHORUS Once we have hold of her, none in the world will be able to take
 her from us. Huzza! huzza!(1)
 
      f(1) The Chorus insist on the conventional choric dance.
 
 TRYGAEUS You will work my death if you don't subdue your shouts. War
 will come running out and trample everything beneath his feet.
 
 CHORUS Well then! LET him confound, let him trample, let him overturn
 everything! We cannot help giving vent to our joy.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! cruel fate! My friends! in the name of the gods,
 what possesses you? Your dancing will wreck the success of a fine
 undertaking.
 
 CHORUS 'Tis not I who want to dance; 'tis my legs that bound with
 delight.
 
 TRYGAEUS Enough, an you love me, cease your gambols.
 
 CHORUS There! 'Tis over.
 
 TRYGAEUS You say so, and nevertheless you go on.
 
 CHORUS Yet one more figure and 'tis done.
 
 TRYGAEUS Well, just this one; then you must dance no more.
 
 CHORUS No, no more dancing, if we can help you.
 
 TRYGAEUS But look, you are not stopping even now.
 
 CHORUS By Zeus, I am only throwing up my right leg, that's all.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, I grant you that, but pray, annoy me no further.
 
 CHORUS Ah! the left leg too will have its fling; well, 'tis but its
 right. I am so happy, so delighted at not having to carry my buckler
 any more. I sing and I laugh more than if I had cast my old age, as a
 serpent does its skin.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, 'tis not time for joy yet, for you are not sure of success.
 But when you have got the goddess, then rejoice, shout and laugh;
 thenceforward you will be able to sail or stay at home, to make love or
 sleep, to attend festivals and processions, to play at cottabos,(1) live
 like true Sybarites and to shout, Io, io!
 
      f(1) One of the most favourite games with the Greeks.  A
      stick was set upright in the ground and to this the beam of
      a balance was attached by its centre.  Two vessels were hung
      from the extremities of the beam so as to balance; beneath
      these two other and larger dishes were placed and filled
      with water, and in the middle of each a brazen figure,
      called Manes, was stood.  The game consisted in throwing
      drops of wine from an agreed distance into one or the other
      vessel, so that, dragged downwards by the weight of the
      liquor, it bumped against Manes.
 
 CHORUS Ah! God grant we may see the blessed day. I have suffered so
 much; have so oft slept with Phormio(1) on hard beds. You will no longer
 find me an acid, angry, hard judge as heretofore, but will find me
 turned indulgent and grown younger by twenty years through happiness. We
 have been killing ourselves long enough, tiring ourselves out with going
 to the Lyceum(2) and returning laden with spear and buckler.--But what
 can we do to please you? Come, speak; for 'tis a good Fate that has
 named you our leader.
 
      f(1) A general of austere habits; he disposed of all his
      property to pay the cost of a naval expedition, in which he
      beat the fleet of the foe off the promontory of Rhium in 429
      B.C.
 
      f(2) The Lyceum was a portico ornamented with paintings and
      surrounded with gardens, in which military exercises took
      place.
 
 TRYGAEUS How shall we set about removing these stones?
 
 HERMES Rash reprobate, what do you propose doing?
 
 TRYGAEUS Nothing bad, as Cillicon said.(1)
 
      f(1) A citizen of Miletus, who betrayed his country to the
      people of Pirene. When asked what he purposed, he replied,
      "Nothing bad," which expression had therefore passed into a
      proverb.
 
 HERMES You are undone, you wretch.
 
 TRYGAEUS Yes, if the lot had to decide my life, for Hermes would know
 how to turn the chance.(1)
 
      f(1) Hermes was the god of chance.
 
 HERMES You are lost, you are dead.
 
 TRYGAEUS On what day?
 
 HERMES This instant.
 
 TRYGAEUS But I have not provided myself with flour and cheese yet(1) to
 start for death.
 
      f(1) As the soldiers had to do when starting on an
      expedition.
 
 HERMES You ARE kneaded and ground already, I tell you.(1)
 
      f(1) That is, you are predicated.
 
 TRYGAEUS Hah! I have not yet tasted that gentle pleasure.
 
 HERMES Don't you know that Zeus has decreed death for him who is
 surprised exhuming Peace?
 
 TRYGAEUS What! must I really and truly die?
 
 HERMES You must.
 
 TRYGAEUS Well then, lend me three drachmae to buy a young pig; I wish to
 have myself initiated before I die.(1)
 
      f(1) The initiated were thought to enjoy greater happiness
      after death.
 
 HERMES Oh! Zeus, the Thunderer!(1)
 
      f(1) He summons Zeus to reveal Trygaeus' conspiracy.
 
 TRYGAEUS I adjure you in the name of the gods, master, don't denounce
 us!
 
 HERMES I may not, I cannot keep silent.
 
 TRYGAEUS In the name of the meats which I brought you so good-naturedly.
 
 HERMES Why, wretched man, Zeus will annihilate me, if I do not shout out
 at the top of my voice, to inform him what you are plotting.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh, no! don't shout, I beg you, dear little Hermes.... And what
 are you doing, comrades? You stand there as though you were stocks and
 stones. Wretched men, speak, entreat him at once; otherwise he will be
 shouting.
 
 CHORUS Oh! mighty Hermes! don't do it; no, don't do it! If ever you have
 eaten some young pig, sacrificed by us on your altars, with pleasure,
 may this offering not be without value in your sight to-day.
 
 TRYGAEUS Do you not hear them wheedling you, mighty god?
 
 CHORUS Be not pitiless toward our prayers; permit us to deliver
 the goddess. Oh! the most human, the most generous of the gods, be
 favourable toward us, if it be true that you detest the haughty crests
 and proud brows of Pisander;(1) we shall never cease, oh master,
 offering you sacred victims and solemn prayers.
 
      f(1) An Athenian captain who later had the recall of
      Alcibiades decreed by the Athenian people; in 'The Birds'
      Aristophanes represents him as a cowardly beggar.  He was
      the reactionary leader who established the Oligarchical
      Government of the Four Hundred, 411 B.C., after the failure
      of the Syracusan expedition.
 
 TRYGAEUS Have mercy, mercy, let yourself be touched by their words;
 never was your worship so dear to them as to-day.
 
 HERMES I' truth, never have you been greater thieves.(1)
 
      f(1) Among other attributes, Hermes was the god of thieves.
 
 TRYGAEUS I will reveal a great, a terrible conspiracy against the gods
 to you.
 
 HERMES Hah! speak and perchance I shall let myself be softened.
 
 TRYGAEUS Know then, that the Moon and that infamous Sun are plotting
 against you, and want to deliver Greece into the hands of the
 Barbarians.
 
 HERMES What for?
 
 TRYGAEUS Because it is to you that we sacrifice, whereas the barbarians
 worship them; hence they would like to see you destroyed, that they
 alone might receive the offerings.
 
 HERMES 'Tis then for this reason that these untrustworthy charioteers
 have for so long been defrauding us, one of them robbing us of daylight
 and the other nibbling away at the other's disk.(1)
 
      f(1) Alluding to the eclipses of the sun and the moon.
 
 TRYGAEUS Yes, certainly. So therefore, Hermes, my friend, help us with
 your whole heart to find and deliver the captive and we will celebrate
 the great Panathenaea(1) in your honour as well as all the festivals
 of the other gods; for Hermes shall be the Mysteries, the Dipolia, the
 Adonia; everywhere the towns, freed from their miseries, will sacrifice
 to Hermes the Liberator; you will be loaded with benefits of every kind,
 and to start with, I offer you this cup for libations as your first
 present.
 
      f(1) The Panathenaea were dedicated to Athene, the Mysteries
      to Demeter, the Dipolia to Zeus, the Adonia to Aphrodite and
      Adonis. Trygaeus promises Hermes that he shall be worshipped
      in the place of the other gods.
 
 HERMES Ah! how golden cups do influence me! Come, friends, get to work.
 To the pit quickly, pick in hand, and drag away the stones.
 
 CHORUS We go, but you, cleverest of all the gods, supervise our labours;
 tell us, good workman as you are, what we must do; we shall obey your
 orders with alacrity.
 
 TRYGAEUS Quick, reach me your cup, and let us preface our work by
 addressing prayers to the gods.
 
 HERMES Oh! sacred, sacred libations! Keep silence, oh! ye people! keep
 silence!
 
 TRYGAEUS Let us offer our libations and our prayers, so that this day
 may begin an era of unalloyed happiness for Greece and that he who has
 bravely pulled at the rope with us may never resume his buckler.
 
 CHORUS Aye, may we pass our lives in peace, caressing our mistresses and
 poking the fire.
 
 TRYGAEUS May he who would prefer the war, oh Dionysus, be ever drawing
 barbed arrows out of his elbows.
 
 HERMES If there be a citizen, greedy for military rank and honours who
 refuses, oh, divine Peace! to restore you to daylight, may he behave as
 cowardly as Cleonymus on the battlefield.
 
 TRYGAEUS If a lance-maker or a dealer in shields desires war for the
 sake of better trade, may he be taken by pirates and eat nothing but
 barley.
 
 CHORUS If some ambitious man does not help us, because he wants to
 become a General, or if a slave is plotting to pass over to the enemy,
 let his limbs be broken on the wheel, may he be beaten to death with
 rods! As for us, may Fortune favour us! Io! Paean, Io!
 
 TRYGAEUS Don't say Paean,(1) but simply, Io.
 
      f(1) The pun here cannot be kept.  The word (in Greek),
      Paean, resembles (that for) to strike; hence the word, as
      recalling the blows and wounds of the war, seems of ill omen
      to Trygaeus.
 
 HERMES Very well, then! Io! Io! I'll simply say, Io!
 
 TRYGAEUS To Hermes, the Graces, Hora, Aphrodite, Eros!
 
 CHORUS But not to Ares?
 
 TRYGAEUS No.
 
 CHORUS Nor doubtless to Enyalius?
 
 TRYGAEUS No.
 
 CHORUS Come, all strain at the ropes to tear away the stones. Pull!
 
 HERMES Heave away, heave, heave, oh!
 
 CHORUS Come, pull harder, harder.
 
 HERMES Heave away, heave, heave, oh!
 
 CHORUS Still harder, harder still.
 
 HERMES Heave away, heave! Heave away, heave, heave, oh!
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, come, there is no working together. Come! all pull at the
 same instant! you Boeotians are only pretending. Beware!
 
 HERMES Come, heave away, heave!
 
 CHORUS Hi! you two pull as well.
 
 TRYGAEUS Why, I am pulling, I am hanging on to the rope and straining
 till I am almost off my feet; I am working with all my might.
 
 CHORUS Why does not the work advance then?
 
 TRYGAEUS Lamachus, this is too bad! You are in the way, sitting there.
 We have no use for your Medusa's head, friend.(1)
 
      f(1) The device on his shield was a Gorgon's head.  (See
      'The Acharnians.')
 
 HERMES But hold, the Argives have not pulled the least bit; they have
 done nothing but laugh at us for our pains while they were getting gain
 with both hands.(1)
 
      f(1) Both Sparta and Athens had sought the alliance of the
      Argives; they had kept themselves strictly neutral and had
      received pay from both sides. But, the year after the
      production of 'The Wasps,' they openly joined Athens, had
      attacked Epidaurus and got cut to pieces by the Spartans.
 
 TRYGAEUS Ah! my dear sir, the Laconians at all events pull with vigour.
 
 CHORUS But look! only those among them who generally hold the
 plough-tail show any zeal,(1) while the armourers impede them in their
 efforts.
 
      f(1) These are the Spartan prisoners from Sphacteria, who
      were lying in goal at Athens.  They were chained fast to
      large beams of wood.
 
 HERMES And the Megarians too are doing nothing, yet look how they are
 pulling and showing their teeth like famished curs; The poor wretches
 are dying of hunger!(1)
 
      f(1) 'Twas want of force, not want of will.  They had
      suffered more than any other people from the war.  (See 'The
      Acharnians.')
 
 TRYGAEUS This won't do, friends. Come! all together! Everyone to the
 work and with a good heart for the business.
 
 HERMES Heave away, heave!
 
 TRYGAEUS Harder!
 
 HERMES Heave away, heave!
 
 TRYGAEUS Come on then, by heaven.
 
 HERMES Heave away, heave! Heave away, heave!
 
 CHORUS This will never do.
 
 TRYGAEUS Is it not a shame? some pull one way and others another. You,
 Argives there, beware of a thrashing!
 
 HERMES Come, put your strength into it.
 
 TRYGAEUS Heave away, heave!
 
 CHORUS There are many ill-disposed folk among us.
 
 TRYGAEUS Do you at least, who long for peace, pull heartily.
 
 CHORUS But there are some who prevent us.
 
 HERMES Off to the Devil with you, Megarians! The goddess hates you. She
 recollects that you were the first to rub her the wrong way. Athenians,
 you are not well placed for pulling. There you are too busy with
 law-suits; if you really want to free the goddess, get down a little
 towards the sea.(1)
 
      f(1) Meaning, look chiefly to your fleet.  This was the
      counsel that Themistocles frequently gave the Athenians.
 
 CHORUS Come, friends, none but husbandmen on the rope.
 
 HERMES Ah! that will do ever so much better.
 
 CHORUS He says the thing is going well. Come, all of you, together and
 with a will.
 
 TRYGAEUS 'Tis the husbandmen who are doing all the work.
 
 CHORUS Come then, come, and all together! Hah! hah! at last there is
 some unanimity in the work. Don't let us give up, let us redouble our
 efforts. There! now we have it! Come then, all together! Heave away,
 heave! Heave away, heave! Heave away, heave! Heave away, heave! Heave
 away, heave! All together! (PEACE IS DRAWN OUT OF THE PIT.)
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! venerated goddess, who givest us our grapes, where am I to
 find the ten-thousand-gallon words(1) wherewith to greet thee? I have
 none such at home. Oh! hail to thee, Opora,(2) and thee, Theoria!(3) How
 beautiful is thy face! How sweet thy breath! What gentle fragrance comes
 from thy bosom, gentle as freedom from military duty, as the most dainty
 perfumes!
 
      f(1) A metaphor referring to the abundant vintages that
      peace would assure.
 
      f(2) The goddess of fruits.
 
      f(3) Aristophanes personifies under this name the sacred
      ceremonies in general which peace would allow to be
      celebrated with due pomp. Opora and Theoria come on the
      stage in the wake of Peace, clothed and decked out as
      courtesans.
 
 HERMES Is it then a smell like a soldier's knapsack?
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! hateful soldier! your hideous satchel makes me sick! it
 stinks like the belching of onions, whereas this lovable deity has the
 odour of sweet fruits, of festivals, of the Dionysia, of the harmony of
 flutes, of the comic poets, of the verses of Sophocles, of the phrases
 of Euripides...
 
 HERMES That's a foul calumny, you wretch! She detests that framer of
 subtleties and quibbles.
 
 TRYGAEUS ...of ivy, of straining-bags for wine, of bleating ewes, of
 provision-laden women hastening to the kitchen, of the tipsy servant
 wench, of the upturned wine-jar, and of a whole heap of other good
 things.
 
 HERMES Then look how the reconciled towns chat pleasantly together, how
 they laugh; and yet they are all cruelly mishandled; their wounds are
 bleeding still.
 
 TRYGAEUS But let us also scan the mien of the spectators; we shall thus
 find out the trade of each.
 
 HERMES Ah! good gods! Look at that poor crest-maker, tearing at his
 hair,(1) and at that pike-maker, who has just broken wind in yon
 sword-cutler's face.
 
      f(1) Aristophanes has already shown us the husbandmen and
      workers in peaceful trades pulling at the rope the extricate
      Peace, while the armourers hindered them by pulling the
      other way.
 
 TRYGAEUS And do you see with what pleasure this sickle-maker is making
 long noses at the spear-maker?
 
 HERMES Now ask the husbandmen to be off.
 
 TRYGAEUS Listen, good folk! Let the husbandmen take their farming tools
 and return to their fields as quick as possible, but without either
 sword, spear or javelin. All is as quiet as if Peace had been reigning
 for a century. Come, let everyone go till the earth, singing the Paean.
 
 CHORUS Oh, thou, whom men of standing desired and who art good to
 husbandmen, I have gazed upon thee with delight; and now I go to greet
 my vines, to caress after so long an absence the fig trees I planted in
 my youth.
 
 TRYGAEUS Friends, let us first adore the goddess, who has delivered us
 from crests and Gorgons;(1) then let us hurry to our farms, having first
 bought a nice little piece of salt fish to eat in the fields.
 
      f(1) An allusion to Lamachus' shield.
 
 HERMES By Posidon! what a fine crew they make and dense as the crust of
 a cake; they are as nimble as guests on their way to a feast.
 
 TRYGAEUS See, how their iron spades glitter and how beautifully their
 three-pronged mattocks glisten in the sun! How regularly they align the
 plants! I also burn myself to go into the country and to turn over the
 earth I have so long neglected.--Friends, do you remember the happy life
 that Peace afforded us formerly; can you recall the splendid baskets
 of figs, both fresh and dried, the myrtles, the sweet wine, the violets
 blooming near the spring, and the olives, for which we have wept so
 much? Worship, adore the goddess for restoring you so many blessings.
 
 CHORUS Hail! hail! thou beloved divinity! thy return overwhelms us with
 joy. When far from thee, my ardent wish to see my fields again made me
 pine with regret. From thee came all blessings. Oh! much desired Peace!
 thou art the sole support of those who spend their lives tilling the
 earth. Under thy rule we had a thousand delicious enjoyments at our
 beck; thou wert the husbandman's wheaten cake and his safeguard. So that
 our vineyards, our young fig-tree woods and all our plantations hail
 thee with delight and smile at thy coming. But where was she then,
 I wonder, all the long time she spent away from us? Hermes, thou
 benevolent god, tell us!
 
 HERMES Wise husbandmen, hearken to my words, if you want to know why
 she was lost to you. The start of our misfortunes was the exile of
 Phidias;(1) Pericles feared he might share his ill-luck, he mistrusted
 your peevish nature and, to prevent all danger to himself, he threw out
 that little spark, the Megarian decree,(2) set the city aflame, and blew
 up the conflagration with a hurricane of war, so that the smoke drew
 tears from all Greeks both here and over there. At the very outset of
 this fire our vines were a-crackle, our casks knocked together;(3)
 it was beyond the power of any man to stop the disaster, and Peace
 disappeared.
 
      f(1) Having been commissioned to execute a statue of Athene,
      Phidias was accused of having stolen part of the gold given
      him out of the public treasury for its decoration.  Rewarded
      for his work by calumny and banishment, he resolved to make
      a finer statue than his Athene, and executed one for the
      temple of Elis, that of the Olympian Zeus, which was
      considered one of the wonders of the world.
 
      f(2) He had issued a decree, which forbade the admission of
      any Megarian on Attic soil, and also all trade with that
      people.  The Megarians, who obtained all their provisions
      from Athens, were thus almost reduced to starvation.
 
      f(3) That is, the vineyards were ravaged from the very
      outset of the war, and this increased the animosity.
 
 TRYGAEUS That, by Apollo! is what no one ever told me; I could not think
 what connection there could be between Phidias and Peace.
 
 CHORUS Nor I; I know it now. This accounts for her beauty, if she is
 related to him. There are so many things that escape us.
 
 HERMES Then, when the towns subject to you saw that you were angered one
 against the other and were showing each other your teeth like dogs, they
 hatched a thousand plots to pay you no more dues and gained over
 the chief citizens of Sparta at the price of gold. They, being as
 shamelessly greedy as they were faithless in diplomacy, chased off Peace
 with ignominy to let loose War. Though this was profitable to them,
 'twas the ruin of the husbandmen, who were innocent of all blame; for,
 in revenge, your galleys went out to devour their figs.
 
 TRYGAEUS And 'twas with justice too; did they not break down my black
 fig tree, which I had planted and dunged with my own hands?
 
 CHORUS Yes, by Zeus! yes, 'twas well done; the wretches broke a chest
 for me with stones, which held six medimni of corn.
 
 HERMES Then the rural labourers flocked into the city(1) and let
 themselves be bought over like the others. Not having even a grape-stone
 to munch and longing after their figs, they looked towards the
 orators.(2) These well knew that the poor were driven to extremity and
 lacked even bread; but they nevertheless drove away the Goddess, each
 time she reappeared in answer to the wish of the country, with their
 loud shrieks that were as sharp as pitchforks; furthermore, they
 attacked the well-filled purses of the richest among our allies on the
 pretence that they belonged to Brasidas' party.(3) And then you would
 tear the poor accused wretch to pieces with your teeth; for the city,
 all pale with hunger and cowed with terror, gladly snapped up any
 calumny that was thrown it to devour. So the strangers, seeing what
 terrible blows the informers dealt, sealed their lips with gold. They
 grew rich, while you, alas! you could only see that Greece was going to
 ruin. 'Twas the tanner who was the author of all this woe.(4)
 
      f(1) Driven in from the country parts by the Lacedaemonian
      invaders.
 
      f(2) The demagogues, who distributed the slender dole given
      to the poor, and by that means exercised undue power over
      them.
 
      f(3) Meaning, the side of the Spartans.
 
      f(4) Cleon.
 
 TRYGAEUS Enough said, Hermes, leave that man in Hades, whither he has
 gone; he no longer belongs to us, but rather to yourself.(1) That he
 was a cheat, a braggart, a calumniator when alive, why, nothing could be
 truer; but anything you might say now would be an insult to one of your
 own folk. Oh! venerated Goddess! why art thou silent?
 
      f(1) It was Hermes who conducted the souls of the dead down
      to the lower regions.
 
 HERMES And how could she speak to the spectators? She is too angry at
 all that they have made her suffer.
 
 TRYGAEUS At least let her speak a little to you, Hermes.
 
 HERMES Tell me, my dear, what are your feelings with regard to them?
 Come, you relentless foe of all bucklers, speak; I am listening to you.
 (PEACE WHISPERS INTO HERMES' EAR.) Is that your grievance against them?
 Yes, yes, I understand. Hearken, you folk, this is her complaint. She
 says, that after the affair of Pylos(1) she came to you unbidden to
 bring you a basket full of truces and that you thrice repulsed her by
 your votes in the assembly.
 
      f(1) The Spartans had thrice offered to make peace after the
      Pylos disaster.
 
 TRYGAEUS Yes, we did wrong, but forgive us, for our mind was then
 entirely absorbed in leather.(1)
 
      f(1) i.e. dominated by Cleon.
 
 HERMES Listen again to what she has just asked me. Who was her greatest
 foe here? and furthermore, had she a friend who exerted himself to put
 an end to the fighting?
 
 TRYGAEUS Her most devoted friend was Cleonymus; it is undisputed.
 
 HERMES How then did Cleonymus behave in fights?
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! the bravest of warriors! Only he was not born of the father
 he claims; he showed it quick enough in the army by throwing away his
 weapons.(1)
 
      f(1) There is a pun here that cannot be rendered between
      (the Greek for) 'one who throws away his weapons' and 'a
      supposititious child.'
 
 HERMES There is yet another question she has just put to me. Who rules
 now in the rostrum?
 
 TRYGAEUS 'Tis Hyperbolus, who now holds empire on the Pnyx. (TO PEACE)
 What now? you turn away your head!
 
 HERMES She is vexed, that the people should give themselves a wretch of
 that kind for their chief.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! we shall not employ him again; but the people, seeing
 themselves without a leader, took him haphazard, just as a man, who is
 naked, springs upon the first cloak he sees.
 
 HERMES She asks, what will be the result of such a choice of the city?
 
 TRYGAEUS We shall be more far-seeing in consequence.
 
 HERMES And why?
 
 TRYGAEUS Because he is a lamp-maker. Formerly we only directed our
 business by groping in the dark; now we shall only deliberate by
 lamplight.
 
 HERMES Oh! oh! what questions she does order me to put to you!
 
 TRYGAEUS What are they?
 
 HERMES She wants to have news of a whole heap of old-fashioned things
 she left here. First of all, how is Sophocles?
 
 TRYGAEUS Very well, but something very strange has happened to him.
 
 HERMES What then?
 
 TRYGAEUS He has turned from Sophocles into Simonides.(1)
 
      f(1) Simonides was very avaricious, and sold his pen to the
      highest bidder. It seems that Sophocles had also started
      writing for gain.
 
 HERMES Into Simonides? How so?
 
 TRYGAEUS Because, though old and broken-down as he is, he would put to
 sea on a hurdle to gain an obolus.(1)
 
      f(1) i.e. he would recoil from no risk to turn an honest
      penny.
 
 HERMES And wise Cratinus,(1) is he still alive?
 
      f(1) A comic poet as well known for his love of wine as for
      his writings; he died in 431 B.C., the first year of the
      war, at the age of ninety-seven.
 
 TRYGAEUS He died about the time of the Laconian invasion.
 
 HERMES How?
 
 TRYGAEUS Of a swoon. He could not bear the shock of seeing one of his
 casks full of wine broken. Ah! what a number of other misfortunes our
 city has suffered! So, dearest mistress, nothing can now separate us
 from thee.
 
 HERMES If that be so, receive Opora here for a wife; take her to the
 country, live with her, and grow fine grapes together.(1)
 
      f(1) Opora was the goddess of fruits.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, my dear friend, come and accept my kisses. Tell me,
 Hermes, my master, do you think it would hurt me to love her a little,
 after so long an abstinence?
 
 HERMES No, not if you swallow a potion of penny-royal afterwards.(1) But
 hasten to lead Theoria(2) to the Senate; 'twas there she lodged before.
 
      f(1) The scholiast says fruit may be eaten with impunity in
      great quantities if care is taken to drink a decoction of
      this herb afterwards.
 
      f(2) Theoria is confided to the care of the Senate, because
      it was this body who named the deputies appointed to go and
      consult the oracles beyond the Attic borders to be present
      at feats and games.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! fortunate Senate! Thanks to Theoria, what soups you will
 swallow for the space of three days!(1) how you will devour meats and
 cooked tripe! Come, farewell, friend Hermes!
 
      f(1) The great festivals, e.g. the Dionysia, lasted three
      days.  Those in honour of the return of Peace, which was so
      much desired, could not last a shorter time.
 
 HERMES And to you also, my dear sir, may you have much happiness, and
 don't forget me.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, beetle, home, home, and let us fly on a swift wing.
 
 HERMES Oh! he is no longer here.
 
 TRYGAEUS Where has he gone to then?
 
 HERMES He is harnessed to the chariot of Zeus and bears the thunder
 bolts.
 
 TRYGAEUS But where will the poor wretch get his food?
 
 HERMES He will eat Ganymede's ambrosia.
 
 TRYGAEUS Very well then, but how am I going to descend?
 
 HERMES Oh! never fear, there is nothing simpler; place yourself beside
 the goddess.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, my pretty maidens, follow me quickly; there are plenty of
 folk awaiting you with ready weapons.
 
 CHORUS Farewell and good luck be yours! Let us begin by handing over all
 this gear to the care of our servants, for no place is less safe than a
 theatre; there is always a crowd of thieves prowling around it, seeking
 to find some mischief to do. Come, keep a good watch over all this.
 As for ourselves, let us explain to the spectators what we have in our
 minds, the purpose of our play.
 
 Undoubtedly the comic poet who mounted the stage to praise himself
 in the parabasis would deserve to be handed over to the sticks of the
 beadles. Nevertheless, oh Muse, if it be right to esteem the most honest
 and illustrious of our comic writers at his proper value, permit our
 poet to say that he thinks he has deserved a glorious renown. First of
 all, 'tis he who has compelled his rivals no longer to scoff at rags
 or to war with lice; and as for those Heracles, always chewing and ever
 hungry, those poltroons and cheats who allow themselves to be beaten
 at will, he was the first to cover them with ridicule and to chase them
 from the stage;(1) he has also dismissed that slave, whom one never
 failed to set a-weeping before you, so that his comrade might have
 the chance of jeering at his stripes and might ask, "Wretch, what has
 happened to your hide? Has the lash rained an army of its thongs on
 you and laid your back waste?" After having delivered us from all these
 wearisome ineptitudes and these low buffooneries, he has built up for
 us a great art, like a palace with high towers, constructed of fine
 phrases, great thoughts and of jokes not common on the streets.
 Moreover 'tis not obscure private persons or women that he stages in his
 comedies; but, bold as Heracles, 'tis the very greatest whom he attacks,
 undeterred by the fetid stink of leather or the threats of hearts of
 mud. He has the right to say, "I am the first ever dared to go straight
 for that beast with the sharp teeth and the terrible eyes that flashed
 lambent fire like those of Cynna,(2) surrounded by a hundred lewd
 flatterers, who spittle-licked him to his heart's content; it had a
 voice like a roaring torrent, the stench of a seal, a foul Lamia's
 testicles and the rump of a camel."(3)
 
 I did not recoil in horror at the sight of such a monster, but fought
 him relentlessly to win your deliverance and that of the Islanders. Such
 are the services which should be graven in your recollection and entitle
 me to your thanks. Yet I have not been seen frequenting the wrestling
 school intoxicated with success and trying to tamper with young boys;(4)
 but I took all my theatrical gear(5) and returned straight home. I
 pained folk but little and caused them much amusement; my conscience
 rebuked me for nothing. Hence both grown men and youths should be on my
 side and I likewise invite the bald(6) to give me their votes; for, if I
 triumph, everyone will say, both at table and at festivals, "Carry this
 to the bald man, give these cakes to the bald one, do not grudge the
 poet whose talent shines as bright as his own bare skull the share he
 deserves."
 
 Oh, Muse! drive the War far from our city and come to preside over our
 dances, if you love me; come and celebrate the nuptials of the gods, the
 banquets of us mortals and the festivals of the fortunate; these are the
 themes that inspire thy most poetic songs. And should Carcinus come to
 beg thee for admission with his sons to thy chorus, refuse all traffic
 with them; remember they are but gelded birds, stork-necked dancers,
 mannikins about as tall as a pat of goat dung, in fact machine-made
 poets.(7) Contrary to all expectation, the father has at last managed
 to finish a piece, but he owns himself that a cat strangled it one fine
 evening.(8)
 
 Such are the songs(9) with which the Muse with the glorious hair
 inspires the able poet and which enchant the assembled populace, when
 the spring swallow twitters beneath the foliage;(10) but the god spare
 us from the chorus of Morsimus and that of Melanthius!(11) Oh! what a
 bitter discordancy grated upon my ears that day when the tragic
 chorus was directed by this same Melanthius and his brother, these two
 Gorgons,(12) these two harpies, the plague of the seas, whose gluttonous
 bellies devour the entire race of fishes, these followers of old women,
 these goats with their stinking arm-pits. Oh! Muse, spit upon them
 abundantly and keep the feast gaily with me.
 
      f(1) In spite of what he says, Aristophanes has not always
      disdained this sort of low comedy--for instance, his
      Heracles in 'The Birds.'
 
      f(2) A celebrated Athenian courtesan of Aristophanes' day.
 
      f(3) Cleon.  These four verses are here repeated from the
      parabasis of 'The Wasps,' produced 423 B.C., the year before
      this play.
 
      f(4) Shafts aimed at certain poets, who used their renown as
      a means of seducing young men to grant them pederastic
      favours.
 
      f(5) The poet supplied everything needful for the production
      of his piece--vases, dresses, masks, etc.
 
      f(6) Aristophanes was bald himself, it would seem.
 
      f(7) Carcinus and his three sons were both poets and
      dancers.  (See the closing scene of 'The Wasps.') Perhaps
      relying little on the literary value of their work, it seems
      that they sought to please the people by the magnificence of
      its staging.
 
      f(8) He had written a piece called 'The Mice,' which he
      succeeded with great difficulty in getting played, but it
      met with no success.
 
      f(9) This passage really follows on the invocation, "Oh,
      Muse! drive the War," etc., from which indeed it is only
      divided by the interpolated criticism aimed at Carcinus.
 
      f(10) The scholiast informs us that these verses are
      borrowed from a poet of the sixth century B.C.
 
      f(11) Sons of Philocles, of the family of Aeschylus, tragic
      writers, derided by Aristophanes as bad poets and notorious
      gluttons.
 
      f(12) The Gorgons were represented with great teeth, and
      therefore the same name was given to gluttons.  The Harpies,
      to whom the two voracious poets are also compared, were
      monsters with the face of a woman, the body of a vulture and
      hooked beak and claws.
 
 TRYGAEUS Ah! 'tis a rough job getting to the gods! my legs are as good
 as broken through it. How small you were, to be sure, when seen from
 heaven! you had all the appearance too of being great rascals; but seen
 close, you look even worse.
 
 SERVANT Is that you, master?
 
 TRYGAEUS So I've been told.
 
 SERVANT What has happened to you?
 
 TRYGAEUS My legs pain me; it is such a plaguey long journey.
 
 SERVANT Oh! tell me...
 
 TRYGAEUS What?
 
 SERVANT Did you see any other man besides yourself strolling about in
 heaven?
 
 TRYGAEUS No, only the souls of two or three dithyrambic poets.
 
 SERVANT What were they doing up there?
 
 TRYGAEUS They were seeking to catch some lyric exordia as they flew by
 immersed in the billows of the air.
 
 SERVANT Is it true, what they tell us, that men are turned into stars
 after death?
 
 TRYGAEUS Quite true.
 
 SERVANT Then who is that star I see over yonder?
 
 TRYGAEUS That is Ion of Chios,(1) the author of an ode beginning
 "Morning"; as soon as ever he got to heaven, they called him "the
 Morning Star."
 
      f(1) A tragic and dithyrambic poet, who had written many
      pieces, which had met with great success at Athens.
 
 SERVANT And those stars like sparks, that plough up the air as they dart
 across the sky?(1)
 
      f(1) The shooting stars.
 
 TRYGAEUS They are the rich leaving the feast with a lantern and a light
 inside it.--But hurry up, show this young girl into my house, clean out
 the bath, heat some water and prepare the nuptial couch for herself and
 me. When 'tis done, come back here; meanwhile I am off to present this
 one to the Senate.
 
 SERVANT But where then did you get these pretty chattels?
 
 TRYGAEUS Where? why in heaven.
 
 SERVANT I would not give more than an obolus for gods who have got to
 keeping brothels like us mere mortals.
 
 TRYGAEUS They are not all so, but there are some up there too who live
 by this trade.
 
 SERVANT Come, that's rich! But I bethink me, shall I give her something
 to eat?
 
 TRYGAEUS No, for she would neither touch bread nor cake; she is used to
 licking ambrosia at the table of the gods.
 
 SERVANT Well, we can give her something to lick down here too.
 
 CHORUS Here is a truly happy old man, as far as I can judge.
 
 TRYGAEUS Ah! but what shall I be, when you see me presently dressed for
 the wedding?
 
 CHORUS Made young again by love and scented with perfumes, your lot will
 be one we all shall envy.
 
 TRYGAEUS And when I lie beside her and caress her bosoms?
 
 CHORUS Oh! then you will be happier than those spinning-tops who call
 Carcinus their father.(1)
 
      f(1) It has already been mentioned that the sons of Carcinus
      were dancers.
 
 TRYGAEUS And I well deserve it; have I not bestridden a beetle to save
 the Greeks, who now, thanks to me, can make love at their ease and sleep
 peacefully on their farms?
 
 SERVANT The girl has quitted the bath; she is charming from head to
 foot, both belly and buttocks; the cake is baked and they are kneading
 the sesame-biscuit;(1) nothing is lacking but the bridegroom's virility.
 
      f(1) It was customary at weddings, says Menander, to give
      the bride a sesame-caked as an emblem of fruitfulness,
      because sesame is the most fruitful of all seeds.
 
 TRYGAEUS Let us first hasten to lodge Theoria in the hands of the
 Senate.
 
 SERVANT But tell me, who is this woman?
 
 TRYGAEUS Why, 'tis Theoria, with whom we used formerly to go to
 Brauron,(1) to get tipsy and frolic. I had the greatest trouble to get
 hold of her.
 
      f(1) An Attic town on the east coast, noted for a
      magnificent temple, in which stood the statue of Artemis,
      which Orestes and Iphigenia had brought from the Tauric
      Chersonese and also for the Brauronia, festivals that were
      celebrated every four years in honour of the goddess. This
      was one of the festivals which the Attic people kept with
      the greatest pomp, and was an occasion for debauchery.
 
 SERVANT Ah! you charmer! what pleasure your pretty bottom will afford me
 every four years!
 
 TRYGAEUS Let us see, who of you is steady enough to be trusted by the
 Senate with the care of this charming wench? Hi! you, friend! what are
 you drawing there?
 
 SERVANT I am drawing the plan of the tent I wish to erect for myself on
 the isthmus.(1)
 
      f(1) Competitors intending to take part in the great
      Olympic, Isthmian and other games took with them a tent,
      wherein to camp in the open.  Further, there is an obscene
      allusion which the actor indicates by a gesture.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, who wishes to take the charge of her? No one? Come,
 Theoria, I am going to lead you into the midst of the spectators and
 confide you to their care.
 
 SERVANT Ah! there is one who makes a sign to you.
 
 TRYGAEUS Who is it?
 
 SERVANT 'Tis Ariphrades. He wishes to take her home at once.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, I'm sure he shan't. He would soon have her done for,
 absorbing all her life-force. Come, Theoria, put down all this gear.(1)
 
 Senate, Prytanes, look upon Theoria and see what precious blessings
 I place in your hands. Hasten to raise its limbs and to immolate the
 victim. Admire the fine chimney,(2) it is quite black with smoke, for
 'twas here that the Senate did their cooking before the war. Now that
 you have found Theoria again, you can start the most charming games from
 to-morrow, wrestling with her on the ground, either on your hands and
 feet, or you can lay her on her side, or stand before her with bent
 knees, or, well rubbed with oil, you can boldly enter the lists, as
 in the Pancratium, belabouring your foe with blows from your fist or
 otherwise. The next day you will celebrate equestrian games, in which
 the riders will ride side by side, or else the chariot teams, thrown one
 on top of another, panting and whinnying, will roll and knock against
 each other on the ground, while other rivals, thrown out of their
 seats, will fall before reaching the goal, utterly exhausted by their
 efforts.--Come, Prytanes, take Theoria. Oh! look how graciously yonder
 fellow has received her; you would not have been in such a hurry to
 introduce her to the Senate, if nothing were coming to you through
 it;(3) you would not have failed to plead some holiday as an excuse.
 
      f(1) Doubtless the vessels and other sacrificial objects and
      implements with which Theoria was laden in her character of
      presiding deity at religious ceremonies.
 
      f(2) Where the meats were cooked after sacrifice; this also
      marks the secondary obscene sense he means to convey.
 
      f(3) One of the offices of the Prytanes was to introduce
      those who asked admission to the Senate, but it would seem
      that none could obtain this favour without payment.  Without
      this, a thousand excuses would be made; for instance, it
      would be a public holiday, and consequently the Senate could
      receive no one.  As there was some festival nearly every
      day, he whose purse would not open might have to wait a very
      long while.
 
 CHORUS Such a man as you assures the happiness of all his
 fellow-citizens.
 
 TRYGAEUS When you are gathering your vintages you will prize me even
 better.
 
 CHORUS E'en from to-day we hail you as the deliverer of mankind.
 
 TRYGAEUS Wait until you have drunk a beaker of new wine, before you
 appraise my true merits.
 
 CHORUS Excepting the gods, there is none greater than yourself, and that
 will ever be our opinion.
 
 TRYGAEUS Yea, Trygaeus of Athmonia has deserved well of you, he has
 freed both husbandman and craftsman from the most cruel ills; he has
 vanquished Hyberbolus.
 
 SERVANT Well then, what must be done now?
 
 TRYGAEUS You must offer pots of green-stuff to the goddess to consecrate
 her altars.
 
 SERVANT Pots of green-stuff(1) as we do to poor Hermes--and even he
 thinks the fare but mean?
 
      f(1) This was only offered to lesser deities.
 
 TRYGAEUS What will you offer them? A fatted bull?
 
 SERVANT Oh no! I don't want to start bellowing the battle-cry.(1)
 
      f(1) In the Greek we have a play upon the similarity of the
      words (for) a bull, and to shout the battle-cry.
 
 TRYGAEUS A great fat swine then?
 
 SERVANT No, no.
 
 TRYGAEUS Why not?
 
 SERVANT We don't want any of the swinishness of Theagenes.(1)
 
      f(1) Theagenes, of the Piraeus, a hideous, coarse, debauched
      and evil-living character of the day.
 
 TRYGAEUS What other victim do you prefer then?
 
 SERVANT A sheep.
 
 TRYGAEUS A sheep?
 
 SERVANT Yes.
 
 TRYGAEUS But you must give the word the Ionic form.
 
 SERVANT Purposely. So that if anyone in the assembly says, "We must go
 to war," all may start bleating in alarm, "Oi, oi."(1)
 
      f(1) That is the vocative of the Ionic form of the word; in
      Attic Greek it is contracted throughout.
 
 TRYGAEUS A brilliant idea.
 
 SERVANT And we shall all be lambs one toward the other, yea, and milder
 still toward the allies.
 
 TRYGAEUS Then go for the sheep and haste to bring it back with you; I
 will prepare the altar for the sacrifice.
 
 CHORUS How everything succeeds to our wish, when the gods are willing
 and Fortune favours us! how opportunely everything falls out.
 
 TRYGAEUS Nothing could be truer, for look! here stands the altar all
 ready at my door.
 
 CHORUS Hurry, hurry, for the winds are fickle; make haste, while the
 divine will is set on stopping this cruel war and is showering on us the
 most striking benefits.
 
 TRYGAEUS Here is the basket of barley-seed mingled with salt, the
 chaplet and the sacred knife; and there is the fire; so we are only
 waiting for the sheep.
 
 CHORUS Hasten, hasten, for, if Chaeris sees you, he will come without
 bidding, he and his flute; and when you see him puffing and panting and
 out of breath, you will have to give him something.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, seize the basket and take the lustral water and hurry to
 circle round the altar to the right.
 
 SERVANT There! 'tis done. What is your next bidding?
 
 TRYGAEUS Hold! I take this fire-brand first and plunge it into the
 water.
 
 SERVANT Be quick! be quick! Sprinkle the altar.
 
 TRYGAEUS Give me some barley-seed, purify yourself and hand me the
 basin; then scatter the rest of the barley among the audience.
 
 SERVANT 'Tis done.
 
 TRYGAEUS You have thrown it?
 
 SERVANT Yes, by Hermes! and all the spectators have had their share.
 
 TRYGAEUS But not the women?
 
 SERVANT Oh! their husbands will give it them this evening.(1)
 
      f(1) An obscene jest.
 
 TRYGAEUS Let us pray! Who is here? Are there any good men?(1)
 
      f(1) Before sacrificing, the officiating person asked, "Who
      is here?" and those present answered, "Many good men."
 
 SERVANT Come, give, so that I may sprinkle these. Faith! they are indeed
 good, brave men.
 
 TRYGAEUS You believe so?
 
 SERVANT I am sure, and the proof of it is that we have flooded them with
 lustral water and they have not budged an inch.(1)
 
      f(1) The actors forming the chorus are meant here.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, then, to prayers; to prayers, quick!--Oh! Peace, mighty
 queen, venerated goddess, thou, who presidest over choruses and at
 nuptials, deign to accept the sacrifices we offer thee.
 
 SERVANT Receive it, greatly honoured mistress, and behave not like the
 coquettes, who half open the door to entice the gallants, draw back when
 they are stared at, to return once more if a man passes on. But do not
 act like this to us.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, but like an honest woman, show thyself to thy worshippers,
 who are worn with regretting thee all these thirteen years. Hush the
 noise of battle, be a true Lysimacha to us.(1) Put an end to this
 tittle-tattle, to this idle babble, that set us defying one another.
 Cause the Greeks once more to taste the pleasant beverage of friendship
 and temper all hearts with the gentle feeling of forgiveness. Make
 excellent commodities flow to our markets, fine heads of garlic, early
 cucumbers, apples, pomegranates and nice little cloaks for the slaves;
 make them bring geese, ducks, pigeons and larks from Boeotia and baskets
 of eels from Lake Copais; we shall all rush to buy them, disputing their
 possession with Morychus, Teleas, Glaucetes and every other glutton.
 Melanthius(2) will arrive on the market last of all; 'twill be, "no more
 eels, all sold!" and then he'll start a-groaning and exclaiming as in
 his monologue of Medea,(3) "I am dying, I am dying! Alas! I have let
 those hidden in the beet escape me!"(4) And won't we laugh? These are
 the wishes, mighty goddess, which we pray thee to grant.
 
      f(1) Lysimacha is derived from (the Greek for) put an end
      to, and (the Greek for) fight.
 
      f(2) A tragic poet, reputed a great gourmand.
 
      f(3) A tragedy by Melanthius.
 
      f(4) Eels were cooked with beet.--A parody on some verses in
      the 'Medea' of Melanthius.
 
 SERVANT Take the knife and slaughter the sheep like a finished cook.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, the goddess does not wish it.(1)
 
      f(1) As a matter of fact, the Sicyonians, who celebrated the
      festival of Peace on the sixteenth day of the month of
      Hecatombeon (July), spilled no blood upon her altar.
 
 SERVANT And why not?
 
 TRYGAEUS Blood cannot please Peace, so let us spill none upon her altar.
 Therefore go and sacrifice the sheep in the house, cut off the legs and
 bring them here; thus the carcase will be saved for the choregus.
 
 CHORUS You, who remain here, get chopped wood and everything needed for
 the sacrifice ready.
 
 TRYGAEUS Don't I look like a diviner preparing his mystic fire?
 
 CHORUS Undoubtedly. Will anything that it behooves a wise man to
 know escape you? Don't you know all that a man should know, who is
 distinguished for his wisdom and inventive daring?
 
 TRYGAEUS There! the wood catches. Its smoke blinds poor Stilbides.(1) I
 am now going to bring the table and thus be my own slave.
 
      f(1) A celebrated diviner, who had accompanied the Athenians
      on their expedition to Sicily.  Thus the War was necessary
      to make his calling pay and the smoke of the sacrifice
      offered to Peace must therefore be unpleasant to him.
 
 CHORUS You have braved a thousand dangers to save your sacred town. All
 honour to you! your glory will be ever envied.
 
 SERVANT Hold! Here are the legs, place them upon the altar. For myself,
 I mean to go back to the entrails and the cakes.
 
 TRYGAEUS I'll see to those; I want you here.
 
 SERVANT Well then, here I am. Do you think I have been long?
 
 TRYGAEUS Just get this roasted. Ah! who is this man, crowned with
 laurel, who is coming to me?
 
 SERVANT He has a self-important look; is he some diviner?
 
 TRYGAEUS No, I' faith! 'tis Hierocles.
 
 SERVANT Ah! that oracle-monger from Oreus.(1) What is he going to tell
 us?
 
      f(1) A town in Euboea on the channel which separated that
      island from Thessaly.
 
 TRYGAEUS Evidently he is coming to oppose the peace.
 
 SERVANT No, 'tis the odour of the fat that attracts him.
 
 TRYGAEUS Let us appear not to see him.
 
 SERVANT Very well.
 
 HIEROCLES What sacrifice is this? to what god are you offering it?
 
 TRYGAEUS (TO THE SERVANT) Silence!--(ALOUD.) Look after the roasting and
 keep your hands off the meat.
 
 HIEROCLES To whom are you sacrificing? Answer me. Ah! the tail(1) is
 showing favourable omens.
 
      f(1) When sacrificing, the tail was cut off the victim and
      thrown into the fire.  From the way in which it burnt the
      inference was drawn as to whether or not the sacrifice was
      agreeable to the deity.
 
 SERVANT Aye, very favourable, oh, loved and mighty Peace!
 
 HIEROCLES Come, cut off the first offering(1) and make the oblation.
 
      f(1) This was the part that belonged to the priests and
      diviners.  As one of the latter class, Hierocles is in haste
      to see this piece cut off.
 
 TRYGAEUS 'Tis not roasted enough.
 
 HIEROCLES Yea, truly, 'tis done to a turn.
 
 TRYGAEUS Mind your own business, friend! (TO THE SERVANT.) Cut away.
 Where is the table? Bring the libations.
 
 HIEROCLES The tongue is cut separately.
 
 TRYGAEUS We know all that. But just listen to one piece of advice.
 
 HIEROCLES And that is?
 
 TRYGAEUS Don't talk, for 'tis divine Peace to whom we are sacrificing.
 
 HIEROCLES Oh! wretched mortals, oh, you idiots!
 
 TRYGAEUS Keep such ugly terms for yourself.
 
 HIEROCLES What! you are so ignorant you don't understand the will of the
 gods and you make a treaty, you, who are men, with apes, who are full of
 malice?(1)
 
      f(1) The Spartans.
 
 TRYGAEUS Ha, ha, ha!
 
 HIEROCLES What are you laughing at?
 
 TRYGAEUS Ha, ha! your apes amuse me!
 
 HIEROCLES You simple pigeons, you trust yourselves to foxes, who are all
 craft, both in mind and heart.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh, you trouble-maker! may your lungs get as hot as this meat!
 
 HIEROCLES Nay, nay! if only the Nymphs had not fooled Bacis, and Bacis
 mortal men; and if the Nymphs had not tricked Bacis a second time...(1)
 
      f(1) Emphatic pathos, incomprehensible even to the diviner
      himself; this is a satire on the obscure style of the
      oracles.  Bacis was a famous Boeotian diviner.
 
 TRYGAEUS May the plague seize you, if you don't stop wearying us with
 your Bacis!
 
 HIEROCLES ...it would not have been written in the book of Fate that the
 bends of Peace must be broken; but first...
 
 TRYGAEUS The meat must be dusted with salt.
 
 HIEROCLES ...it does not please the blessed gods that we should stop the
 War until the wolf uniteth with the sheep.
 
 TRYGAEUS How, you cursed animal, could the wolf ever unite with the
 sheep?
 
 HIEROCLES As long as the wood-bug gives off a fetid odour, when it
 flies; as long as the noisy bitch is forced by nature to litter blind
 pups, so long shall peace be forbidden.
 
 TRYGAEUS Then what should be done? Not to stop War would be to leave
 it to the decision of chance which of the two people should suffer the
 most, whereas by uniting under a treaty, we share the empire of Greece.
 
 HIEROCLES You will never make the crab walk straight.
 
 TRYGAEUS You shall no longer be fed at the Prytaneum; the war done,
 oracles are not wanted.
 
 HIEROCLES You will never smooth the rough spikes of the hedgehog.
 
 TRYGAEUS Will you never stop fooling the Athenians?
 
 HIEROCLES What oracle ordered you to burn these joints of mutton in
 honour of the gods?
 
 TRYGAEUS This grand oracle of Homer's: "Thus vanished the dark
 war-clouds and we offered a sacrifice to new-born Peace. When the flame
 had consumed the thighs of the victim and its inwards had appeased our
 hunger, we poured out the libations of wine." 'Twas I who arranged the
 sacred rites, but none offered the shining cup to the diviner.(1)
 
      f(1) Of course this is not a bona fide quotation, but a
      whimsical adaptation of various Homeric verses; the last is
      a coinage of his own, and means, that he is to have no part,
      either in the flesh of the victim or in the wine of the
      libations.
 
 HIEROCLES I care little for that. 'Tis not the Sibyl who spoke it.(1)
 
      f(1) Probably the Sibyl of Delphi is meant.
 
 TRYGAEUS Wise Homer has also said: "He who delights in the horrors of
 civil war has neither country nor laws nor home." What noble words!
 
 HIEROCLES Beware lest the kite turn your brain and rob...
 
 TRYGAEUS Look out, slave! This oracle threatens our meat. Quick, pour
 the libation, and give me some of the inwards.
 
 HIEROCLES I too will help myself to a bit, if you like.
 
 TRYGAEUS The libation! the libation!
 
 HIEROCLES Pour out also for me and give me some of this meat.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, the blessed gods won't allow it yet; let us drink; and as
 for you, get you gone, for 'tis their will. Mighty Peace! stay ever in
 our midst.
 
 HIEROCLES Bring the tongue hither.
 
 TRYGAEUS Relieve us of your own.
 
 HIEROCLES The libation.
 
 TRYGAEUS Here! and this into the bargain (STRIKES HIM).
 
 HIEROCLES You will not give me any meat?
 
 TRYGAEUS We cannot give you any until the wolf unites with the sheep.
 
 HIEROCLES I will embrace your knees.
 
 TRYGAEUS 'Tis lost labour, good fellow; you will never smooth the rough
 spikes of the hedgehog.... Come, spectators, join us in our feast.
 
 HIEROCLES And what am I to do?
 
 TRYGAEUS You? go and eat the Sibyl.
 
 HIEROCLES No, by the Earth! no, you shall not eat without me; if you do
 not give, I take; 'tis common property.
 
 TRYGAEUS (TO THE SERVANT) Strike, strike this Bacis, this humbugging
 soothsayer.
 
 HIEROCLES I take to witness...
 
 TRYGAEUS And I also, that you are a glutton and an impostor. Hold him
 tight and beat the impostor with a stick.
 
 SERVANT You look to that; I will snatch the skin from him which he has
 stolen from us.(1) Are you going to let go that skin, you priest from
 hell! do you hear! Oh! what a fine crow has come from Oreus! Stretch
 your wings quickly for Elymnium.(2)
 
      f(1) The skin of the victim, that is to say.
 
      f(2) A temple in Euboea, close to Oreus.  The servant means,
      "Return where you came from."
 
 CHORUS Oh! joy, joy! no more helmet, no more cheese nor onions!(1) No, I
 have no passion for battles; what I love, is to drink with good comrades
 in the corner by the fire when good dry wood, cut in the height of the
 summer, is crackling; it is to cook pease on the coals and beechnuts
 among the embers, 'tis to kiss our pretty Thracian(2) while my wife is
 at the bath. Nothing is more pleasing, when the rain is sprouting our
 sowings, than to chat with some friend, saying, "Tell me, Comarchides,
 what shall we do? I would willingly drink myself, while the heavens are
 watering our fields. Come, wife, cook three measures of beans, adding
 to them a little wheat, and give us some figs. Syra! call Manes off the
 fields, 'tis impossible to prune the vine or to align the ridges, for
 the ground is too wet to-day. Let someone bring me the thrush and those
 two chaffinches; there were also some curds and four pieces of hare,
 unless the cat stole them last evening, for I know not what the infernal
 noise was that I heard in the house. Serve up three of the pieces for
 me, slave, and give the fourth to my father. Go and ask Aeschinades for
 some myrtle branches with berries on them, and then, for 'tis the same
 road, you will invite Charinades to come and drink with me to the honour
 of the gods who watch over our crops." When the grasshopper sings his
 dulcet tune, I love to see the Lemnian vines beginning to ripen, for
 'tis the earliest plant of all. I love likewise to watch the fig filling
 out, and when it has reached maturity I eat with appreciation and
 exclaim, "Oh! delightful season!" Then too I bruise some thyme and
 infuse it in water. Indeed I grow a great deal fatter passing the summer
 in this way than in watching a cursed captain with his three plumes
 and his military cloak of a startling crimson (he calls it true Sardian
 purple), which he takes care to dye himself with Cyzicus saffron in
 a battle; then he is the first to run away, shaking his plumes like a
 great yellow prancing cock,(3) while I am left to watch the nets.(4)
 Once back again in Athens, these brave fellows behave abominably; they
 write down these, they scratch through others, and this backwards
 and forwards two or three times at random. The departure is set for
 to-morrow, and some citizen has brought no provisions, because he didn't
 know he had to go; he stops in front of the statue of Pandion,(5) reads
 his name, is dumbfounded and starts away at a run, weeping bitter tears.
 The townsfolk are less ill-used, but that is how the husbandmen are
 treated by these men of war, the hated of the gods and of men, who
 know nothing but how to throw away their shield. For this reason, if it
 please heaven, I propose to call these rascals to account, for they are
 lions in times of peace, but sneaking foxes when it comes to fighting.
 
      f(1) This was the soldier's usual ration on duty.
 
      f(2) Slaves often bore the name of the country of their
      birth.
 
      f(3) Because of the new colour which fear had lent his
      chlamys.
 
      f(4) Meaning, that he deserts his men in mid-campaign,
      leaving them to look after the enemy.
 
      f(5) Ancient King of Athens.  This was one of the twelve
      statues, on the pedestals of which the names of the soldiers
      chose for departure on service were written.  The decrees
      were also placarded on them.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! oh! what a crowd for the nuptial feast! Here! dust the
 tables with this crest, which is good for nothing else now. Halloa!
 produce the cakes, the thrushes, plenty of good jugged hare and the
 little loaves.
 
 A SICKLE-MAKER Trygaeus, where is Trygaeus?
 
 TRYGAEUS I am cooking the thrushes.
 
 SICKLE-MAKER Trygaeus, my best of friends, what a fine stroke of
 business you have done for me by bringing back Peace! Formerly my
 sickles would not have sold at an obolus apiece; to-day I am being paid
 fifty drachmae for every one. And here is a neighbour who is selling his
 casks for the country at three drachmae each. So come, Trygaeus, take as
 many sickles and casks as you will for nothing. Accept them for nothing;
 'tis because of our handsome profits on our sales that we offer you
 these wedding presents.
 
 TRYGAEUS Thanks. Put them all down inside there, and come along quick to
 the banquet. Ah! do you see that armourer yonder coming with a wry face?
 
 A CREST-MAKER Alas! alas! Trygaeus, you have ruined me utterly.
 
 TRYGAEUS What! won't the crests go any more, friend?
 
 CREST-MAKER You have killed my business, my livelihood, and that of this
 poor lance-maker too.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, come, what are you asking for these two crests?
 
 CREST-MAKER What do you bid for them?
 
 TRYGAEUS What do I bid? Oh! I am ashamed to say. Still, as the clasp
 is of good workmanship, I would give two, even three measures of dried
 figs; I could use 'em for dusting the table.
 
 CREST-MAKER All right, tell them to bring me the dried figs; 'tis always
 better than nothing.
 
 TRYGAEUS Take them away, be off with your crests and get you gone; they
 are moulting, they are losing all their hair; I would not give a single
 fig for them.
 
 A BREASTPLATE-MAKER Good gods, what am I going to do with this fine
 ten-minae breastplate, which is so splendidly made?
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh, you will lose nothing over it.
 
 BREASTPLATE-MAKER I will sell it to you at cost price.
 
 TRYGAEUS 'Twould be very useful as a night-stool...
 
 BREASTPLATE-MAKER Cease your insults, both to me and my wares.
 
 TRYGAEUS ...if propped on three stones. Look, 'tis admirable.
 
 BREASTPLATE-MAKER But how can you wipe, idiot?
 
 TRYGAEUS I can pass one hand through here, and the other there, and
 so...
 
 BREASTPLATE-MAKER What! do you wipe with both hands?
 
 TRYGAEUS Aye, so that I may not be accused of robbing the State, by
 blocking up an oar-hole in the galley.(1)
 
      f(1) The trierarchs stopped up some of the holes made for
      the oars, in order to reduce the number of rowers they had
      to supply for the galleys; they thus saved the wages of the
      rowers they dispensed with.
 
 BREASTPLATE-MAKER So you would pay ten minae(1) for a night-stool?
 
      f(1) The mina was equivalent to about three pounds, ten
      shillings.
 
 TRYGAEUS Undoubtedly, you rascal. Do you think I would sell my rump for
 a thousand drachmae?(1)
 
      f(1) Which is the same thing, since a mina was worth a
      hundred drachmae.
 
 BREASTPLATE-MAKER Come, have the money paid over to me.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, friend; I find it hurts me to sit on. Take it away, I won't
 buy it.
 
 A TRUMPET-MAKER What is to be done with this trumpet, for which I gave
 sixty drachmae the other day?
 
 TRYGAEUS Pour lead into the hollow and fit a good, long stick to the
 top; and you will have a balanced cottabos.(1)
 
      f(1) For 'cottabos' see note above.
 
 TRUMPET-MAKER Ha! would you mock me?
 
 TRYGAEUS Well, here's another notion. Pour in lead as I said, add here a
 dish hung on strings, and you will have a balance for weighing the figs
 which you give your slaves in the fields.
 
 A HELMET-MAKER Cursed fate! I am ruined. Here are helmets, for which I
 gave a mina each. What I to do with them? who will buy them?
 
 TRYGAEUS Go and sell them to the Egyptians; they will do for measuring
 loosening medicines.(1)
 
      f(1) Syrmoea, a kind of purgative syrup much used by the
      Egyptians, made of antiscorbutic herbs, such as mustard,
      horse-radish, etc.
 
 A SPEAR-MAKER Ah! poor helmet-maker, things are indeed in a bad way.
 
 TRYGAEUS That man has no cause for complaint.
 
 SPEAR-MAKER But helmets will be no more used.
 
 TRYGAEUS Let him learn to fit a handle to them and he can sell them for
 more money.(1)
 
      f(1) As wine-pots or similar vessels.
 
 SPEAR-MAKER Let us be off, comrade.
 
 TRYGAEUS No, I want to buy these spears.
 
 SPEAR-MAKER What will you give?
 
 TRYGAEUS If they could be split in two, I would take them at a drachma
 per hundred to use as vine-props.
 
 SPEAR-MAKER The insolent dog! Let us go, friend.
 
 TRYGAEUS Ah! here come the guests, children from the table to relieve
 themselves; I fancy they also want to hum over what they will be singing
 presently. Hi! child! what do you reckon to sing? Stand there and give
 me the opening line.
 
 THE SON OF LAMACHUS "Glory to the young warriors..."
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! leave off about your young warriors, you little wretch; we
 are at peace and you are an idiot and a rascal.
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS "The skirmish begins, the hollow bucklers clash against
 each other."(1)
 
      f(1) These verses and those which both Trygaeus and the son
      of Lamachus quote afterwards are borrowed from the 'Iliad.'
 
 TRYGAEUS Bucklers! Leave me in peace with your bucklers.
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS "And then there came groanings and shouts of victory."
 
 TRYGAEUS Groanings! ah! by Bacchus! look out for yourself, you cursed
 squaller, if you start wearying us again with your groanings and hollow
 bucklers.
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS Then what should I sing? Tell me what pleases you.
 
 TRYGAEUS "'Tis thus they feasted on the flesh of oxen," or something
 similar, as, for instance, "Everything that could tickle the palate was
 placed on the table."
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS "'Tis thus they feasted on the flesh of oxen and, tired
 of warfare, unharnessed their foaming steeds."
 
 TRYGAEUS That's splendid; tired of warfare, they seat themselves at
 table; sing, sing to us how they still go on eating after they are
 satiated.
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS "The meal over, they girded themselves..."
 
 TRYGAEUS With good wine, no doubt?
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS "...with armour and rushed forth from the towers, and a
 terrible shout arose."
 
 TRYGAEUS Get you gone, you little scapegrace, you and your battles! You
 sing of nothing but warfare. Who is your father then?
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS My father?
 
 TRYGAEUS Why yes, your father.
 
 SON OF LAMACHUS I am Lamachus' son.
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! oh! I could indeed have sworn, when I was listening to you,
 that you were the son of some warrior who dreams of nothing but wounds
 and bruises, of some Boulomachus or Clausimachus;(1) go and sing your
 plaguey songs to the spearmen.... Where is the son of Cleonymus? Sing me
 something before going back to the feast. I am at least certain he will
 not sing of battles, for his father is far too careful a man.
 
      f(1) Boulomachus is derived from (two Greek words meaning)
      to wish for battle; Clausimachus from (two others), the
      tears that battles cost. The same root (for) 'battle' is
      also contained in the name Lamachus.
 
 SON OF CLEONYMUS "An inhabitant of Sais is parading with the spotless
 shield which I regret to say I have thrown into a thicket."(1)
 
      f(1) A distich borrowed from Archilochus, a celebrated poet
      of the seventh century B.C., born at Paros, and the author
      of odes, satires, epigrams and elegies.  He sang his own
      shame.  'Twas in an expedition against Sais, not the town in
      Egypt as the similarity in name might lead one to believe,
      but in Thrace, that he had cast away his buckler.  "A might
      calamity truly!" he says without shame.  "I shall buy
      another."
 
 TRYGAEUS Tell me, you little good-for-nothing, are you singing that for
 your father?
 
 SON OF CLEONYMUS "But I saved my life."
 
 TRYGAEUS And dishonoured your family. But let us go in; I am very
 certain, that being the son of such a father, you will never forget this
 song of the buckler. You, who remain to the feast, 'tis your duty to
 devour dish after dish and not to ply empty jaws. Come, put heart into
 the work and eat with your mouths full. For, believe me, poor friends,
 white teeth are useless furniture, if they chew nothing.
 
 CHORUS Never fear; thanks all the same for your good advice.
 
 TRYGAEUS You, who yesterday were dying of hunger, come, stuff yourselves
 with this fine hare-stew; 'tis not every day that we find cakes lying
 neglected. Eat, eat, or I predict you will soon regret it.
 
 CHORUS Silence! Keep silence! Here is the bride about to appear! Take
 nuptial torches and let all rejoice and join in our songs. Then, when we
 have danced, clinked our cups and thrown Hyperbolus through the doorway
 we will carry back all our farming tools to the fields and shall pray
 the gods to give wealth to the Greeks and to cause us all to gather in
 an abundant barley harvest, enjoy a noble vintage, to grant that we may
 choke with good figs, that our wives may prove fruitful, that in fact we
 may recover all our lost blessings, and that the sparkling fire may be
 restored to the hearth.
 
 TRYGAEUS Come, wife, to the fields and seek, my beauty, to brighten and
 enliven my nights. Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 CHORUS Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus! oh! thrice happy man, who so well
 deserve your good fortune!
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 CHORUS Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 FIRST SEMI-CHORUS What shall we do to her?
 
 SECOND SEMI-CHORUS What shall we do to her?
 
 FIRST SEMI-CHORUS We will gather her kisses.
 
 SECOND SEMI-CHORUS We will gather her kisses.
 
 CHORUS Come, comrades, we who are in the first row, let us pick up
 the bridegroom and carry him in triumph. Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus! Oh!
 Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 CHORUS You shall have a fine house, no cares and the finest of figs. Oh!
 Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 TRYGAEUS Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 CHORUS The bridegroom's fig is great and thick; the bride's very soft
 and tender.
 
 TRYGAEUS While eating and drinking deep draughts of wine, continue to
 repeat: Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 CHORUS Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 TRYGAEUS Farewell, farewell, my friends. All who come with me shall have
 cakes galore.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 Produced by Derek Davis, and David Widger
 
 
 
 THE ACHARNIANS
 
 By Aristophanes
 [Translator uncredited. Footnotes have been retained because they
 provide the meanings of Greek names, terms and ceremonies and explain
 puns and references otherwise lost in translation. Occasional Greek
 words in the footnotes have not been included. Footnote numbers, in
 brackets, start anew at (1) for each piece of dialogue, and each
 footnote follows immediately the dialogue to which it refers, labeled
 thus: f(1).]
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 THE ACHARNIANS
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 This is the first of the series of three Comedies--'The Acharnians,'
 'Peace' and 'Lysistrata'--produced at intervals of years, the sixth,
 tenth and twenty-first of the Peloponnesian War, and impressing on the
 Athenian people the miseries and disasters due to it and to the
 scoundrels who by their selfish and reckless policy had provoked it, the
 consequent ruin of industry and, above all, agriculture, and the urgency
 of asking Peace. In date it is the earliest play brought out by the
 author in his own name and his first work of serious importance. It was
 acted at the Lenaean Festival, in January, 426 B.C., and gained the
 first prize, Cratinus being second.
 
 Its diatribes against the War and fierce criticism of the general policy
 of the War party so enraged Cleon that, as already mentioned, he
 endeavoured to ruin the author, who in 'The Knights' retorted by a
 direct and savage personal attack on the leader of the democracy.
 
 The plot is of the simplest. Dicaeopolis, an Athenian citizen, but a
 native of Acharnae, one of the agricultural demes and one which had
 especially suffered in the Lacedaemonian invasions, sick and tired of
 the ill-success and miseries of the War, makes up his mind, if he fails
 to induce the people to adopt his policy of "peace at any price," to
 conclude a private and particular peace of his own to cover himself, his
 family, and his estate. The Athenians, momentarily elated by victory and
 over-persuaded by the demagogues of the day--Cleon and his henchmen,
 refuse to hear of such a thing as coming to terms. Accordingly
 Dicaeopolis dispatches an envoy to Sparta on his own account, who comes
 back presently with a selection of specimen treaties in his pocket. The
 old man tastes and tries, special terms are arranged, and the play
 concludes with a riotous and uproarious rustic feast in honour of the
 blessings of Peace and Plenty.
 
 Incidentally excellent fun is poked at Euripides and his dramatic
 methods, which supply matter for so much witty badinage in several
 others of our author's pieces.
 
 Other specially comic incidents are: the scene where the two young
 daughters of the famished Megarian are sold in the market at Athens as
 suck(l)ing-pigs--a scene in which the convenient similarity of the Greek
 words signifying a pig and the 'pudendum muliebre' respectively is
 utilized in a whole string of ingenious and suggestive 'double
 entendres' and ludicrous jokes; another where the Informer, or
 Market-Spy, is packed up in a crate as crockery and carried off home by
 the Boeotian buyer.
 
 The drama takes its title from the Chorus, composed of old men of
 Acharnae.
 
 
 
 THE ACHARNIANS
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
 
      DICAEOPOLIS
      HERALD
      AMPHITHEUS
      AMBASSADORS
      PSEUDARTABAS
      THEORUS
      WIFE OF DICAEOPOLIS
      DAUGHTER OF DICAEOPOLIS
      EURIPIDES
      CEPHISOPHON, servant of Euripides
      LAMACHUS
      ATTENDANT OF LAMACHUS
      A MEGARIAN
      MAIDENS, daughters of the Megarian
      A BOEOTIAN
      NICARCHUS
      A HUSBANDMAN
      A BRIDESMAID
      AN INFORMER
      MESSENGERS
      CHORUS OF ACHARNIAN ELDERS
 
 SCENE: The Athenian Ecclesia on the Pnyx; afterwards Dicaeopolis' house in the country.
 
 
 
 DICAEOPOLIS(1) (alone)
  What cares have not gnawed at my heart and how few have been the
  pleasures in my life!  Four, to be exact, while my troubles have been
  as countless as the grains of sand on the shore!  Let me see! of what
  value to me have been these few pleasures?  Ah! I remember that I was
  delighted in soul when Cleon had to disgorge those five talents;(2) I was
  in ecstasy and I love the Knights for this deed; 'it is an honour to
  Greece.'(3) But the day when I was impatiently awaiting a piece by
  Aeschylus,(4) what tragic despair it caused me when the herald called,
  "Theognis,(5) introduce your Chorus!" Just imagine how this blow struck
  straight at my heart!  On the other hand, what joy Dexitheus caused
  me at the musical competition, when he played a Boeotian melody
  on the lyre!  But this year by contrast! Oh! what deadly torture
  to hear Chaeris(6) perform the prelude in the Orthian mode!(7)
  --Never, however, since I began to bathe, has the dust hurt my
  eyes as it does to-day.  Still it is the day of assembly; all should be
  here at daybreak, and yet the Pnyx(8) is still deserted.  They are
  gossiping in the marketplace, slipping hither and thither to avoid
  the vermilioned rope.(9) The Prytanes(10) even do not come; they will be
  late, but when they come they will push and fight each other for a
  seat in the front row.  They will never trouble themselves with the
  question of peace.  Oh!  Athens! Athens! As for myself, I do not fail to
  come here before all the rest, and now, finding myself alone, I groan,
  yawn, stretch, break wind, and know not what to do; I make sketches in
  the dust, pull out my loose hairs, muse, think of my fields, long for
  peace, curse town life and regret my dear country home,(11) which never
  told me to 'buy fuel, vinegar or oil'; there the word 'buy,' which
  cuts me in two, was unknown; I harvested everything at will.  Therefore
  I have come to the assembly fully prepared to bawl, interrupt and
  abuse the speakers, if they talk of anything but peace.  But here come the
  Prytanes, and high time too, for it is midday!  As I foretold, hah! is it
  not so?  They are pushing and fighting for the front seats.
 
  f(1) A name invented by Aristophanes and signifying 'a just citizen.'
 
  f(2) Clean had received five talents from the islanders subject to Athens,
  on condition that he should get the tribute payable by them reduced; when
  informed of this transaction, the knights compelled him to return
  the money.
 
  f(3) A hemistich borrowed from Euripides' 'Telephus.'
 
  f(4) The tragedies of Aeschylus continued to be played even after the
  poet's death, which occurred in 436 B.C., ten years before the production
  of 'The Acharnians.'
 
  f(5) A tragic poet, whose pieces were so devoid of warmth and life that he
  was nicknamed (the Greek for) 'snow.'
 
  f(6) A bad musician, frequently ridiculed by Aristophanes; he played both
  the lyre and the flute.
 
  f(7) A lively and elevated method.
 
  f(8) A hill near the Acropolis, where the Assemblies were held.
 
  f(9) Several means were used to force citizens to attend the assemblies;
  the shops were closed; circulation was only permitted in those streets which
  led to the Pnyx; finally, a rope covered with vermilion was drawn round those
  who dallied in the Agora (the market-place), and the late-comers,
  ear-marked by the imprint of the rope, were fined.
 
  f(10) Magistrates who, with the Archons and the Epistatae, shared the care
  of holding and directing the assemblies of the people; they were fifty
  in number.
 
  f(11) The Peloponnesian War had already, at the date of the representation
  of 'The Acharnians,' lasted five years, 431-426 B.C.; driven from their lands
  by the successive Lacedaemonian invasions, the people throughout the
  country had been compelled to seek shelter behind the walls of Athens.
 
 HERALD
  Move on up, move on, move on, to get within the consecrated area.(1)
 
  f(1) Shortly before the meeting of the Assembly, a number of young pigs
  were immolated and a few drops of their blood were sprinkled on the
  seats of the Prytanes; this sacrifice was in honour of Ceres.
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  Has anyone spoken yet?
 
 HERALD
  Who asks to speak?
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  I do.
 
 HERALD
  Your name?
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  Amphitheus.
 
 HERALD
  You are no man.(1)
 
  f(1) The name, Amphitheus, contains (the Greek) word (for) 'god.'
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  No!  I am an immortal!  Amphitheus was the son of Ceres and
  Triptolemus; of him was born Celeus.  Celeus wedded Phaenerete, my
  grandmother, whose son was Lucinus, and, being born of him I am an
  immortal; it is to me alone that the gods have entrusted the duty of
  treating with the Lacedaemonians.  But, citizens, though I am immortal,
  I am dying of hunger; the Prytanes give me naught.(1)
 
  f(1) Amongst other duties, it was the office of the Prytanes to look after
  the wants of the poor.
 
 A PRYTANIS
  Guards!
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  Oh, Triptolemus and Ceres, do ye thus forsake your own blood?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Prytanes, in expelling this citizen, you are offering an outrage
  to the Assembly.  He only desired to secure peace for us and to sheathe
  the sword.
 
 PRYTANIS
  Sit down and keep silence!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, by Apollo, I will not, unless you are going to discuss the
  question of peace.
 
 HERALD
  The ambassadors, who are returned from the Court of the King!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Of what King?  I am sick of all those fine birds, the peacock
  ambassadors and their swagger.
 
 HERALD
  Silence!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh! oh! by Ecbatana,(1) what a costume!
 
  f(1) The summer residence of the Great King.
 
 AN AMBASSADOR
  During the archonship of Euthymenes, you sent us to the Great King
  on a salary of two drachmae per diem.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! those poor drachmae!
 
 AMBASSADOR
  We suffered horribly on the plains of the Cayster, sleeping under a tent,
  stretched deliciously on fine chariots, half dead with weariness.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And I was very much at ease, lying on the straw along the
  battlements!(1)
 
  f(1) Referring to the hardships he had endured garrisoning the walls of
  Athens during the Lacedaemonian invasions early in the War.
 
 AMBASSADOR
  Everywhere we were well received and forced to drink delicious
  wine out of golden or crystal flagons....
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, city of Cranaus,(1) thy ambassadors are laughing at thee!
 
  f(1) Cranaus, the second king of Athens, the successor of Cecrops.
 
 AMBASSADOR
  For great feeders and heavy drinkers are alone esteemed as men
  by the barbarians.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Just as here in Athens, we only esteem the most drunken debauchees.
 
 AMBASSADOR
  At the end of the fourth year we reached the King's Court, but
  he had left with his whole army to ease himself, and for the space of
  eight months he was thus easing himself in the midst of the golden
  mountains.(1)
 
  f(1) Lucian, in his 'Hermotimus,' speaks of these golden mountains as an
  apocryphal land of wonders and prodigies.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And how long was he replacing his dress?
 
 AMBASSADOR
  The whole period of a full moon; after which he returned to his palace;
  then he entertained us and had us served with oxen roasted whole
  in an oven.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Who ever saw an oxen baked in an oven?  What a lie!
 
 AMBASSADOR
  On my honour, he also had us served with a bird three
  times as large as Cleonymus,(1) and called the Boaster.
 
  f(1) Cleonymus was an Athenian general of exceptionally tall stature;
  Aristophanes incessantly rallies him for his cowardice; he had cast away
  his buckler in a fight.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And do we give you two drachmae, that you should treat us to all
  this humbug?
 
 AMBASSADOR
  We are bringing to you Pseudartabas(1), the King's Eye.
 
  f(1) A name borne by certain officials of the King of Persia.  The actor of
  this part wore a mask, fitted with a single eye of great size.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I would a crow might pluck out thine with his beak, you cursed
  ambassador!
 
 HERALD
  The King's Eye!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Eh!  Great Gods!  Friend, with thy great eye, round like the hole through
  which the oarsman passes his sweep, you have the air of a galley
  doubling a cape to gain port.
 
 AMBASSADOR
  Come, Pseudartabas, give forth the message for the Athenians
  with which you were charged by the Great King.
 
 PSEUDARTABAS
  Jartaman exarx 'anapissonia satra.(1)
 
  f(1) Jargon, no doubt meaningless in all languages.
 
 AMBASSADOR
  Do you understand what he says?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  By Apollo, not I!
 
 AMBASSADOR (TO THE PRYTANES)
  He says that the Great King will send you gold.  Come, utter the word
  'gold' louder and more distinctly.
 
 PSEUDARTABAS
  Thou shalt not have gold, thou gaping-arsed Ionian.(1)
 
  f(1) The Persians styled all Greeks 'Ionians' without distinction; here
  the Athenians are intended.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! may the gods forgive me, but that is clear enough!
 
 AMBASSADOR
  What does he say?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  That the Ionians are debauchees and idiots, if they expect to receive
  gold from the barbarians.
 
 AMBASSADOR
  Not so, he speaks of medimni(1) of gold.
 
  f(1) A Greek measure, containing about six modii.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What medimni?  Thou are but a great braggart; but get your way; I
  will find out the truth by myself.  Come now, answer me clearly, if you
  do not wish me to dye your skin red.  Will the Great King send us gold?
  (PSEUDARTABAS MAKES A NEGATIVE SIGN.) Then our ambassadors
  are seeking to deceive us?  (PSEUDARTABAS SIGNS AFFIRMATIVELY.)
  These fellows make signs like any Greek; I am sure that they are
  nothing but Athenians.  Oh! ho! I recognize one of these eunuchs; it is
  Clisthenes, the son of Sibyrtius.(1) Behold the effrontery of this shaven
  rump!  How! great baboon, with such a beard do you seek to play the
  eunuch to us?  And this other one?  Is it not Straton?
 
  f(1) Noted for his extreme ugliness and his obscenity.  Aristophanes
  frequently holds him to scorn in his comedies.
 
 HERALD
  Silence!  Let all be seated.  The Senate invites the King's Eye to the
  Prytaneum.(1)
 
  f(1) Ambassadors were entertained there at the public expense.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Is this not sufficient to drive one to hang oneself?  Here I
  stand chilled to the bone, whilst the doors of the Prytaneum fly
  wide open to lodge such rascals.  But I will do something great and
  bold.  Where is Amphitheus?  Come and speak with me.
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  Here I am.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Take these eight drachmae and go and conclude a truce with the
  Lacedaemonians for me, my wife and my children; I leave you free,
  my dear citizens, to send out embassies and to stand gaping in the air.
 
 HERALD
  Bring in Theorus, who has returned from the Court of Sitalces.(1)
 
  f(1) King of Thrace.
 
 THEORUS
  I am here.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Another humbug!
 
 THEORUS
  We should not have remained long in Thrace...
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Forsooth, no, if you had not been well paid.
 
 THEORUS
  ...if the country had not been covered with snow; the rivers were
  ice-bound at the time that Theognis(1) brought out his tragedy here;
  during the whole of that time I was holding my own with
  Sitalces, cup in hand; and, in truth, he adored you to such a degree,
  that he wrote on the walls, "How beautiful are the Athenians!" His
  son, to whom we gave the freedom of the city, burned with desire to
  come here and eat chitterlings at the feast of the Apaturia;(2) he prayed
  his father to come to the aid of his new country and Sitalces swore on
  his goblet that he would succour us with such a host that the Athenians
  would exclaim, "What a cloud of grasshoppers!"
 
  f(1) The tragic poet.
 
  f(2) A feast lasting three days and celebrated during the month Pyanepsion
  (November).  The Greek word contains the suggestion of fraud.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  May I die if I believe a word of what you tell us!  Excepting the
  grasshoppers, there is not a grain of truth in it all!
 
 THEORUS
  And he has sent you the most warlike soldiers of all Thrace.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Now we shall begin to see clearly.
 
 HERALD
  Come hither, Thracians, whom Theorus brought.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What plague have we here?
 
 THEORUS
  'Tis the host of the Odomanti.(1)
 
  f(1) A Thracian tribe from the right bank of the Strymon.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Of the Odomanti?  Tell me what it means.  Who has mutilated them
  like this?
 
 THEORUS
  If they are given a wage of two drachmae, they will put all
  Boeotia(1) to fire and sword.
 
  f(1) The Boeotians were the allies of Sparta.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Two drachmae to those circumcised hounds!  Groan aloud, ye people
  of rowers, bulwark of Athens!  Ah! great gods! I am undone; these
  Odomanti are robbing me of my garlic!(1) Will you give me back
  my garlic?
 
  f(1) Dicaeopolis had brought a clove of garlic with him to eat during
  the Assembly.
 
 THEORUS
  Oh! wretched man! do not go near them; they have eaten garlic(1).
 
  f(1) Garlic was given to game-cocks, before setting them at each other,
  to give them pluck for the fight.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Prytanes, will you let me be treated in this manner, in my own
  country and by barbarians?  But I oppose the discussion of paying
  a wage to the Thracians; I announce an omen; I have just felt a drop
  of rain.(1)
 
  f(1) At the lest unfavourable omen, the sitting of the Assembly was
  declared at an end.
 
 HERALD
  Let the Thracians withdraw and return the day after tomorrow;
  the Prytanes declare the sitting at an end.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ye gods, what garlic I have lost!  But here comes Amphitheus
  returned from Lacedaemon.  Welcome, Amphitheus.
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  No, there is no welcome for me and I fly as fast as I can, for I
  am pursued by the Acharnians.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Why, what has happened?
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  I was hurrying to bring your treaty of truce, but some old dotards
  from Acharnae(1) got scent of the thing; they are veterans of Marathon,
  tough as oak or maple, of which they are made for sure--rough and
  ruthless.  They all started a-crying: "Wretch!  you are the bearer of
  a treaty, and the enemy has only just cut our vines!" Meanwhile they
  were gathering stones in their cloaks, so I fled and they ran after
  me shouting.
 
  f(1) The deme of Acharnae was largely inhabited by charcoal-burners,
  who supplied the city with fuel.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Let 'em shout as much as they please!  But HAVE you brought me
  a treaty?
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  Most certainly, here are three samples to select from,(1) this one is
  five years old; take it and taste.
 
  f(1) He presents them in the form of wines contained in three separate
  skins.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Faugh!
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  Well?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  It does not please me; it smells of pitch and of the ships they are
  fitting out.(1)
 
  f(1) Meaning, preparations for war.
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  Here is another, ten years old; taste it.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  It smells strongly of the delegates, who go around the towns
  to chide the allies for their slowness.(1)
 
  f(1) Meaning, securing allies for the continuance of the war.
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  This last is a truce of thirty years, both on sea and land.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh! by Bacchus! what a bouquet!  It has the aroma of nectar and
  ambrosia; this does not say to us, "Provision yourselves for three
  days." But it lisps the gentle numbers, "Go whither you will."(1)
  I accept it, ratify it, drink it at one draught and consign the
  Acharnians to limbo.  Freed from the war and its ills, I shall
  keep the Dionysia(2) in the country.
 
  f(1) When Athens sent forth an army, the soldiers were usually ordered
  to assemble at some particular spot with provisions for three days.
 
  f(2) These feasts were also called the Anthesteria or Lenaea; the Lenaem
  was a temple to Bacchus, erected outside the city.  They took place
  during the month Anthesterion (February).
 
 AMPHITHEUS
  And I shall run away, for I'm mortally afraid of the Acharnians.
 
 CHORUS
  This way all!  Let us follow our man; we will demand him of
  everyone we meet; the public weal makes his seizure imperative.  Ho,
  there!  tell me which way the bearer of the truce has gone; he has escaped
  us, he has disappeared.  Curse old age!  When I was young, in the days
  when I followed Phayllus,(1) running with a sack of coals on my back, this
  wretch would not have eluded my pursuit, let him be as swift as he will;
  but now my limbs are stiff; old Lacratides(2) feels his legs are
  weighty and the traitor escapes me.  No, no, let us follow him; old
  Acharnians like ourselves shall not be set at naught by a
  scoundrel, who has dared, great gods!  to conclude a truce, when I wanted
  the war continued with double fury in order to avenge my ruined lands.
  No mercy for our foes until I have pierced their hearts like sharp
  reed, so that they dare never again ravage my vineyards.
  Come, let us seek the rascal; let us look everywhere, carrying our
  stones in our hands; let us hunt him from place to place until we trap
  him; I could never, never tire of the delight of stoning him.
 
  f(1) A celebrated athlete from Croton and a victor at Olympia; he was
  equally good as a runner and at the 'five exercises.'
 
  f(2) He had been Archon at the time of the battle of Marathon.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Peace! profane men!(1)
 
  f(1) A sacred formula, pronounced by the priest before offering
  the sacrifice.
 
 CHORUS
  Silence all!  Friends, do you hear the sacred formula?  Here is he,
  whom we seek!  This way, all!  Get out of his way, surely he comes
  to offer an oblation.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Peace, profane men!  Let the basket-bearer(1) come forward, and thou
  Xanthias, hold the phallus well upright.(2)
 
  f(1) The maiden who carried the basket filled with fruits at the Dionysia
  in honour of Bacchus.
 
  f(2) The emblem of the fecundity of nature; it consisted of a representation,
  generally grotesquely exaggerated, of the male genital organs;
  the phallophori crowned with violets and ivy and their faces shaded
  with green foliage, sang improvised airs, call 'Phallics,' full of obscenity
  and suggestive 'double entendres.'
 
 WIFE OF DICAEOPOLIS
  Daughter, set down the basket and let us begin the sacrifice.
 
 DAUGHTER OF DICAEOPOLIS
  Mother, hand me the ladle, that I may spread the sauce on the
  cake.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  It is well! Oh, mighty Bacchus, it is with joy that, freed from
  military duty, I and all mine perform this solemn rite and offer
  thee this sacrifice; grant that I may keep the rural Dionysia
  without hindrance and that this truce of thirty years may be
  propitious for me.
 
 WIFE OF DICAEOPOLIS
  Come, my child, carry the basket gracefully and with a grave, demure
  face.  Happy he, who shall be your possessor and embrace you so firmly
  at dawn,(1) that you belch wind like a weasel.  Go forward, and have a care
  they don't snatch your jewels in the crowd.
 
  f(1) The most propitious moment for Love's gambols, observes the
  scholiast.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Xanthias, walk behind the basket-bearer and hold the phallus well
  erect; I will follow, singing the Phallic hymn; thou, wife, look on from
  the top of the terrace.(1) Forward! Oh, Phales,(2) companion of the orgies
  of Bacchus, night reveller, god of adultery, friend of young men, these
  past six(3) years I have not been able to invoke thee.  With what joy I
  return to my farmstead, thanks to the truce I have concluded, freed
  from cares, from fighting and from Lamachuses!(4) How much sweeter,
  oh Phales, oh, Phales, is it to surprise Thratta, the pretty woodmaid,
  Strymodorus' slave, stealing wood from Mount Phelleus, to catch her
  under the arms, to throw her on the ground and possess her, Oh, Phales,
  Phales! If thou wilt drink and bemuse thyself with me, we shall
  to-morrow consume some good dish in honour of the peace, and I will
  hang up my buckler over the smoking hearth.
 
  f(1) Married women did not join in the processions.
 
  f(2) The god of generation, worshipped in the form of a phallus.
 
  f(3) A remark which fixes the date of the production of 'The Acharnians,'
  viz. the sixth year of the Peloponnesian War, 426 B.C.
 
  f(4) Lamachus was an Athenian general, who figures later in this comedy.
 
 CHORUS
  It is he, he himself.  Stone him, stone him, stone him, strike
  the wretch.  All, all of you, pelt him, pelt him!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What is this?  By Heracles, you will smash my pot.(1)
 
  f(1) At the rural Dionysia a pot of kitchen vegetables was borne in
  the procession along with other emblems.
 
 CHORUS
  It is you that we are stoning, you miserable scoundrel.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And for what sin, Acharnian Elders, tell me that!
 
 CHORUS
  You ask that, you impudent rascal, traitor to your country; you
  alone amongst us all have concluded a truce, and you dare to look us
  in the face!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But you do not know WHY I have treated for peace.  Listen!
 
 CHORUS
  Listen to you?  No, no, you are about to die, we will annihilate
  you with our stones.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But first of all, listen.  Stop, my friends.
 
 CHORUS
  I will hear nothing; do not address me; I hate you more than I
  do Cleon,(1) whom one day I shall flay to make sandals for the Knights.
  Listen to your long speeches, after you have treated with the
  Laconians?  No, I will punish you.
 
  f(1) Cleon the Demagogue was a currier originally by trade.  He was the
  sworn foe and particular detestation of the Knights or aristocratic party
  generally.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Friends, leave the Laconians out of debate and consider only
  whether I have not done well to conclude my truce.
 
 CHORUS
  Done well! when you have treated with a people who know neither
  gods, nor truth, nor faith.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  We attribute too much to the Laconians; as for myself, I know that
  they are not the cause of all our troubles.
 
 CHORUS
  Oh, indeed, rascal!  You dare to use such language to me and then
  expect me to spare you!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, no, they are not the cause of all our troubles, and I who
  address you claim to be able to prove that they have much to
  complain of in us.
 
 CHORUS
  This passes endurance; my heart bounds with fury.  Thus you dare to
  defend our enemies.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Were my head on the block I would uphold what I say and rely on
  the approval of the people.
 
 CHORUS
  Comrades, let us hurl our stones and dye this fellow purple.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What black fire-brand has inflamed your heart!  You will not hear
  me?  You really will not, Acharnians?
 
 CHORUS
  No, a thousand times, no.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  This is a hateful injustice.
 
 CHORUS
  May I die, if I listen.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Nay, nay! have mercy, have mercy, Acharnians.
 
 CHORUS
  You shall die.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Well, blood for blood!  I will kill your dearest friend.  I have
  here the hostages of Acharnae;(1) I shall disembowel them.
 
  f(1) That is, the baskets of charcoal.
 
 CHORUS
  Acharnians, what means this threat?  Has he got one of our children
  in his house?  What gives him such audacity?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Stone me, if it please you; I shall avenge myself on this.
  (SHOWS A BASKET.) Let us see whether you have any love
  for your coals.
 
 CHORUS
  Great Gods! this basket is our fellow-citizen.  Stop, stop,
  in heaven's name!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I shall dismember it despite your cries; I will listen to nothing.
 
 CHORUS
  How! will you kill this coal-basket, my beloved comrade?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Just now, you would not listen to me.
 
 CHORUS
  Well, speak now, if you will; tell us, tell us you have a weakness
  for the Lacedaemonians.  I consent to anything; never will I forsake
  this dear little basket.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  First, throw down your stones.
 
 CHORUS
  There! 'tis done.  And you, do put away your sword.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Let me see that no stones remain concealed in your cloaks.
 
 CHORUS
  They are all on the ground; see how we shake our garments.  Come,
  no haggling, lay down your sword; we threw away everything while
  crossing from one side of the stage to the other.(1)
 
  f(1) The stage of the Greek theatre was much broader, and at the same
  time shallower, than in a modern playhouse.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What cries of anguish you would have uttered had these coals of
  Parnes(1) been dismembered, and yet it came very near it; had they
  perished, their death would have been due to the folly of their
  fellow-citizens.  The poor basket was so frightened, look, it has
  shed a thick black dust over me, the same as a cuttle-fish does.
  What an irritable temper!  You shout and throw stones, you will not
  hear my arguments--not even when I propose to speak in favour of the
  Lacedaemonians with my head on the block; and yet I cling to life.
 
  f(1) A mountain in Attica, in the neighbourhood of Acharnae.
 
 CHORUS
  Well then, bring out a block before your door, scoundrel, and
  let us hear the good grounds you can give us; I am curious to know
  them.  Now mind, as you proposed yourself, place your head on the block
  and speak.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Here is the block; and, though I am but a very sorry speaker, I
  wish nevertheless to talk freely of the Lacedaemonians and without the
  protection of my buckler.  Yet I have many reasons for fear.  I know our
  rustics; they are delighted if some braggart comes, and rightly or
  wrongly, loads both them and their city with praise and flattery; they
  do not see that such toad-eaters(1) are traitors, who sell them for gain.
  As for the old men, I know their weakness; they only seek to overwhelm
  the accused with their votes.(2) Nor have I forgotten how Cleon treated
  me because of my comedy last year;(3) he dragged me before the Senate
  and there he uttered endless slanders against me; 'twas a tempest of
  abuse, a deluge of lies.  Through what a slough of mud he dragged me!  I
  almost perished.  Permit me, therefore, before I speak, to dress in the
  manner most likely to draw pity.
 
  f(1) Orators in the pay of the enemy.
 
  f(2) Satire on the Athenians' addiction to law-suits.
 
  f(3) 'The Babylonians.' Cleon had denounced Aristophanes to the Senate for
  having scoffed at Athens before strangers, many of whom were present at
  the performance.  The play is now lost.
 
 CHORUS
  What evasions, subterfuges and delays!  Hold! here is the sombre
  helmet of Pluto with its thick bristling plume; Hieronymus(1) lends it to
  you; then open Sisyphus'(2) bag of wiles; but hurry, hurry, pray, for
  discussion does not admit of delay.
 
  f(1) A tragic poet; we know next to nothing of him or his works.
 
  f(2) Son of Aeolus, renowned in fable for his robberies, and for the tortures
  to which he was put by Pluto.  He was cunning enough to break loose out
  of hell, but Hermes brought him back again.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  The time has come for me to manifest my courage, so I will go
  and seek Euripides.  Ho! slave, slave!
 
 SLAVE
  Who's there?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Is Euripides at home?
 
 SLAVE
  He is and he isn't; understand that, if you have wit for't.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  How?  He is and he isn't!(1)
 
  f(1) This whole scene is directed at Euripides; Aristophanes ridicules the
  subtleties of his poetry and the trickeries of his staging, which, according
  to him, he only used to attract the less refined among his audience.
 
 SLAVE
  Certainly, old man; busy gathering subtle fancies here and
  there, his mind is not in the house, but he himself is; perched aloft,
  he is composing a tragedy.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, Euripides, you are indeed happy to have a slave so quick at
  repartee!  Now, fellow, call your master.
 
 SLAVE
  Impossible!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  So much the worse.  But I will not go.  Come, let us knock at the door.
  Euripides, my little Euripides, my darling Euripides, listen;
  never had man greater right to your pity.  It is Dicaeopolis of the
  Chollidan Deme who calls you.  Do you hear?
 
 EURIPIDES
  I have no time to waste.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Very well, have yourself wheeled out here.(1)
 
  f(1) "Wheeled out"--that is, by means of a mechanical contrivance of
  the Greek stage, by which an interior was shown, the set scene
  with performers, etc., all complete, being in some way, which cannot
  be clearly made out from the descriptions, swung out or wheeled out
  on to the main stage.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Impossible.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Nevertheless...
 
 EURIPIDES
  Well, let them roll me out; as to coming down, I have not
  the time.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Euripides....
 
 EURIPIDES
  What words strike my ear?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  You perch aloft to compose tragedies, when you might just as
  well do them on the ground.  I am not astonished at your introducing
  cripples on the stage.(1) And why dress in these miserable tragic rags?
  I do not wonder that your heroes are beggars.  But, Euripides, on my knees
  I beseech you, give me the tatters of some old piece; for I have to
  treat the Chorus to a long speech, and if I do it ill it is all over
  with me.
 
  f(1) Having been lamed, it is of course implied, by tumbling from the lofty
  apparatus on which the Author sat perched to write his tragedies.
 
 EURIPIDES
  What rags do you prefer?  Those in which I rigged out Aeneus(1) on
  the stage, that unhappy, miserable old man?
 
  f(1) Euripides delighted, or was supposed by his critic Aristophanes to
  delight, in the representation of misery and wretchedness on the stage.
  'Aeneus,' 'Phoenix,' 'Philoctetes,' 'Bellerophon,' 'Telephus,' Ino' are titles
  of six tragedies of his in this genre of which fragments are extant.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, I want those of some hero still more unfortunate.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Of Phoenix, the blind man?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, not of Phoenix, you have another hero more unfortunate than him.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Now, what tatters DOES he want?  Do you mean those of the beggar
  Philoctetes?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, of another far more the mendicant.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Is it the filthy dress of the lame fellow, Bellerophon?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, 'tis not Bellerophon; he, whom I mean, was not only lame and a
  beggar, but boastful and a fine speaker.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Ah! I know, it is Telephus, the Mysian.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Yes, Telephus.  Give me his rags, I beg of you.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Slave! give him Telephus' tatters; they are on top of the rags
  of Thyestes and mixed with those of Ino.
 
 SLAVE
  Catch hold! here they are.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh! Zeus, whose eye pierces everywhere and embraces all, permit me
  to assume the most wretched dress on earth.  Euripides, cap your
  kindness by giving me the little Mysian hat, that goes so well with
  these tatters.  I must to-day have the look of a beggar; "be what I am,
  but not appear to be";(1) the audience will know well who I am, but
  the Chorus will be fools enough not to, and I shall dupe 'em with my
  subtle phrases.
 
  f(1)
  Line borrowed from Euripides.  A great number of verses are similarly
  parodied in this scene.
 
 EURIPIDES
  I will give you the hat; I love the clever tricks of an ingenious
  brain like yours.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Rest happy, and may it befall Telephus as I wish.  Ah!  I already
  feel myself filled with quibbles.  But I must have a beggar's staff.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Here you are, and now get you gone from this porch.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, my soul!  You see how you are driven from this house, when I
  still need so many accessories.  But let us be pressing, obstinate,
  importunate.  Euripides, give me a little basket with a lamp alight inside.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Whatever do you want such a thing as that for?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I do not need it, but I want it all the same.
 
 EURIPIDES
  You importune me; get you gone!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Alas! may the gods grant you a destiny as brilliant as your
  mother's.(1)
 
  f(1) Report said that Euripides' mother had sold vegetables on the market.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Leave me in peace.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, just a little broken cup.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Take it and go and hang yourself.  What a tiresome fellow!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! you do not know all the pain you cause me.  Dear, good
  Euripides, nothing beyond a small pipkin stoppered with a sponge.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Miserable man!  You are robbing me of an entire tragedy.(1) Here, take it
  and be off.
 
  f(1) Aristophanes means, of course, to imply that the whole talent of
  Euripides lay in these petty details of stage property.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I am going, but, great gods! I need one thing more; unless I
  have it, I am a dead man.  Hearken, my little Euripides, only give me
  this and I go, never to return.  For pity's sake, do give me a few
  small herbs for my basket.
 
 EURIPIDES
  You wish to ruin me then.  Here, take what you want; but it is
  all over with my pieces!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I won't ask another thing; I'm going.  I am too importunate and
  forget that I rouse against me the hate of kings.--Ah! wretch that I am!
  I am lost!  I have forgotten one thing, without which all the rest is
  as nothing.  Euripides, my excellent Euripides, my dear little Euripides,
  may I die if I ask you again for the smallest present; only one, the last,
  absolutely the last; give me some of the chervil your mother left
  you in her will.
 
 EURIPIDES
  Insolent hound!  Slave, lock the door!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, my soul!  I must go away without the chervil.  Art thou
  sensible of the dangerous battle we are about to engage upon in
  defending the Lacedaemonians?  Courage, my soul, we must plunge
  into the midst of it.  Dost thou hesitate and art thou fully steeped
  in Euripides?  That's right! do not falter, my poor heart, and let us risk
  our head to say what we hold for truth.  Courage and boldly to
  the front.  I wonder I am so brave.
 
 CHORUS
  What do you purport doing?  what are you going to say?  What an
  impudent fellow!  what a brazen heart!  to dare to stake his head and
  uphold an opinion contrary to that of us all!  And he does not
  tremble to face this peril.  Come, it is you who desired it, speak!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Spectators, be not angered if, although I am a beggar, I dare in
  a Comedy to speak before the people of Athens of the public weal;
  Comedy too can sometimes discern what is right.  I shall not please,
  but I shall say what is true.  Besides, Cleon shall not be able to accuse
  me of attacking Athens before strangers;(1) we are by ourselves at the
  festival of the Lenaea; the period when our allies send us their tribute
  and their soldiers is not yet.  Here is only the pure wheat
  without chaff; as to the resident strangers settled among us, they
  and the citizens are one, like the straw and the ear.
 
 I detest the Lacedaemonians with all my heart, and may Posidon,
  the god of Taenarus,(2) cause an earthquake and overturn their dwellings!
  My vines also have been cut.  But come (there are only friends who
  hear me), why accuse the Laconians of all our woes?  Some men (I do not
  say the city, note particularly that I do not say the city), some
  wretches, lost in vices, bereft of honour, who were not even
  citizens of good stamp, but strangers, have accused the Megarians of
  introducing their produce fraudulently, and not a cucumber, a leveret,
  a suck(l)ing pig, a clove of garlic, a lump of salt was seen without its
  being said, "Halloa!  these come from Megara," and their being
  instantly confiscated.  Thus far the evil was not serious and we were
  the only sufferers.  But now some young drunkards go to Megara and
  carry off the courtesan Simaetha; the Megarians, hurt to the quick, run
  off in turn with two harlots of the house of Aspasia; and so for three
  gay women Greece is set ablaze.  Then Pericles, aflame with ire on his
  Olympian height, let loose the lightning, caused the thunder to
  roll, upset Greece and passed an edict, which ran like the song, "That
  the Megarians be banished both from our land and from our markets
  and from the sea and from the continent."(3) Meanwhile the Megarians,
  who were beginning to die of hunger, begged the Lacedaemonians to bring
  about the abolition of the decree, of which those harlots were the
  cause; several times we refused their demand; and from that time there
  was horrible clatter of arms everywhere.  You will say that Sparta
  was wrong, but what should she have done?  Answer that.  Suppose that
  a Lacedaemonian had seized a little Seriphian(4) dog on any pretext and
  had sold it, would you have endured it quietly?  Far from it, you would
  at once have sent three hundred vessels to sea, and what an uproar
  there would have been through all the city!  there 'tis a band of
  noisy soldiery, here a brawl about the election of a Trierarch;
  elsewhere pay is being distributed, the Pallas figure-heads are
  being regilded, crowds are surging under the market porticos,
  encumbered with wheat that is being measured, wine-skins,
  oar-leathers, garlic, olives, onions in nets; everywhere are chaplets,
  sprats, flute-girls, black eyes; in the arsenal bolts are being
  noisily driven home, sweeps are being made and fitted with leathers;
  we hear nothing but the sound of whistles, of flutes and fifes to
  encourage the work-folk.  That is what you assuredly would have done,
  and would not Telephus have done the same?  So I come to my general
  conclusion; we have no common sense.
 
  f(1) 'The Babylonians' had been produced at a time of year when Athens
  was crowded with strangers; 'The Acharnians,' on the contrary, was played
  in December.
 
  f(2) Sparta had been menaced with an earthquake in 427 B.C.  Posidon
  was 'The Earthshaker,' god of earthquakes, as well as of the sea.
 
  f(3) A song by Timocreon the Rhodian, the words of which were practically
  identical with Pericles' decree.
 
  f(4) A small and insignificant island, one of the Cyclades, allied with
  the Athenians, like months of these islands previous to and during
  the first part of the Peloponnesian War.
 
 FIRST SEMI-CHORUS
  Oh! wretch! oh! infamous man!  You are naught but a beggar and
  yet you dare to talk to us like this!  you insult their worships
  the informers!
 
 SECOND SEMI-CHORUS
  By Posidon! he speaks the truth; he has not lied in a single detail.
 
 FIRST SEMI-CHORUS
  But though it be true, need he say it?  But you'll have no great
  cause to be proud of your insolence!
 
 SECOND SEMI-CHORUS
  Where are you running to?  Don't you move; if you strike this man,
  I shall be at you.
 
 FIRST SEMI-CHORUS
  Lamachus, whose glance flashes lightning, whose plume
  petrifies thy foes, help!  Oh! Lamachus, my friend, the hero of my
  tribe and all of you, both officers and soldiers, defenders of our
  walls, come to my aid; else is it all over with me!
 
 LAMACHUS
  Whence comes this cry of battle?  where must I bring my aid?
  where must I sow dread?  who wants me to uncase my dreadful Gorgon's
  head?(1)
 
  f(1) A figure of Medusa's head, forming the centre of Lamachus' shield.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, Lamachus, great hero!  Your plumes and your cohorts terrify me.
 
 CHORUS
  This man, Lamachus, incessantly abuses Athens.
 
 LAMACHUS
  You are but a mendicant and you dare to use language of this sort?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, brave Lamachus, forgive a beggar who speaks at hazard.
 
 LAMACHUS
  But what have you said?  Let us hear.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I know nothing about it; the sight of weapons makes me dizzy.
  Oh! I adjure you, take that fearful Gorgon somewhat farther away.
 
 LAMACHUS
  There.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Now place it face downwards on the ground.
 
 LAMACHUS
  It is done.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Give me a plume out of your helmet.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Here is a feather.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And hold my head while I vomit; the plumes have turned my stomach.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Hah! what are you proposing to do?  do you want to make yourself
  vomit with this feather?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Is it a feather?  what bird's?  a braggart's?
 
 LAMACHUS
  Ah! ah! I will rip you open.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, no, Lamachus!  Violence is out of place here!  But as you are so
  strong, why did you not circumcise me?  You have all the tools you want
  for the operation there.
 
 LAMACHUS
  A beggar dares thus address a general!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  How?  Am I a beggar?
 
 LAMACHUS
  What are you then?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Who am I?  A good citizen, not ambitious; a soldier, who has fought
  well since the outbreak of the war, whereas you are but a vile
  mercenary.
 
 LAMACHUS
  They elected me...
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Yes, three cuckoos did!(1) If I have concluded peace, 'twas
  disgust that drove me; for I see men with hoary heads in the ranks and
  young fellows of your age shirking service.  Some are in Thrace getting
  an allowance of three drachmae, such fellows as Tisamenophoenippus
  and Panurgipparchides.  The others are with Chares or in Chaonia, men
  like Geretotheodorus and Diomialazon; there are some of the same
  kidney, too, at Camarina and at Gela,(2) the laughing-stock of all and sundry.
 
  f(1) Indicates the character of his election, which was arranged, so
  Aristophanes implies, by his partisans.
 
  f(2) Town in Sicily.  There is a pun on the name Gela and 'ridiculous'
  which it is impossible to keep in English.  Apparently the Athenians
  had sent embassies to all parts of the Greek world to arrange treaties
  of alliance in view of the struggle with the Lacedaemonians; but only
  young debauchees of aristocratic connections had been chosen as envoys.
 
 LAMACHUS
  They were elected.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And why do you always receive your pay, when none of these
  others ever gets any?  Speak, Marilades, you have grey hair; well then,
  have you ever been entrusted with a mission?  See! he shakes his
  head.  Yet he is an active as well as a prudent man.  And you, Dracyllus,
  Euphorides or Prinides, have you knowledge of Ecbatana or
  Chaonia?  You say no, do you not?  Such offices are good for the son
  of Caesyra(1) and Lamachus, who, but yesterday ruined with debt, never
  pay their shot, and whom all their friends avoid as foot passengers
  dodge the folks who empty their slops out of window.
 
  f(1) A contemporary orator apparently, otherwise unknown.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Oh! in freedom's name! are such exaggerations to be borne?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Lamachus is well content; no doubt he is well paid, you know.
 
 LAMACHUS
  But I propose always to war with the Peloponnesians, both at sea, on land
  and everywhere to make them tremble, and trounce them soundly.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  For my own part, I make proclamation to all Peloponnesians,
  Megarians and Boeotians, that to them my markets are open; but I debar
  Lamachus from entering them.
 
 CHORUS
  Convinced by this man's speech, the folk have changed their view
  and approve him for having concluded peace.  But let us prepare for the
  recital of the parabasis.(1)
 
 Never since our poet presented Comedies, has he praised himself
  upon the stage; but, having been slandered by his enemies amongst
  the volatile Athenians, accused of scoffing at his country and of
  insulting the people, to-day he wishes to reply and regain for himself
  the inconstant Athenians.  He maintains that he has done much that is
  good for you; if you no longer allow yourselves to be too much
  hoodwinked by strangers or seduced by flattery, if in politics you are
  no longer the ninnies you once were, it is thanks to him.  Formerly,
  when delegates from other cities wanted to deceive you, they had but
  to style you, "the people crowned with violets," and at the word
  "violets" you at once sat erect on the tips of your bums.  Or if, to
  tickle your vanity, someone spoke of "rich and sleek Athens," in
  return for that "sleekness" he would get all, because he spoke of you
  as he would have of anchovies in oil.  In cautioning you against
  such wiles, the poet has done you great service as well as
  in forcing you to understand what is really the democratic
  principle.  Thus, the strangers, who came to pay their tributes,
  wanted to see this great poet, who had dared to speak the truth to
  Athens.  And so far has the fame of his boldness reached that one day
  the Great King, when questioning the Lacedaemonian delegates, first
  asked them which of the two rival cities was the superior at sea,
  and then immediately demanded at which it was that the comic poet
  directed his biting satire.  "Happy that city," he added, "if it
  listens to his counsel; it will grow in power, and its victory is
  assured." This is why the Lacedaemonians offer you peace, if you
  will cede them Aegina; not that they care for the isle, but they
  wish to rob you of your poet.(2) As for you, never lose him, who will
  always fight for the cause of justice in his Comedies; he promises you
  that his precepts will lead you to happiness, though he uses neither
  flattery, nor bribery, nor intrigue, nor deceit; instead of loading
  you with praise, he will point you to the better way.  I scoff at
  Cleon's tricks and plotting; honesty and justice shall fight my cause;
  never will you find me a political poltroon, a prostitute to the
  highest bidder.
 
 I invoke thee, Acharnian Muse, fierce and fell as the devouring fire;
  sudden as the spark that bursts from the crackling oaken coal when
  roused by the quickening fan to fry little fishes, while others knead
  the dough or whip the sharp Thasian pickle with rapid hand, so break
  forth, my Muse, and inspire thy tribesmen with rough, vigorous,
  stirring strains.
 
 We others, now old men and heavy with years, we reproach the city;
  so many are the victories we have gained for the Athenian fleets
  that we well deserve to be cared for in our declining life; yet far
  from this, we are ill-used, harassed with law-suits, delivered over to
  the scorn of stripling orators.  Our minds and bodies being ravaged
  with age, Posidon should protect us, yet we have no other support than
  a staff.  When standing before the judge, we can scarcely stammer forth
  the fewest words, and of justice we see but its barest shadow, whereas
  the accuser, desirous of conciliating the younger men, overwhelms us
  with his ready rhetoric; he drags us before the judge, presses us with
  questions, lays traps for us; the onslaught troubles, upsets and ruins
  poor old Tithonus, who, crushed with age, stands tongue-tied;
  sentenced to a fine,(3) he weeps, he sobs and says to his friend,
  "This fine robs me of the last trifle that was to have bought my coffin."
 
 Is this not a scandal?  What! the clepsydra(4) is to kill the
  white-haired veteran, who, in fierce fighting, has so oft covered
  himself with glorious sweat, whose valour at Marathon saved the
  country!  'Twas we who pursued on the field of Marathon,
  whereas now 'tis wretches who pursue us to the death and crush us!
  What would Marpsias reply to this?(5) What an injustice that a man,
  bent with age like Thucydides, should be brow-beaten by this braggart
  advocate, Cephisodemus,(6) who is as savage as the Scythian desert
  he was born in! Is it not to convict him from the outset?  I wept tears
  of pity when I saw an Archer(7) maltreat this old man, who, by Ceres,
  when he was young and the true Thucydides, would not have permitted
  an insult from Ceres herself!  At that date he would have floored
  ten orators, he would have terrified three thousand Archers with his
  shouts; he would have pierced the whole line of the enemy with his shafts.
  Ah!  but if you will not leave the aged in peace, decree that the advocates
  be matched; thus the old man will only be confronted with a toothless
  greybeard, the young will fight with the braggart, the ignoble
  with the son of Clinias;(8) make a law that in the future, the old man
  can only be summoned and convicted at the courts by the aged
  and the young man by the youth.
 
  f(1) The 'parabasis' in the Old Comedy was a sort of address or topical
  harangue addressed directly by the poet, speaking by the Chorus,
  to the audience.  It was nearly always political in bearing, and the subject
  of the particular piece was for the time being set aside altogether.
 
  f(2) It will be remembered that Aristophanes owned land in Aegina.
 
  f(3) Everything was made the object of a law-suit in Athens.  The old
  soldiers, inexpert at speaking, often lost the day.
 
  f(4) A water-clock used to limit the length of speeches in the courts.
 
  f(5) A braggart speaker, fiery and pugnacious.
 
  f(6) Cephisodemus was an Athenian, but through his mother possessed
  Scythian blood.
 
  f(7) The city of Athens was policed by Scythian archers.
 
  f(8) Alcibiades.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  These are the confines of my market-place.  All Peloponnesians,
  Megarians, Boeotians, have the right to come and trade here,
  provided they sell their wares to me and not to Lamachus.  As
  market-inspectors I appoint these three whips of Leprean(1) leather,
  chosen by lot.  Warned away are all informers and all men of Phasis.(2)
  They are bringing me the pillar on which the treaty is inscribed(3) and
  I shall erect it in the centre of the market, well in sight of all.
 
  f(1) The leather market was held in Lepros, outside the city.
 
  f(2) Mean an informer ((from the Greek) 'to denounce').
 
  f(3) According to the Athenian custom.
 
 A MEGARIAN
  Hail! market of Athens, beloved of Megarians.  Let Zeus, the patron
  of friendship, witness, I regretted you as a mother mourns her son.
  Come, poor little daughters of an unfortunate father, try to find
  something to eat; listen to me with the full heed of an empty belly.
  Which would you prefer?  To be sold or to cry with hunger?
 
 DAUGHTERS
  To be sold, to be sold!
 
 MEGARIAN
  That is my opinion too.  But who would make so sorry a deal as to
  buy you?  Ah! I recall me a Megarian trick; I am going to disguise
  you as little porkers, that I am offering for sale.  Fit your hands
  with these hoofs and take care to appear the issue of a sow of good
  breed, for, if I am forced to take you back to the house, by Hermes!
  you will suffer cruelly of hunger!  Then fix on these snouts and cram
  yourselves into this sack.  Forget not to grunt and to say wee-wee like
  the little pigs that are sacrificed in the Mysteries.  I must summon
  Dicaeopolis.  Where is be?  Dicaeopolis, do you want to buy
  some nice little porkers?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Who are you?  a Megarian?
 
 MEGARIAN
  I have come to your market.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Well, how are things at Megara?(1)
 
  f(1) Megara was allied to Sparta and suffered during the war more than
  any other city because of its proximity to Athens.
 
 MEGARIAN
  We are crying with hunger at our firesides.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  The fireside is jolly enough with a piper.  But what else is
  doing at Megara, eh?
 
 MEGARIAN
  What else?  When I left for the market, the authorities were taking
  steps to let us die in the quickest manner.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  That is the best way to get you out of all your troubles.
 
 MEGARIAN
  True.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What other news of Megara?  What is wheat selling at?
 
 MEGARIAN
  With us it is valued as highly as the very gods in heaven!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Is it salt that you are bringing?
 
 MEGARIAN
  Are you not holding back the salt?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  'Tis garlic then?
 
 MEGARIAN
  What! garlic!  do you not at every raid grub up the ground with your
  pikes to pull out every single head?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What DO you bring then?
 
 MEGARIAN
  Little sows, like those they immolate at the Mysteries.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! very well, show me them.
 
 MEGARIAN
  They are very fine; feel their weight.  See! how fat and fine.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But what is this?
 
 MEGARIAN
  A SOW, for a certainty.(1)
 
  f(1) Throughout this whole scene there is an obscene play upon (a) word
  which means in Greek both 'sow' and 'a woman's organs of generation.'
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  You say a sow!  Of what country, then?
 
 MEGARIAN
   From Megara.  What! is it not a sow then?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, I don't believe it is.
 
 MEGARIAN
  This is too much!  what an incredulous man!  He says 'tis not a sow;
  but we will stake, an you will, a measure of salt ground up with
  thyme, that in good Greek this is called a sow and nothing else.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But a sow of the human kind.
 
 MEGARIAN
  Without question, by Diocles! of my own breed!  Well! What think
  you?  will you hear them squeal?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Well, yes, I' faith, I will.
 
 MEGARIAN
  Cry quickly, wee sowlet; squeak up, hussy, or by Hermes! I take you
  back to the house.
 
 GIRL
  Wee-wee, wee-wee!
 
 MEGARIAN
  Is that a little sow, or not?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Yes, it seems so; but let it grow up, and it will be a fine fat bitch.
 
 MEGARIAN
  In five years it will be just like its mother.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But it cannot be sacrificed.
 
 MEGARIAN
  And why not?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  It has no tail.(1)
 
  f(1) Sacrificial victims were bound to be perfect in every part; an animal,
  therefore, without a tail could not be offered.
 
 MEGARIAN
  Because it is quite young, but in good time it will have a big one,
  thick and red.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  The two are as like as two peas.
 
 MEGARIAN
  They are born of the same father and mother; let them be fattened,
  let them grow their bristles, and they will be the finest sows you can
  offer to Aphrodite.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But sows are not immolated to Aphrodite.
 
 MEGARIAN
  Not sows to Aphrodite!  Why, 'tis the only goddess to whom they
  are offered!  the flesh of my sows will be excellent on the spit.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Can they eat alone?  They no longer need their mother!
 
 MEGARIAN
  Certainly not, nor their father.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What do they like most?
 
 MEGARIAN
  Whatever is given them; but ask for yourself.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Speak! little sow.
 
 DAUGHTER
  Wee-wee, wee-wee!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Can you eat chick-pease?
 
 DAUGHTER
  Wee-wee, wee-wee, wee-wee!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And Attic figs?
 
 DAUGHTER
  Wee-wee, wee-wee!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What sharp squeaks at the name of figs.  Come, let some figs be
  brought for these little pigs.  Will they eat them?  Goodness! how
  they munch them, what a grinding of teeth, mighty Heracles! I
  believe those pigs hail from the land of the Voracians.  But surely
  'tis impossible they have bolted all the figs!
 
 MEGARIAN
  Yes, certainly, bar this one that I took from them.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! what funny creatures!  For what sum will you sell them?
 
 MEGARIAN
  I will give you one for a bunch of garlic, and the other, if you
  like, for a quart measure of salt.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I buy them of you.  Wait for me here.
 
 MEGARIAN
  The deal is done.  Hermes, god of good traders, grant I may sell
  both my wife and my mother in the same way!
 
 AN INFORMER
  Hi! fellow, what countryman are you?
 
 MEGARIAN
  I am a pig-merchant from Megara.
 
 INFORMER
  I shall denounce both your pigs and yourself as public enemies.
 
 MEGARIAN
  Ah! here our troubles begin afresh!
 
 INFORMER
  Let go that sack.  I will punish your Megarian lingo!(1)
 
  f(1) The Megarians used the Doric dialect.
 
 MEGARIAN
  Dicaeopolis, Dicaeopolis, they want to denounce me.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Who dares do this thing?  Inspectors, drive out the informers.
  Ah! you offer to enlighten us without a lamp!(1)
 
  f(1) A play upon (a) word which both means 'to light' and 'to denounce.'
 
 INFORMER
  What! I may not denounce our enemies?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Have a care for yourself, if you don't go off pretty quick to denounce
  elsewhere.
 
 MEGARIAN
  What a plague to Athens!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Be reassured, Megarian.  Here is the price for your two swine,
  the garlic and the salt.  Farewell and much happiness!
 
 MEGARIAN
  Ah! we never have that amongst us.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Well! may the inopportune wish apply to myself.
 
 MEGARIAN
  Farewell, dear little sows, and seek, far from your father, to
  munch your bread with salt, if they give you any.
 
 CHORUS
  Here is a man truly happy.  See how everything succeeds to his
  wish.  Peacefully seated in his market, he will earn his living; woe to
  Ctesias,(1) and all other informers who dare to enter there!  You will not
  be cheated as to the value of wares, you will not again see Prepis(2)
  wiping his foul rump, nor will Cleonymus(3) jostle you; you will take your
  walks, clothed in a fine tunic, without meeting Hyperbolus(4) and his
  unceasing quibblings, without being accosted on the public place by
  any importunate fellow, neither by Cratinus,(5) shaven in the fashion
  of the debauchees, nor by this musician, who plagues us with his silly
  improvisations, Artemo, with his arm-pits stinking as foul as a goat,
  like his father before him.  You will not be the butt of the villainous
  Pauson's(6) jeers, nor of Lysistratus,(7) the disgrace
  of the Cholargian deme, who is the incarnation of all the vices,
  and endures cold and hunger more than thirty days in the month.
 
  f(1) An informer (sycophant), otherwise unknown.
 
  f(2) A debauchee of vile habits; a pathic.
 
  f(3) Mentioned above; he was as proud as he was cowardly.
 
  f(4) An Athenian general, quarrelsome and litigious, and an Informer
  into the bargain.
 
  f(5) A comic poet of vile habits.
 
  f(6) A painter.
 
  f(7) A debauchee, a gambler, and always in extreme poverty.
 
 A BOEOTIAN
  By Heracles! my shoulder is quite black and blue.  Ismenias, put
  the penny-royal down there very gently, and all of you, musicians
  from Thebes, pipe with your bone flutes into a dog's rump.(1)
 
  f(1) This kind of flute had a bellows, made of dog-skin, much like
  the bagpipes of to-day.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Enough, enough, get you gone.  Rascally hornets, away with you!
  Whence has sprung this accursed swarm of Charis(1) fellows which comes
  assailing my door?
 
  f(1) A flute-player, mentioned above.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  Ah!  by Iolas!(1) Drive them off, my dear host, you will please me
  immensely; all the way from Thebes, they were there piping behind me
  and have completely stripped my penny-royal of its blossom.
  But will you buy anything of me, some chickens or some locusts?
 
  f(1) A hero, much honoured in Thebes; nephew of Heracles.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! good day, Boeotian, eater of good round loaves.(1) What do you
  bring?
 
  f(1) A form of bread peculiar to Boeotia.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  All that is good in Boeotia, marjoram, penny-royal, rush-mats,
  lamp-wicks, ducks, jays, woodcocks, water-fowl, wrens, divers.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  'Tis a very hail of birds that beats down on my market.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  I also bring geese, hares, foxes, moles, hedgehogs, cats, lyres,
  martins, otters and eels from the Copaic lake.(1)
 
  f(1) A lake in Boeotia.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! my friend, you, who bring me the most delicious of fish,
  let me salute your eels.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  Come, thou, the eldest of my fifty Copaic virgins, come and
  complete the joy of our host.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh! my well-beloved, thou object of my long regrets, thou art here
  at last then, thou, after whom the comic poets sigh, thou, who art
  dear to Morychus.(1)  Slaves, hither with the stove and the bellows.
  Look at this charming eel, that returns to us after six long years
  of absence.(2)  Salute it, my children; as for myself, I will supply
  coal to do honour to the stranger.  Take it into my house; death itself
  could not separate me from her, if cooked with beet leaves.
 
  f(1) He was the Lucullus of Athens.
 
  f(2) This again fixes the date of the presentation of 'The
  Acharnians' to 436 B.C., the sixth  year of the War, since the
  beginning of which Boeotia had been closed to the Athenians.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  And what will you give me in return?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  It will pay for your market dues.  And as to the rest, what do
  you wish to sell me?
 
 BOEOTIAN
  Why, everything.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  On what terms?  For ready-money or in wares from these parts?
 
 BOEOTIAN
  I would take some Athenian produce, that we have not got
  in Boeotia.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Phaleric anchovies, pottery?
 
 BOEOTIAN
  Anchovies, pottery?  But these we have.  I want produce that is
  wanting with us and that is plentiful here.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! I have the very thing; take away an Informer, packed up
  carefully as crockery-ware.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  By the twin gods!  I should earn big money, if I took one; I
  would exhibit him as an ape full of spite.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Hah! here we have Nicarchus,(1) who comes to denounce you.
 
  f(1) An informer.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  How small he is!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But in his case the whole is one mass of ill-nature.
 
 NICARCHUS
  Whose are these goods?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Mine; they come from Boeotia, I call Zeus to witness.
 
 NICARCHUS
  I denounce them as coming from an enemy's country.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  What! you declare war against birds?
 
 NICARCHUS
  And I am going to denounce you too.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  What harm have I done you?
 
 NICARCHUS
  I will say it for the benefit of those that listen; you introduce lamp-wicks
  from an enemy's country.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Then you go as far as denouncing a wick.
 
 NICARCHUS
  It needs but one to set an arsenal afire.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  A wick set an arsenal ablaze!  But how, great gods?
 
 NICARCHUS
  Should a Boeotian attach it to an insect's wing, and, taking
  advantage of a violent north wind, throw it by means of a tube into
  the arsenal and the fire once get hold of the vessels, everything
  would soon be devoured by the flames.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! wretch! an insect and a wick devour everything!
  (HE STRIKES HIM.)
 
 NICARCHUS (TO THE CHORUS)
  You will bear witness, that he mishandles me.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Shut his mouth.  Give me some hay; I am going to pack him up like
  a vase, that he may not get broken on the road.
 
 CHORUS
  Pack up your goods carefully, friend; that the stranger may not
  break it when taking it away.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I shall take great care with it, for one would say he is cracked already;
  he rings with a false note, which the gods abhor.
 
 CHORUS
  But what will be done with him?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  This is a vase good for all purposes; it will be used as a vessel for holding
  all foul things, a mortar for pounding together law-suits, a lamp
  for spying upon accounts, and as a cup for the mixing up and poisoning
  of everything.
 
 CHORUS
  None could ever trust a vessel for domestic use that has such a
  ring about it.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh! it is strong, my friend, and will never get broken, if care is
  taken to hang it head downwards.
 
 CHORUS
  There! it is well packed now!
 
 BOEOTIAN
  Marry, I will proceed to carry off my bundle.
 
 CHORUS
  Farewell, worthiest of strangers, take this informer, good for
  anything, and fling him where you like.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Bah! this rogue has given me enough trouble to pack!  Here!
  Boeotian, pick up your pottery.
 
 BOEOTIAN
  Stoop, Ismenias, that I may put it on your shoulder, and be very
  careful with it.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  You carry nothing worth having; however, take it, for you will
  profit by your bargain; the Informers will bring you luck.
 
 A SERVANT OF LAMACHUS
  Dicaeopolis!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What do you want crying this gait?
 
 SERVANT
  Lamachus wants to keep the Feast of Cups,(1) and I come by his order
  to bid you one drachma for some thrushes and three more for a Copaic eel.
 
  f(1) The second day of the Dionysia or feasts of Bacchus, kept in the month
  Anthesterion (February), and called the Anthesteria.  They lasted three
  days; the second being the Feast of Cups, the third the Feast of Pans.
  Vases, filled with grain of all kinds, were borne in procession and
  dedicated to Hermes.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And who is this Lamachus, who demands an eel?
 
 SERVANT
  'Tis the terrible, indefatigable Lamachus, who is always brandishing
  his fearful Gorgon's head and the three plumes which o'ershadow
  his helmet.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, no, he will get nothing, even though he gave me his buckler.
  Let him eat salt fish, while he shakes his plumes, and, if he comes
  here making any din, I shall call the inspectors.  As for myself,
  I shall take away all these goods; I go home on thrushes' wings
  and black-birds' pinions.(1)
 
  f(1) A parody on some verses from a lost poet.
 
 CHORUS
  You see, citizens, you see the good fortune which this man owes to
  his prudence, to his profound wisdom.  You see how, since he has
  concluded peace, he buys what is useful in the household and good to
  eat hot.  All good things flow towards him unsought.  Never will I welcome
  the god of war in my house; never shall he chant the "Harmodius" at
  my table;(1) he is a sot, who comes feasting with those who are
  overflowing with good things and brings all manner of mischief at his
  heels. He overthrows, ruins, rips open; 'tis vain to make him a
  thousand offers, "be seated, pray, drink this cup, proffered in all
  friendship," he burns our vine-stocks and brutally pours out the wine
  from our vineyards
  on the ground.  This man, on the other hand, covers his table with
  a thousand dishes; proud of his good fortunes, he has had these feathers
  cast before his door to show us how he lives.
 
  f(1) A feasting song in honour of Harmodius, the assassin of Hipparchus
  the Tyrant, son of Pisistratus.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh, Peace! companion of fair Aphrodite and of the sweet Graces,
  how charming are thy features and yet I never knew it!  Would that Eros
  might join me to thee, Eros, crowned with roses as Zeuxis(1) shows him to
  us!  Perhaps I seem somewhat old to you, but I am yet able to make you a
  threefold offering; despite my age I could plant a long row of vines for you;
  then beside these some tender cuttings from the fig; finally a young
  vine-stock, loaded with fruit and all around the field olive trees, which
  would furnish us with oil, wherewith to anoint us both at the New Moons.
 
  f(1) The celebrated painter, born in Heraclea, a contemporary
  of Aristophanes.
 
 HERALD
  List, ye people!  As was the custom of your forebears, empty a full
  pitcher of wine at the call of the trumpet; he, who first sees the
  bottom, shall get a wine-skin as round and plump as Ctesiphon's belly.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Women, children, have you not heard?  Faith! do you not heed the
  herald?  Quick! let the hares boil and roast merrily; keep them
  a-turning; withdraw them from the flame; prepare the chaplets;
  reach me the skewers that I may spit the thrushes.
 
 CHORUS
  I envy you your wisdom and even more your good cheer.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What then will you say when you see the thrushes roasting?
 
 CHORUS
  Ah! true indeed!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Slave! stir up the fire.
 
 CHORUS
  See, how he knows his business, what a perfect cook!  How well
  he understands the way to prepare a good dinner!
 
 A HUSBANDMAN
  Ah! woe is me!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Heracles! What have we here?
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  A most miserable man.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Keep your misery for yourself.
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  Ah! friend! since you alone are enjoying peace, grant me a part
  of your truce, were it but five years.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What has happened to you?
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  I am ruined; I have lost a pair of steers.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  How?
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  The Boeotians seized them at Phyle.(1)
 
  f(1) A deme and frontier fortress of Attica, near the Boeotian border.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! poor wretch! and yet you have not left off white?
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  Their dung made my wealth.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What can I do in the matter?
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  Crying for my beasts has lost me my eyesight.  Ah! if you care for poor
  Dercetes of Phyle, anoint mine eyes quickly with your balm of peace.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But, my poor fellow, I do not practise medicine.
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  Come, I adjure you; perhaps I shall recover my steers.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  'Tis impossible; away, go and whine to the disciples of Pittalus.(1)
 
  f(1) An Athenian physician of the day.
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  Grant me but one drop of peace; pour it into this reedlet.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  No, not a particle; go a-weeping elsewhere.
 
 HUSBANDMAN
  Oh! oh! oh! my poor beasts!
 
 CHORUS
  This man has discovered the sweetest enjoyment in peace; he will share it
  with none.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Pour honey over this tripe; set it before the fire to dry.
 
 CHORUS
  What lofty tones he uses!  Did you hear him?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Get the eels on the gridiron!
 
 CHORUS
  You are killing me with hunger; your smoke is choking your
  neighbours, and you split our ears with your bawling.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Have this fried and let it be nicely browned.
 
 A BRIDESMAID
  Dicaeopolis!  Dicaeopolis!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Who are you?
 
 BRIDESMAID
  A young bridegroom sends you these viands from the marriage feast.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Whoever he be, I thank him.
 
 BRIDESMAID
  And in return, he prays you to pour a glass of peace into this vase,
  that he may not have to go to the front and may stay at home
  to do his duty to his young wife.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Take back, take back your viands; for a thousand drachmae I
  would not give a drop of peace; but who are you, pray?
 
 BRIDESMAID
  I am the bridesmaid; she wants to say something to you
  from the bride privately.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Come, what do you wish to say?  (THE BRIDESMAID WHISPERS IN
  HIS EAR.)  Ah! what a ridiculous demand!  The bride burns with longing
  to keep by her her husband's weapon.  Come! \bring hither my truce; to
  her alone will I give some of it, for she is a woman, and, as such,
  should not suffer under the war.  Here, friend, reach hither your vial.
  And as to the manner of applying this balm, tell the bride, when a
  levy of soldiers is made to rub some in bed on her husband, where
  most needed.  There, slave, take away my truce!  Now, quick, bring me
  the wine-flagon, that I may fill up the drinking bowls!
 
 CHORUS
  I see a man, striding along apace, with knitted brows; he seems
  to us the bearer of terrible tidings.
 
 HERALD
  Oh! toils and battles, 'tis Lamachus!
 
 LAMACHUS
  What noise resounds around my dwelling, where shines the glint
  of arms.
 
 HERALD
  The Generals order you forthwith to take your battalions and
  your plumes, and, despite the snow, to go and guard our borders.
  They have learnt that a band of Boeotians intend taking advantage
  of the Feast of Cups to invade our country.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Ah! the Generals! they are numerous, but not good for much!
  It's cruel, not to be able to enjoy the feast!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Oh! warlike host of Lamachus!
 
 LAMACHUS
  Wretch! do you dare to jeer me?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Do you want to fight this four-winged Geryon?
 
 LAMACHUS
  Oh! oh! what fearful tidings!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! ah! I see another herald running up; what news does he bring me?
 
 HERALD
  Dicaeopolis!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What is the matter?
 
 HERALD
  Come quickly to the feast and bring your basket and your cup;
  'tis the priest of Bacchus who invites you.  But hasten, the guests
  have been waiting for you a long while.  All is ready--couches,
  tables, cushions, chaplets, perfumes, dainties and courtesans to boot;
  biscuits, cakes, sesame-bread, tarts, lovely dancing women, the sweetest
  charm of the festivity.  But come with all haste.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Oh! hostile gods!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  This is not astounding; you have chosen this huge, great ugly Gorgon's head
  for your patron.  You, shut the door, and let someone get ready the meal.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Slave! slave! my knapsack!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Slave! slave! a basket!
 
 LAMACHUS
  Take salt and thyme, slave, and don't forget the onions.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Get some fish for me; I cannot bear onions.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Slave, wrap me up a little stale salt meat in a fig-leaf.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And for me some good greasy tripe in a fig-leaf; I will have it cooked here.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Bring me the plumes for my helmet.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Bring me wild pigeons and thrushes.
 
 LAMACHUS
  How white and beautiful are these ostrich feathers!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  How fat and well browned is the flesh of this wood-pigeon!
 
 LAMACHUS
  Bring me the case for my triple plume.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
 
 Pass me over that dish of hare.
 
 LAMACHUS
  OH! the moths have eaten the hair of my crest.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I shall always eat hare before dinner.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Hi! friend! try not to scoff at my armor?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Hi! friend! will you kindly not stare at my thrushes.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Hi! friend! will you kindly not address me.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  I do not address you; I am scolding my slave.  Shall we wager and submit
  the matter to Lamachus, which of the two is the best to eat, a locust or
  a thrush?
 
 LAMACHUS
  Insolent hound!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  He much prefers the locusts.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Slave, unhook my spear and bring it to me.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Slave, slave, take the sausage from the fire and bring it to me.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Come, let me draw my spear from its sheath.  Hold it, slave, hold it tight.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And you, slave, grip, grip well hold of the skewer.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Slave, the bracings for my shield.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Pull the loaves out of the oven and bring me these bracings of my stomach.
 
 LAMACHUS
  My round buckler with the Gorgon's head.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  My round cheese-cake.
 
 LAMACHUS
  What clumsy wit!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  What delicious cheese-cake!
 
 LAMACHUS
  Pour oil on the buckler.  Hah! hah! I can see reflected there an old
  man who will be accused of cowardice.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Pour honey on the cake.  Hah! hah! I can see an old man who makes
  Lamachus of the Gorgon's head weep with rage.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Slave, full war armour.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Slave, my beaker; that is MY armour.
 
 LAMACHUS
  With this I hold my ground with any foe.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And I with this with any tosspot.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Fasten the strappings to the buckler; personally I shall carry the knapsack
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Pack the dinner well into the basket; personally I shall carry the cloak.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Slave, take up the buckler and let's be off.  It is snowing!  Ah!
  'tis a question of facing the winter.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Take up the basket, 'tis a question of getting to the feast.
 
 
 CHORUS
  We wish you both joy on your journeys, which differ so much.  One goes
  to mount guard and freeze, while the other will drink, crowned
  with flowers, and then sleep with a young beauty, who will excite
  him readily.
 
 I say it freely; may Zeus confound Antimachus, the poet-historian,
  the son of Psacas!  When Choregus at the Lenaea, alas! alas! he
  dismissed me dinnerless.  May I see him devouring with his eyes a
  cuttle-fish, just served, well cooked, hot and properly salted; and
  the moment that he stretches his hand to help himself, may a dog seize
  it and run off with it.  Such is my first wish.  I also hope for him a
  misfortune at night.  That returning all-fevered from horse practice,
  he may meet an Orestes,(1) mad with drink, who breaks open his head;
  that wishing to seize a stone, he, in the dark, may pick up a fresh stool,
  hurl his missile, miss aim and hit Cratinus.(2)
 
  f(1) An allusion to the paroxysms of rage, as represented in many tragedies
  familiar to an Athenian audience, of Orestes, the son of Agamemnon,
  after he had killed his mother.
 
  f(2) No doubt the comic poet, rival of Aristophanes.
 
 SLAVE OF LAMACHUS
  Slaves of Lamachus!  Water, water in a little pot!  Make it warm, get ready
  cloths, cerate greasy wool and bandages for his ankle.  In leaping a ditch,
  the master has hurt himself against a stake; he has dislocated and twisted
  his ankle, broken his head by falling on a stone, while his Gorgon shot far
  away from his buckler.  His mighty braggadocio plume rolled on the
  ground; at this sight he uttered these doleful words, "Radiant star, I gaze
  on thee for the last time; my eyes close to all light, I die." Having
  said this,
  he falls into the water, gets out again, meets some runaways and pursues
  the robbers with his spear at their backsides.(1) But here he comes,
  himself. Get the door open.
 
  f(1) Unexpected wind-up of the story.  Aristophanes intends to deride
  the boasting of Lamachus, who was always ascribing to himself most
  unlikely exploits.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Oh! heavens! oh! heavens! What cruel pain!  I faint, I tremble!  Alas!
  I die!  the foe's lance has struck me!  But what would hurt me most
  would be for Dicaeopolis to see me wounded thus and laugh
  at my ill-fortune.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS (ENTERS WITH TWO COURTESANS)
  Oh!  my gods!  what bosoms!  Hard as a quince!  Come, my treasures, give
  me voluptuous kisses!  Glue your lips to mine.  Haha! I was the first to
  empty my cup.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Oh! cruel fate! how I suffer!  accursed wounds!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Hah! hah! hail! Knight Lamachus!  (EMBRACES LAMACHUS.)
 
 LAMACHUS
  By the hostile gods!  (BITES DICAEOPOLIS.)
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Ah! Great gods!
 
 LAMACHUS
  Why do you embrace me?
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And why do you bite me?
 
 LAMACHUS
  'Twas a cruel score I was paying back!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Scores are not evened at the Feast of Cups!
 
 LAMACHUS
  Oh! Paean, Paean!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  But to-day is not the feast of Paean.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Oh! support my leg, do; ah! hold it tenderly, my friends!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  And you, my darlings, take hold of this, both of you!
 
 LAMACHUS
  This blow with the stone makes me dizzy; my sight grows dim.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  For myself, I want to get to bed; I am bursting with lustfulness,
  I want to be bundling in the dark.
 
 LAMACHUS
  Carry me to the surgeon Pittalus.
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Take me to the judges.  Where is the king of the feast?
  The wine-skin is mine!
 
 LAMACHUS
  That spear has pierced my bones; what torture I endure!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  You see this empty cup!  I triumph! I triumph!
 
 CHORUS
  Old man, I come at your bidding!  You triumph! you triumph!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Again I have brimmed my cup with unmixed wine and drained it at
  a draught!
 
 CHORUS
  You triumph then, brave champion; thine is the wine-skin!
 
 DICAEOPOLIS
  Follow me, singing "Triumph! Triumph!"
 
 CHORUS
  Aye!  we will sing of thee, thee and thy sacred wine-skin, and we all,
  as we follow thee, will repeat in thine honour, "Triumph, Triumph!"
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Derek Davis
 
 
 
 
 
 THE BIRDS
 
 By Aristophanes
 
 
 (Translator uncredited. Footnotes have been retained because they
 provide the meanings of Greek names, terms and ceremonies and explain
 puns and references otherwise lost in translation. Occasional Greek
 words in the footnotes have not been included. Footnote numbers,
 in brackets, start anew at (1) for each piece of dialogue, and each
 footnote follows immediately the dialogue to which it refers, labeled
 thus: f(1).
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 
 'The Birds' differs markedly from all the other Comedies of Aristophanes
 which have come down to us in subject and general conception. It is
 just an extravaganza pure and simple--a graceful, whimsical theme chosen
 expressly for the sake of the opportunities it afforded of bright,
 amusing dialogue, pleasing lyrical interludes, and charming displays of
 brilliant stage effects and pretty dresses. Unlike other plays of
 the same Author, there is here apparently no serious political MOTIF
 underlying the surface burlesque and buffoonery.
 
 Some critics, it is true, profess to find in it a reference to the
 unfortunate Sicilian Expedition, then in progress, and a prophecy of
 its failure and the political downfall of Alcibiades. But as a matter of
 fact, the whole thing seems rather an attempt on the dramatist's part
 to relieve the overwrought minds of his fellow-citizens, anxious and
 discouraged at the unsatisfactory reports from before Syracuse, by a
 work conceived in a lighter vein than usual and mainly unconnected with
 contemporary realities. The play was produced in the year 414 B.C., just
 when success or failure in Sicily hung in the balance, though already
 the outlook was gloomy, and many circumstances pointed to impending
 disaster. Moreover, the public conscience was still shocked and
 perturbed over the mysterious affair of the mutilation of the Hermae,
 which had occurred immediately before the sailing of the fleet, and
 strongly suspicious of Alcibiades' participation in the outrage. In
 spite of the inherent charm of the subject, the splendid outbursts of
 lyrical poetry in some of the choruses and the beauty of the scenery and
 costumes, 'The Birds' failed to win the first prize. This was acclaimed
 to a play of Aristophanes' rival, Amipsias, the title of which, 'The
 Comastoe,' or 'Revellers,' "seems to imply that the chief interest was
 derived from direct allusions to the outrage above mentioned and to the
 individuals suspected to have been engaged in it."
 
 For this reason, which militated against its immediate success, viz.
 the absence of direct allusion to contemporary politics--there are, of
 course, incidental references here and there to topics and personages
 of the day--the play appeals perhaps more than any other of our Author's
 productions to the modern reader. Sparkling wit, whimsical fancy, poetic
 charm, are of all ages, and can be appreciated as readily by ourselves
 as by an Athenian audience of two thousand years ago, though, of course,
 much is inevitably lost "without the important adjuncts of music,
 scenery, dresses and what we may call 'spectacle' generally, which we
 know in this instance to have been on the most magnificent scale."
 
 The plot is this. Euelpides and Pisthetaerus, two old Athenians,
 disgusted with the litigiousness, wrangling and sycophancy of their
 countrymen, resolve upon quitting Attica. Having heard of the fame of
 Epops (the hoopoe), sometime called Tereus, and now King of the Birds,
 they determine, under the direction of a raven and a jackdaw, to seek
 from him and his subject birds a city free from all care and strife.
 Arrived at the Palace of Epops, they knock, and Trochilus (the wren),
 in a state of great flutter, as he mistakes them for fowlers, opens the
 door and informs them that his Majesty is asleep. When he awakes, the
 strangers appear before him, and after listening to a long and eloquent
 harangue on the superior attractions of a residence among the birds,
 they propose a notable scheme of their own to further enhance its
 advantages and definitely secure the sovereignty of the universe now
 exercised by the gods of Olympus.
 
 The birds are summoned to meet in general council. They come flying up
 from all quarters of the heavens, and after a brief mis-understanding,
 during which they come near tearing the two human envoys to pieces, they
 listen to the exposition of the latters' plan. This is nothing less
 than the building of a new city, to be called Nephelococcygia, or
 'Cloud-cuckoo-town,' between earth and heaven, to be garrisoned and
 guarded by the birds in such a way as to intercept all communication of
 the gods with their worshippers on earth. All steam of sacrifice will
 be prevented from rising to Olympus, and the Immortals will very soon be
 starved into an acceptance of any terms proposed. The new Utopia is duly
 constructed, and the daring plan to secure the sovereignty is in a fair
 way to succeed. Meantime various quacks and charlatans, each with a
 special scheme for improving things, arrive from earth, and are one
 after the other exposed and dismissed. Presently arrives Prometheus,
 who informs Epops of the desperate straits to which the gods are by this
 time reduced, and advises him to push his claims and demand the hand
 of Basileia (Dominion), the handmaid of Zeus. Next an embassy from the
 Olympians appears on the scene, consisting of Heracles, Posidon and a
 god from the savage regions of the Triballians. After some disputation,
 it is agreed that all reasonable demands of the birds are to be granted,
 while Pisthetaerus is to have Basileia as his bride. The comedy winds up
 with the epithalamium in honour of the nuptials.
 
 
 
 
 THE BIRDS
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
      EUELPIDES
      PISTHETAERUS
      EPOPS (the Hoopoe)
      TROCHILUS, Servant to Epops
      PHOENICOPTERUS
      HERALDS
      A PRIEST
      A POET
      A PROPHET
      METON, a Geometrician
      A COMMISSIONER
      A DEALER IN DECREES
      IRIS
      A PARRICIDE
      CINESIAS, a Dithyrambic Bard
      AN INFORMER
      PROMETHEUS
      POSIDON
      TRIBALLUS
      HERACLES
      SLAVES OF PISTHETAERUS
      MESSENGERS
      CHORUS OF BIRDS
 
 
 SCENE: A wild, desolate tract of open country; broken rocks and
 brushwood occupy the centre of the stage.
 
 
 
 EUELPIDES (TO HIS JAY)(1) Do you think I should walk straight for yon
 tree?
 
 f(1) Euelpides is holding a jay and Pisthetaerus a crow; they are the
 guides who are to lead them to the kingdom of the birds.
 
 PISTHETAERUS (TO HIS CROW) Cursed beast, what are you croaking to
 me?... to retrace my steps?
 
 EUELPIDES Why, you wretch, we are wandering at random, we are exerting
 ourselves only to return to the same spot; 'tis labour lost.
 
 PISTHETAERUS To think that I should trust to this crow, which has made
 me cover more than a thousand furlongs!
 
 EUELPIDES And that I to this jay, which has torn every nail from my
 fingers!
 
 PISTHETAERUS If only I knew where we were....
 
 EUELPIDES Could you find your country again from here?
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, I feel quite sure I could not, any more than could
 Execestides(1) find his.
 
 f(1) A stranger who wanted to pass as an Athenian, although coming
 originally for a far-away barbarian country.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh dear! oh dear!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Aye, aye, my friend, 'tis indeed the road of "oh dears" we
 are following.
 
 EUELPIDES That Philocrates, the bird-seller, played us a scurvy trick,
 when he pretended these two guides could help us to find Tereus,(1) the
 Epops, who is a bird, without being born of one. He has indeed sold us
 this jay, a true son of Tharelides,(2) for an obolus, and this crow
 for three, but what can they do? Why, nothing whatever but bite and
 scratch!--What's the matter with you then, that you keep opening your
 beak? Do you want us to fling ourselves headlong down these rocks? There
 is no road that way.
 
 f(1) A king of Thrace, a son of Ares, who married Procne, the daughter
 of Pandion, King of Athens, whom he had assisted against the Megarians.
 He violated his sister-in-law, Philomela, and then cut out her tongue;
 she nevertheless managed to convey to her sister how she had been
 treated. They both agreed to kill Itys, whom Procne had borne to Tereus,
 and dished up the limbs of his own son to the father; at the end of
 the meal Philomela appeared and threw the child's head upon the table.
 Tereus rushed with drawn sword upon the princesses, but all the actors
 in this terrible scene were metamorph(o)sed. Tereus became an Epops
 (hoopoe), Procne a swallow, Philomela a nightingale, and Itys a
 goldfinch. According to Anacreon and Apollodorus it was Procne who
 became the nightingale and Philomela the swallow, and this is the
 version of the tradition followed by Aristophanes.
 
 f(2) An Athenian who had some resemblance to a jay--so says the
 scholiast, at any rate.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Not even the vestige of a track in any direction.
 
 EUELPIDES And what does the crow say about the road to follow?
 
 PISTHETAERUS By Zeus, it no longer croaks the same thing it did.
 
 EUELPIDES And which way does it tell us to go now?
 
 PISTHETAERUS It says that, by dint of gnawing, it will devour my
 fingers.
 
 EUELPIDES What misfortune is ours! we strain every nerve to get to the
 birds,(1) do everything we can to that end, and we cannot find our way!
 Yes, spectators, our madness is quite different from that of Sacas.
 He is not a citizen, and would fain be one at any cost; we, on the
 contrary, born of an honourable tribe and family and living in the midst
 of our fellow-citizens, we have fled from our country as hard as ever
 we could go. 'Tis not that we hate it; we recognize it to be great and
 rich, likewise that everyone has the right to ruin himself; but the
 crickets only chirrup among the fig-trees for a month or two, whereas
 the Athenians spend their whole lives in chanting forth judgments
 from their law-courts.(2) That is why we started off with a basket, a
 stew-pot and some myrtle boughs(3) and have come to seek a quiet country
 in which to settle. We are going to Tereus, the Epops, to learn from
 him, whether, in his aerial flights, he has noticed some town of this
 kind.
 
 f(1) Literally, 'to go to the crows,' a proverbial expression equivalent
 to our 'going to the devil.'
 
 f(2) They leave Athens because of their hatred of lawsuits and
 informers; this is the especial failing of the Athenians satirized in
 'The Wasps.'
 
 f(3) Myrtle boughs were used in sacrifices, and the founding of every
 colony was started by a sacrifice.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here! look!
 
 EUELPIDES What's the matter?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why, the crow has been pointing me to something up there
 for some time now.
 
 EUELPIDES And the jay is also opening its beak and craning its neck to
 show me I know not what. Clearly, there are some birds about here. We
 shall soon know, if we kick up a noise to start them.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Do you know what to do? Knock your leg against this rock.
 
 EUELPIDES And you your head to double the noise.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Well then use a stone instead; take one and hammer with it.
 
 EUELPIDES Good idea! Ho there, within! Slave! slave!
 
 PISTHETAERUS What's that, friend! You say, "slave," to summon Epops! It
 would be much better to shout, "Epops, Epops!"
 
 EUELPIDES Well then, Epops! Must I knock again? Epops!
 
 TROCHILUS Who's there? Who calls my master?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Apollo the Deliverer! what an enormous beak!(1)
 
 f(1) The actors wore masks made to resemble the birds they were supposed
 to represent.
 
 TROCHILUS Good god! they are bird-catchers.
 
 EUELPIDES The mere sight of him petrifies me with terror. What a
 horrible monster.
 
 TROCHILUS Woe to you!
 
 EUELPIDES But we are not men.
 
 TROCHILUS What are you, then?
 
 EUELPIDES I am the Fearling, an African bird.
 
 TROCHILUS You talk nonsense.
 
 EUELPIDES Well, then, just ask it of my feet.(1)
 
 f(1) Fear had had disastrous effects upon Euelpides' internal economy,
 and this his feet evidenced.
 
 TROCHILUS And this other one, what bird is it?
 
 PISTHETAERUS I? I am a Cackling,(1) from the land of the pheasants.
 
 f(1) The same mishap had occurred to Pisthetaerus.
 
 EUELPIDES But you yourself, in the name of the gods! what animal are
 you?
 
 TROCHILUS Why, I am a slave-bird.
 
 EUELPIDES Why, have you been conquered by a cock?
 
 TROCHILUS No, but when my master was turned into a peewit, he begged me
 to become a bird too, to follow and to serve him.
 
 EUELPIDES Does a bird need a servant, then?
 
 TROCHILUS 'Tis no doubt because he was a man. At times he wants to eat a
 dish of loach from Phalerum; I seize my dish and fly to fetch him some.
 Again he wants some pea-soup; I seize a ladle and a pot and run to get
 it.
 
 EUELPIDES This is, then, truly a running-bird.(1) Come, Trochilus, do us
 the kindness to call your master.
 
 f(1) The Greek word for a wren is derived from the same root as 'to
 run.'
 
 TROCHILUS Why, he has just fallen asleep after a feed of myrtle-berries
 and a few grubs.
 
 EUELPIDES Never mind; wake him up.
 
 TROCHILUS I an certain he will be angry. However, I will wake him to
 please you.
 
 PISTHETAERUS You cursed brute! why, I am almost dead with terror!
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! my god! 'twas sheer fear that made me lose my jay.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! you great coward! were you so frightened that you let
 go your jay?
 
 EUELPIDES And did you not lose your crow, when you fell sprawling on the
 ground? Pray tell me that.
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, no.
 
 EUELPIDES Where is it, then?
 
 PISTHETAERUS It has flown away.
 
 EUELPIDES Then you did not let it go? Oh! you brave fellow!
 
 EPOPS Open the forest,(1) that I may go out!
 
 f(1) No doubt there was some scenery to represent a forest. Besides,
 there is a pun intended. The words answering for 'forests' and 'door' in
 Greek only differ slightly in sound.
 
 EUELPIDES By Heracles! what a creature! what plumage! What means this
 triple crest?
 
 EPOPS Who wants me?
 
 EUELPIDES The twelve great gods have used you ill, meseems.
 
 EPOPS Are you chaffing me about my feathers? I have been a man,
 strangers.
 
 EUELPIDES 'Tis not you we are jeering at.
 
 EPOPS At what, then?
 
 EUELPIDES Why, 'tis your beak that looks so odd to us.
 
 EPOPS This is how Sophocles outrages me in his tragedies. Know, I once
 was Tereus.(1)
 
 f(1) Sophocles had written a tragedy about Tereus, in which, no doubt,
 the king finally appears as a hoopoe.
 
 EUELPIDES You were Tereus, and what are you now? a bird or a peacock?(1)
 
 f(1) (O)ne would expect the question to be "bird or man."--Are you a
 peacock? The hoopoe resembles the peacock inasmuch as both have crests.
 
 EPOPS I am a bird.
 
 EUELPIDES Then where are your feathers? For I don't see them.
 
 EPOPS They have fallen off.
 
 EUELPIDES Through illness?
 
 EPOPS No. All birds moult their feathers, you know, every winter, and
 others grow in their place. But tell me, who are you?
 
 EUELPIDES We? We are mortals.
 
 EPOPS From what country?
 
 EUELPIDES From the land of the beautiful galleys.(1)
 
 f(1) Athens.
 
 EPOPS Are you dicasts?(1)
 
 f(1) The Athenians were madly addicted to lawsuits. (See 'The Wasps.')
 
 EUELPIDES No, if anything, we are anti-dicasts.
 
 EPOPS Is that kind of seed sown among you?(1)
 
 f(1) As much as to say, 'Then you have such things as anti-dicasts?' And
 Euelpides practically replaces, 'Very few.'
 
 EUELPIDES You have to look hard to find even a little in our fields.
 
 EPOPS What brings you here?
 
 EUELPIDES We wish to pay you a visit.
 
 EPOPS What for?
 
 EUELPIDES Because you formerly were a man, like we are, formerly you
 had debts, as we have, formerly you did not want to pay them, like
 ourselves; furthermore, being turned into a bird, you have when flying
 seen all lands and seas. Thus you have all human knowledge as well as
 that of birds. And hence we have come to you to beg you to direct us to
 some cosy town, in which one can repose as if on thick coverlets.
 
 EPOPS And are you looking for a greater city than Athens?
 
 EUELPIDES No, not a greater, but one more pleasant to dwell in.
 
 EPOPS Then you are looking for an aristocratic country.
 
 EUELPIDES I? Not at all! I hold the son of Scellias in horror.(1)
 
 f(1) His name was Aristocrates; he was a general and commanded a fleet
 sent in aid of Corcyra.
 
 EPOPS But, after all, what sort of city would please you best?
 
 EUELPIDES A place where the following would be the most important
 business transacted.--Some friend would come knocking at the door quite
 early in the morning saying, "By Olympian Zeus, be at my house early,
 as soon as you have bathed, and bring your children too. I am giving a
 nuptial feast, so don't fail, or else don't cross my threshold when I am
 in distress."
 
 EPOPS Ah! that's what may be called being fond of hardships! And what
 say you?
 
 PISTHETAERUS My tastes are similar.
 
 EPOPS And they are?
 
 PISTHETAERUS I want a town where the father of a handsome lad will stop
 in the street and say to me reproachfully as if I had failed him, "Ah!
 Is this well done, Stilbonides! You met my son coming from the bath
 after the gymnasium and you neither spoke to him, nor embraced him, nor
 took him with you, nor ever once twitched his parts. Would anyone call
 you an old friend of mine?"
 
 EPOPS Ah! wag, I see you are fond of suffering. But there is a city of
 delights, such as you want. 'Tis on the Red Sea.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh, no. Not a sea-port, where some fine morning the
 Salaminian(1) galley can appear, bringing a writ-server along. Have you
 no Greek town you can propose to us?
 
 f(1) The State galley, which carried the officials of the Athenian
 republic to their several departments and brought back those whose time
 had expired; it was this galley that was sent to Sicily to fetch back
 Alcibiades, who was accused of sacrilege.
 
 EPOPS Why not choose Lepreum in Elis for your settlement?
 
 EUELPIDES By Zeus! I could not look at Lepreum without disgust, because
 of Melanthius.(1)
 
 f(1) A tragic poet, who was a leper; there is a play, of course, on the
 word Lepreum.
 
 EPOPS Then, again, there is the Opuntian, where you could live.
 
 EUELPIDES I would not be Opuntian(1) for a talent. But come, what is it
 like to live with the birds? You should know pretty well.
 
 f(1) An allusion to Opuntius, who was one-eyed.
 
 EPOPS Why, 'tis not a disagreeable life. In the first place, one has no
 purse.
 
 EUELPIDES That does away with much roguery.
 
 EPOPS For food the gardens yield us white sesame, myrtle-berries,
 poppies and mint.
 
 EUELPIDES Why, 'tis the life of the newly-wed indeed.(1)
 
 f(1) The newly-married ate a sesame-cake, decorated with garlands of
 myrtle, poppies and mint.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ha! I am beginning to see a great plan, which will transfer
 the supreme power to the birds, if you will but take my advice.
 
 EPOPS Take your advice? In what way?
 
 PISTHETAERUS In what way? Well, firstly, do not fly in all directions
 with open beak; it is not dignified. Among us, when we see a thoughtless
 man, we ask, "What sort of bird is this?" and Teleas answers, "'Tis
 a man who has no brain, a bird that has lost his head, a creature you
 cannot catch, for it never remains in any one place."
 
 EPOPS By Zeus himself! your jest hits the mark. What then is to be done?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Found a city.
 
 EPOPS We birds? But what sort of city should we build?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh, really, really! 'tis spoken like a fool! Look down.
 
 EPOPS I am looking.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Now look upwards.
 
 EPOPS I am looking.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Turn your head round.
 
 EPOPS Ah! 'twill be pleasant for me, if I end in twisting my neck!
 
 PISTHETAERUS What have you seen?
 
 EPOPS The clouds and the sky.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Very well! is not this the pole of the birds then?
 
 EPOPS How their pole?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Or, if you like it, the land. And since it turns and passes
 through the whole universe, it is called, 'pole.'(1) If you build and
 fortify it, you will turn your pole into a fortified city.(2) In this
 way you will reign over mankind as you do over the grasshoppers and
 cause the gods to die of rabid hunger.
 
 f(1) From (the word meaning) 'to turn.'
 
 f(2) The Greek words for 'pole' and 'city' only differ by a single
 letter.
 
 EPOPS How so?
 
 PISTHETAERUS The air is 'twixt earth and heaven. When we want to go to
 Delphi, we ask the Boeotians(1) for leave of passage; in the same way,
 when men sacrifice to the gods, unless the latter pay you tribute, you
 exercise the right of every nation towards strangers and don't allow the
 smoke of the sacrifices to pass through your city and territory.
 
 f(1) Boeotia separated Attica from Phocis.
 
 EPOPS By earth! by snares! by network!(1) I never heard of anything more
 cleverly conceived; and, if the other birds approve, I am going to build
 the city along with you.
 
 f(1) He swears by the powers that are to him dreadful.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Who will explain the matter to them?
 
 EPOPS You must yourself. Before I came they were quite ignorant, but
 since I have lived with them I have taught them to speak.
 
 PISTHETAERUS But how can they be gathered together?
 
 EPOPS Easily. I will hasten down to the coppice to waken my dear
 Procne!(1) as soon as they hear our voices, they will come to us hot
 wing.
 
 f(1) As already stated, according to the legend accepted by
 Aristophanes, it was Procne who was turned into the nightengale.
 
 PISTHETAERUS My dear bird, lose no time, I beg. Fly at once into the
 coppice and awaken Procne.
 
 EPOPS Chase off drowsy sleep, dear companion. Let the sacred hymn gush
 from thy divine throat in melodious strains; roll forth in soft cadence
 your refreshing melodies to bewail the fate of Itys,(1) which has been
 the cause of so many tears to us both. Your pure notes rise through
 the thick leaves of the yew-tree right up to the throne of Zeus, where
 Phoebus listens to you, Phoebus with his golden hair. And his ivory lyre
 responds to your plaintive accents; he gathers the choir of the gods and
 from their immortal lips rushes a sacred chant of blessed voices. (THE
 FLUTE IS PLAYED BEHIND THE SCENE.)
 
 f(1) The son of Tereus and Procne.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! by Zeus! what a throat that little bird possesses. He
 has filled the whole coppice with honey-sweet melody!
 
 EUELPIDES Hush!
 
 PISTHETAERUS What's the matter?
 
 EUELPIDES Will you keep silence?
 
 PISTHETAERUS What for?
 
 EUELPIDES Epops is going to sing again.
 
 EPOPS (IN THE COPPICE) Epopoi poi popoi, epopoi, popoi, here, here,
 quick, quick, quick, my comrades in the air; all you who pillage the
 fertile lands of the husbandmen, the numberless tribes who gather and
 devour the barley seeds, the swift flying race who sing so sweetly. And
 you whose gentle twitter resounds through the fields with the little
 cry of tio, tio, tio, tio, tio, tio, tio, tio; and you who hop about the
 branches of the ivy in the gardens; the mountain birds, who feed on the
 wild olive berries or the arbutus, hurry to come at my call, trioto,
 trioto, totobrix; you also, who snap up the sharp-stinging gnats in the
 marshy vales, and you who dwell in the fine plain of Marathon, all
 damp with dew, and you, the francolin with speckled wings; you too, the
 halcyons, who flit over the swelling waves of the sea, come hither to
 hear the tidings; let all the tribes of long-necked birds assemble here;
 know that a clever old man has come to us, bringing an entirely new
 idea and proposing great reforms. Let all come to the debate here,
 here, here, here. Torotorotorotorotix, kikkobau, kikkobau,
 torotorotorotorolililix.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Can you see any bird?
 
 EUELPIDES By Phoebus, no! and yet I am straining my eyesight to scan the
 sky.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Twas really not worth Epops' while to go and bury himself
 in the thicket like a plover when a-hatching.
 
 PHOENICOPTERUS Torotina, torotina.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Hold, friend, here is another bird.
 
 EUELPIDES I' faith, yes, 'tis a bird, but of what kind? Isn't it a
 peacock?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Epops will tell us. What is this bird?
 
 EPOPS 'Tis not one of those you are used to seeing; 'tis a bird from the
 marshes.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! oh! but he is very handsome with his wings as crimson
 as flame.
 
 EPOPS Undoubtedly; indeed he is called flamingo.(1)
 
 f(1) An African bird, that comes to the southern countries of Europe, to
 Greece, Italy, and Spain; it is even seen in Provence.
 
 EUELPIDES Hi! I say! You!
 
 PISTHETAERUS What are you shouting for?
 
 EUELPIDES Why, here's another bird.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Aye, indeed; 'tis a foreign bird too. What is this bird
 from beyond the mountains with a look as solemn as it is stupid?
 
 EPOPS He is called the Mede.(1)
 
 f(1) Aristophanes amusingly mixes up real birds with people and
 individuals, whom he represents in the form of birds; he is personifying
 the Medians here.
 
 PISTHETAERUS The Mede! But, by Heracles, how, if a Mede, has he flown
 here without a camel?
 
 EUELPIDES Here's another bird with a crest.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! that's curious. I say, Epops, you are not the only one
 of your kind then?
 
 EPOPS This bird is the son of Philocles, who is the son of Epops;(1)
 so that, you see, I am his grandfather; just as one might say,
 Hipponicus,(2) the son of Callias, who is the son of Hipponicus.
 
 f(1) Philocles, a tragic poet, had written a tragedy on Tereus, which
 was simply a plagiarism of the play of the same name by Sophocles.
 Philocles is the son of Epops, because he got his inspiration from
 Sophocles' Tereus, and at the same time is father to Epops, since he
 himself produced another Tereus.
 
 f(2) This Hipponicus is probably the orator whose ears Alcibiades boxed
 to gain a bet; he was a descendant of Callias, who was famous for his
 hatred of Pisistratus.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Then this bird is Callias! Why, what a lot of his feathers
 he has lost!(1)
 
 f(1) This Callias, who must not be confounded with the foe of
 Pisistratus, had ruined himself.
 
 EPOPS That's because he is honest; so the informers set upon him and the
 women too pluck out his feathers.
 
 PISTHETAERUS By Posidon, do you see that many-coloured bird? What is his
 name?
 
 EPOPS This one? 'Tis the glutton.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Is there another glutton besides Cleonymus? But why, if
 he is Cleonymus, has he not thrown away his crest?(1) But what is the
 meaning of all these crests? Have these birds come to contend for the
 double stadium prize?(2)
 
 f(1) Cleonymus had cast away his shield; he was as great a glutton as he
 was a coward.
 
 f(2) A race in which the track had to be circled twice.
 
 EPOPS They are like the Carians, who cling to the crests of their
 mountains for greater safety.(1)
 
 f(1) A people of Asia Minor; when pursued by the Ionians they took
 refuge in the mountains.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh, Posidon! do you see what swarms of birds are gathering
 here?
 
 EUELPIDES By Phoebus! what a cloud! The entrance to the stage is no
 longer visible, so closely do they fly together.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here is the partridge.
 
 EUELPIDES Faith! there is the francolin.
 
 PISTHETAERUS There is the poachard.
 
 EUELPIDES Here is the kingfisher. And over yonder?
 
 EPOPS 'Tis the barber.
 
 EUELPIDES What? a bird a barber?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why, Sporgilus is one.(1) Here comes the owl.
 
 f(1) An Athenian barber.
 
 EUELPIDES And who is it brings an owl to Athens?(1)
 
 f(1) The owl was dedicated to Athene, and being respected at Athens,
 it had greatly multiplied. Hence the proverb, 'taking owls to Athens,'
 similar to our English 'taking coals to Newcastle.'
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here is the magpie, the turtle-dove, the swallow, the
 horned owl, the buzzard, the pigeon, the falcon, the ring-dove, the
 cuckoo, the red-foot, the red-cap, the purple-cap, the kestrel, the
 diver, the ousel, the osprey, the woodpecker.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! oh! what a lot of birds! what a quantity of blackbirds!
 how they scold, how they come rushing up! What a noise! what a noise!
 Can they be bearing us ill-will? Oh! there! there! they are opening
 their beaks and staring at us.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why, so they are.
 
 CHORUS Popopopopopopopoi. Where is he who called me? Where am I to find
 him?
 
 EPOPS I have been waiting for you this long while! I never fail in my
 word to my friends.
 
 CHORUS Titititititititi. What good thing have you to tell me?
 
 EPOPS Something that concerns our common safety, and that is just as
 pleasant as it is to the purpose. Two men, who are subtle reasoners,
 have come here to seek me.
 
 CHORUS Where? What? What are you saying?
 
 EPOPS I say, two old men have come from the abode of men to propose a
 vast and splendid scheme to us.
 
 CHORUS Oh! 'tis a horrible, unheard-of crime! What are you saying?
 
 EPOPS Nay! never let my words scare you.
 
 CHORUS What have you done then?
 
 EPOPS I have welcomed two men, who wish to live with us.
 
 CHORUS And you have dared to do that!
 
 EPOPS Aye, and am delighted at having done so.
 
 CHORUS Where are they?
 
 EPOPS In your midst, as I am.
 
 CHORUS Ah! ah! we are betrayed; 'tis sacrilege! Our friend, he who
 picked up corn-seeds in the same plains as ourselves, has violated our
 ancient laws; he has broken the oaths that bind all birds; he has laid a
 snare for me, he has handed us over to the attacks of that impious race
 which, throughout all time, has never ceased to war against us. As for
 this traitorous bird, we will decide his case later, but the two old men
 shall be punished forthwith; we are going to tear them to pieces.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis all over with us.
 
 EUELPIDES You are the sole cause of all our trouble. Why did you bring
 me from down yonder?
 
 PISTHETAERUS To have you with me.
 
 EUELPIDES Say rather to have me melt into tears.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Go to! you are talking nonsense.
 
 EUELPIDES How so?
 
 PISTHETAERUS How will you be able to cry when once your eyes are pecked
 out?
 
 CHORUS Io! io! forward to the attack, throw yourselves upon the foe,
 spill his blood; take to your wings and surround them on all sides. Woe
 to them! let us get to work with our beaks, let us devour them. Nothing
 can save them from our wrath, neither the mountain forests, nor the
 clouds that float in the sky, nor the foaming deep. Come, peck, tear
 to ribbons. Where is the chief of the cohort? Let him engage the right
 wing.
 
 EUELPIDES This is the fatal moment. Where shall I fly to, unfortunate
 wretch that I am?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Stay! stop here!
 
 EUELPIDES That they may tear me to pieces?
 
 PISTHETAERUS And how do you think to escape them?
 
 EUELPIDES I don't know at all.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Come, I will tell you. We must stop and fight them. Let us
 arm ourselves with these stew-pots.
 
 EUELPIDES Why with the stew-pots?
 
 PISTHETAERUS The owl will not attack us.(1)
 
 f(1) An allusion to the Feast of Pots; it was kept at Athens on the
 third day of the Anthesteria, when all sorts of vegetables were stewed
 together and offered for the dead to Bacchus and Athene. This Feast
 was peculiar to Athens.--Hence Pisthetaerus thinks that the owl will
 recognize they are Athenians by seeing the stew-pots, and as he is an
 Athenian bird, he will not attack them.
 
 EUELPIDES But do you see all those hooked claws?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Seize the spit and pierce the foe on your side.
 
 EUELPIDES And how about my eyes?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Protect them with this dish or this vinegar-pot.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! what cleverness! what inventive genius! You are a great
 general, even greater than Nicias,(1) where stratagem is concerned.
 
 f(1) Nicias, the famous Athenian general.--The siege of Melos in 417
 B.C., or two years previous to the production of 'The Birds,' had
 especially done him great credit. He was joint commander of the Sicilian
 expedition.
 
 CHORUS Forward, forward, charge with your beaks! Come, no delay. Tear,
 pluck, strike, flay them, and first of all smash the stew-pot.
 
 EPOPS Oh, most cruel of all animals, why tear these two men to pieces,
 why kill them? What have they done to you? They belong to the same
 tribe, to the same family as my wife.(1)
 
 f(1) Procne, the daughter of Pandion, King of Athens.
 
 CHORUS Are wolves to be spared? Are they not our most mortal foes? So
 let us punish them.
 
 EPOPS If they are your foes by nature, they are your friends in heart,
 and they come here to give you useful advice.
 
 CHORUS Advice or a useful word from their lips, from them, the enemies
 of my forebears!
 
 EPOPS The wise can often profit by the lessons of a foe, for caution is
 the mother of safety. 'Tis just such a thing as one will not learn from
 a friend and which an enemy compels you to know. To begin with, 'tis the
 foe and not the friend that taught cities to build high walls, to equip
 long vessels of war; and 'tis this knowledge that protects our children,
 our slaves and our wealth.
 
 CHORUS Well then, I agree, let us first hear them, for 'tis best; one
 can even learn something in an enemy's school.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Their wrath seems to cool. Draw back a little.
 
 EPOPS 'Tis only justice, and you will thank me later.
 
 CHORUS Never have we opposed your advice up to now.
 
 PISTHETAERUS They are in a more peaceful mood; put down your stew-pot
 and your two dishes; spit in hand, doing duty for a spear, let us mount
 guard inside the camp close to the pot and watch in our arsenal closely;
 for we must not fly.
 
 EUELPIDES You are right. But where shall we be buried, if we die?
 
 PISTHETAERUS In the Ceramicus;(1) for, to get a public funeral, we shall
 tell the Strategi that we fell at Orneae,(2) fighting the country's
 foes.
 
 f(1) A space beyond the walls of Athens which contained the gardens of
 the Academy and the graves of citizens who had died for their country.
 
 f(2) A town in Western Argolis, where the Athenians had been recently
 defeated. The somewhat similar work in Greek signifies 'birds.'
 
 CHORUS Return to your ranks and lay down your courage beside your wrath
 as the Hoplites do. Then let us ask these men who they are, whence they
 come, and with what intent. Here, Epops, answer me.
 
 EPOPS Are you calling me? What do you want of me?
 
 CHORUS Who are they? From what country?
 
 EPOPS Strangers, who have come from Greece, the land of the wise.
 
 CHORUS And what fate has led them hither to the land of the birds?
 
 EPOPS Their love for you and their wish to share your kind of life; to
 dwell and remain with you always.
 
 CHORUS Indeed, and what are their plans?
 
 EPOPS They are wonderful, incredible, unheard of.
 
 CHORUS Why, do they think to see some advantage that determines them to
 settle here? Are they hoping with our help to triumph over their foes or
 to be useful to their friends?
 
 EPOPS They speak of benefits so great it is impossible either to
 describe or conceive them; all shall be yours, all that we see here,
 there, above and below us; this they vouch for.
 
 CHORUS Are they mad?
 
 EPOPS They are the sanest people in the world.
 
 CHORUS Clever men?
 
 EPOPS The slyest of foxes, cleverness its very self, men of the world,
 cunning, the cream of knowing folk.
 
 CHORUS Tell them to speak and speak quickly; why, as I listen to you, I
 am beside myself with delight.
 
 EPOPS Here, you there, take all these weapons and hang them up inside
 close to the fire, near the figure of the god who presides there and
 under his protection;(1) as for you, address the birds, tell them why I
 have gathered them together.
 
 f(1) Epops is addressing the two slaves, no doubt Xanthias and Manes,
 who are mentioned later on.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Not I, by Apollo, unless they agree with me as the little
 ape of an armourer agreed with his wife, not to bite me, nor pull me by
 the parts, nor shove things up my...
 
 CHORUS You mean the...(PUTS FINGER TO BOTTOM) Oh! be quite at ease.
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, I mean my eyes.
 
 CHORUS Agreed.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Swear it.
 
 CHORUS I swear it and, if I keep my promise, let judges and spectators
 give me the victory unanimously.
 
 PISTHETAERUS It is a bargain.
 
 CHORUS And if I break my word, may I succeed by one vote only.
 
 HERALD Hearken, ye people! Hoplites, pick up your weapons and return
 to your firesides; do not fail to read the decrees of dismissal we have
 posted.
 
 CHORUS Man is a truly cunning creature, but nevertheless explain.
 Perhaps you are going to show me some good way to extend my power,
 some way that I have not had the wit to find out and which you have
 discovered. Speak! 'tis to your own interest as well as to mine, for if
 you secure me some advantage, I will surely share it with you. But what
 object can have induced you to come among us? Speak boldly, for I shall
 not break the truce,--until you have told us all.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I am bursting with desire to speak; I have already mixed
 the dough of my address and nothing prevents me from kneading it....
 Slave! bring the chaplet and water, which you must pour over my hands.
 Be quick!(1)
 
 f(1) It was customary, when speaking in public and also at feasts, to
 wear a chaplet; hence the question Euelpides puts.--The guests wore
 chaplets of flowers, herbs, and leaves, which had the property of being
 refreshing.
 
 EUELPIDES Is it a question of feasting? What does it all mean?
 
 PISTHETAERUS By Zeus, no! but I am hunting for fine, tasty words to
 break down the hardness of their hearts.--I grieve so much for you, who
 at one time were kings...
 
 CHORUS We kings! Over whom?
 
 PISTHETAERUS ...of all that exists, firstly of me and of this man, even
 of Zeus himself. Your race is older than Saturn, the Titans and the
 Earth.
 
 CHORUS What, older than the Earth!
 
 PISTHETAERUS By Phoebus, yes.
 
 CHORUS By Zeus, but I never knew that before!
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis because you are ignorant and heedless, and have never
 read your Aesop. 'Tis he who tells us that the lark was born before all
 other creatures, indeed before the Earth; his father died of sickness,
 but the Earth did not exist then; he remained unburied for five days,
 when the bird in its dilemma decided, for want of a better place, to
 entomb its father in its own head.
 
 EUELPIDES So that the lark's father is buried at Cephalae.(1)
 
 f(1) A deme of Attica. In Greek the word also means 'heads,' and hence
 the pun.
 
 EPOPS Hence, if we existed before the Earth, before the gods, the
 kingship belongs to us by right of priority.
 
 EUELPIDES Undoubtedly, but sharpen your beak well; Zeus won't be in a
 hurry to hand over his sceptre to the woodpecker.
 
 PISTHETAERUS It was not the gods, but the birds, who were formerly the
 masters and kings over men; of this I have a thousand proofs. First of
 all, I will point you to the cock, who governed the Persians before all
 other monarchs, before Darius and Megabyzus.(1) 'Tis in memory of his
 reign that he is called the Persian bird.
 
 f(1) One of Darius' best generals. After his expedition against the
 Scythians, this prince gave him the command of the army which he left
 in Europe. Megabyzus took Perinthos (afterwards called Heraclea) and
 conquered Thrace.
 
 EUELPIDES For this reason also, even to-day, he alone of all the birds
 wears his tiara straight on his head, like the Great King.(1)
 
 f(1) All Persians wore the tiara, but always on one side; the Great King
 alone wore it straight on his head.
 
 PISTHETAERUS He was so strong, so great, so feared, that even now, on
 account of his ancient power, everyone jumps out of bed as soon as
 ever he crows at daybreak. Blacksmiths, potters, tanners, shoemakers,
 bathmen, corn-dealers, lyre-makers and armourers, all put on their shoes
 and go to work before it is daylight.
 
 EUELPIDES I can tell you something about that. 'Twas the cock's fault
 that I lost a splendid tunic of Phrygian wool. I was at a feast in town,
 given to celebrate the birth of a child; I had drunk pretty freely and
 had just fallen asleep, when a cock, I suppose in a greater hurry
 than the rest, began to crow. I thought it was dawn and set out for
 Alimos.(1) I had hardly got beyond the walls, when a footpad struck me
 in the back with his bludgeon; down I went and wanted to shout, but he
 had already made off with my mantle.
 
 f(1) Noted as the birthplace of Thucydides, a deme of Attica of the
 tribe of Leontis. Demosthenes tells us it was thirty-five stadia from
 Athens.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Formerly also the kite was ruler and king over the Greeks.
 
 EPOPS The Greeks?
 
 PISTHETAERUS And when he was king, 'twas he who first taught them to
 fall on their knees before the kites.(1)
 
 f(1) The appearance of the kite in Greece betokened the return of
 springtime; it was therefore worshipped as a symbol of that season.
 
 EUELPIDES By Zeus! 'tis what I did myself one day on seeing a kite; but
 at the moment I was on my knees, and leaning backwards(1) with mouth
 agape, I bolted an obolus and was forced to carry my bag home empty.(2)
 
 f(1) To look at the kite, who no doubt was flying high in the sky.
 
 f(2) As already shown, the Athenians were addicted to carrying small
 coins in their mouths.--This obolus was for the purpose of buying flour
 to fill the bag he was carrying
 
 PISTHETAERUS The cuckoo was king of Egypt and of the whole of Phoenicia.
 When he called out "cuckoo," all the Phoenicians hurried to the fields
 to reap their wheat and their barley.(1)
 
 f(1) In Phoenicia and Egypt the cuckoo makes its appearance about
 harvest-time.
 
 EUELPIDES Hence no doubt the proverb, "Cuckoo! cuckoo! go to the fields,
 ye circumcised."(1)
 
 f(1) This was an Egyptian proverb, meaning, 'When the cuckoo sings we
 go harvesting.' Both the Phoenicians and the Egyptians practised
 circumcision.
 
 PISTHETAERUS So powerful were the birds that the kings of Grecian
 cities, Agamemnon, Menelaus, for instance, carried a bird on the tip of
 their sceptres, who had his share of all presents.(1)
 
 f(1) The staff, called a sceptre, generally terminated in a piece of
 carved work, representing a flower, a fruit, and most often a bird.
 
 EUELPIDES That I didn't know and was much astonished when I saw Priam
 come upon the stage in the tragedies with a bird, which kept watching
 Lysicrates(1) to see if he got any present.
 
 f(1) A general accused of treachery. The bird watches Lysicrates,
 because, according to Pisthetaerus, he had a right to a share of the
 presents.
 
 PISTHETAERUS But the strongest proof of all is, that Zeus, who now
 reigns, is represented as standing with an eagle on his head as a symbol
 of his royalty;(1) his daughter has an owl, and Phoebus, as his servant,
 has a hawk.
 
 f(1) It is thus that Phidias represents his Olympian Zeus.
 
 EUELPIDES By Demeter, 'tis well spoken. But what are all these birds
 doing in heaven?
 
 PISTHETAERUS When anyone sacrifices and, according to the rite, offers
 the entrails to the gods, these birds take their share before Zeus.
 Formerly men always swore by the birds and never by the gods; even now
 Lampon(1) swears by the goose, when he wants to lie....Thus 'tis clear
 that you were great and sacred, but now you are looked upon as slaves,
 as fools, as Helots; stones are thrown at you as at raving madmen, even
 in holy places. A crowd of bird-catchers sets snares, traps, limed-twigs
 and nets of all sorts for you; you are caught, you are sold in heaps
 and the buyers finger you over to be certain you are fat. Again, if
 they would but serve you up simply roasted; but they rasp cheese into a
 mixture of oil, vinegar and laserwort, to which another sweet and greasy
 sauce is added, and the whole is poured scalding hot over your back, for
 all the world as if you were diseased meat.
 
 f(1) One of the diviners sent to Sybaris (in Magna Graecia, S. Italy)
 with the Athenian colonists, who rebuilt the town under the new name of
 Thurium.
 
 CHORUS Man, your words have made my heart bleed; I have groaned over the
 treachery of our fathers, who knew not how to transmit to us the high
 rank they held from their forefathers. But 'tis a benevolent Genius, a
 happy Fate, that sends you to us; you shall be our deliverer and I
 place the destiny of my little ones and my own in your hands with every
 confidence. But hasten to tell me what must be done; we should not
 be worthy to live, if we did not seek to regain our royalty by every
 possible means.
 
 PISTHETAERUS First I advise that the birds gather together in one city
 and that they build a wall of great bricks, like that at Babylon, round
 the plains of the air and the whole region of space that divides earth
 from heaven.
 
 EPOPS Oh, Cebriones! oh, Porphyrion!(1) what a terribly strong place!
 
 f(1) As if he were saying, "Oh, gods!" Like Lampon, he swears by the
 birds, instead of swearing by the gods.--The names of these birds are
 those of two of the Titans.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Th(en), this being well done and completed, you demand back
 the empire from Zeus; if he will not agree, if he refuses and does not
 at once confess himself beaten, you declare a sacred war against him and
 forbid the gods henceforward to pass through your country with lust, as
 hitherto, for the purpose of fondling their Alcmenas, their Alopes, or
 their Semeles!(1) if they try to pass through, you infibulate them with
 rings so that they can work no longer. You send another messenger to
 mankind, who will proclaim to them that the birds are kings, that for
 the future they must first of all sacrifice to them, and only afterwards
 to the gods; that it is fitting to appoint to each deity the bird
 that has most in common with it. For instance, are they sacrificing to
 Aphrodite, let them at the same time offer barley to the coot; are they
 immolating a sheep to Posidon, let them consecrate wheat in honour of
 the duck;(2) is a steer being offered to Heracles, let honey-cakes be
 dedicated to the gull;(3) is a goat being slain for King Zeus, there is
 a King-Bird, the wren,(4) to whom the sacrifice of a male gnat is due
 before Zeus himself even.
 
 f(1) Alcmena, wife of Amphitryon, King of Thebes and mother of
 Heracles.--Semele, the daughter of Cadmus and Hermione and mother of
 Bacchus; both seduced by Zeus.--Alope, daughter of Cercyon, a robber,
 who reigned at Eleusis and was conquered by Perseus. Alope was honoured
 with Posidon's caresses; by him she had a son named Hippothous, at first
 brought up by shepherds but who afterwards was restored to the throne of
 his grandfather by Theseus.
 
 f(2) Because water is the duck's domain, as it is that of Posidon.
 
 f(3) Because the gull, like Heracles, is voracious.
 
 f(4) The Germans still call it 'Zaunkonig' and the French 'roitelet,'
 both names thus containing the idea of 'king.'
 
 EUELPIDES This notion of an immolated gnat delights me! And now let the
 great Zeus thunder!
 
 EPOPS But how will mankind recognize us as gods and not as jays? Us, who
 have wings and fly?
 
 PISTHETAERUS You talk rubbish! Hermes is a god and has wings and flies,
 and so do many other gods. First of all, Victory flies with golden
 wings, Eros is undoubtedly winged too, and Iris is compared by Homer to
 a timorous dove.(1) If men in their blindness do not recognize you as
 gods and continue to worship the dwellers in Olympus, then a cloud of
 sparrows greedy for corn must descend upon their fields and eat up all
 their seeds; we shall see then if Demeter will mete them out any wheat.
 
 
 f(1) The scholiast draws our attention to the fact that Homer says this
 of Here and not of Iris (Iliad, V, 778); it is only another proof that
 the text of Homer has reached us in a corrupted form, or it may be that
 Aristophanes was liable, like other people, to occasional mistakes of
 quotation.
 
 EUELPIDES By Zeus, she'll take good care she does not, and you will see
 her inventing a thousand excuses.
 
 PISTHETAERUS The crows too will prove your divinity to them by pecking
 out the eyes of their flocks and of their draught-oxen; and then
 let Apollo cure them, since he is a physician and is paid for the
 purpose.(1)
 
 
 f(1) In sacrifices.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! don't do that! Wait first until I have sold my two young
 bullocks.
 
 PISTHETAERUS If on the other hand they recognize that you are God, the
 principle of life, that you are Earth, Saturn, Posidon, they shall be
 loaded with benefits.
 
 EPOPS Name me one of these then.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Firstly, the locusts shall not eat up their vine-blossoms;
 a legion of owls and kestrels will devour them. Moreover, the gnats and
 the gall-bugs shall no longer ravage the figs; a flock of thrushes shall
 swallow the whole host down to the very last.
 
 EPOPS And how shall we give wealth to mankind? This is their strongest
 passion.
 
 PISTHETAERUS When they consult the omens, you will point them to the
 richest mines, you will reveal the paying ventures to the diviner, and
 not another shipwreck will happen or sailor perish.
 
 EPOPS No more shall perish? How is that?
 
 PISTHETAERUS When the auguries are examined before starting on a voyage,
 some bird will not fail to say, "Don't start! there will be a storm," or
 else, "Go! you will make a most profitable venture."
 
 EUELPIDES I shall buy a trading-vessel and go to sea, I will not stay
 with you.
 
 PISTHETAERUS You will discover treasures to them, which were buried in
 former times, for you know them. Do not all men say, "None knows where
 my treasure lies, unless perchance it be some bird."(1)
 
 
 f(1) An Athenian proverb.
 
 EUELPIDES I shall sell my boat and buy a spade to unearth the vessels.
 
 EPOPS And how are we to give them health, which belongs to the gods?
 
 PISTHETAERUS If they are happy, is not that the chief thing towards
 health? The miserable man is never well.
 
 EPOPS Old Age also dwells in Olympus. How will they get at it? Must they
 die in early youth?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why, the birds, by Zeus, will add three hundred years to
 their life.
 
 EPOPS From whom will they take them?
 
 PISTHETAERUS From whom? Why, from themselves. Don't you know the cawing
 crow lives five times as long as a man?
 
 EUELPIDES Ah! ah! these are far better kings for us than Zeus!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Far better, are they not? And firstly, we shall not have to
 build them temples of hewn stone, closed with gates of gold; they will
 dwell amongst the bushes and in the thickets of green oak; the most
 venerated of birds will have no other temple than the foliage of the
 olive tree; we shall not go to Delphi or to Ammon to sacrifice;(1) but
 standing erect in the midst of arbutus and wild olives and holding forth
 our hands filled with wheat and barley, we shall pray them to admit us
 to a share of the blessings they enjoy and shall at once obtain them for
 a few grains of wheat.
 
 
 f(1) A celebrated temple to Zeus in an oasis of Libya.
 
 CHORUS Old man, whom I detested, you are now to me the dearest of all;
 never shall I, if I can help it, fail to follow your advice. Inspirited
 by your words, I threaten my rivals the gods, and I swear that if you
 march in alliance with me against the gods and are faithful to our just,
 loyal and sacred bond, we shall soon have shattered their sceptre. 'Tis
 our part to undertake the toil, 'tis yours to advise.
 
 EPOPS By Zeus! 'tis no longer the time to delay and loiter like
 Nicias;(1) let us act as promptly as possible.... In the first place,
 come, enter my nest built of brushwood and blades of straw, and tell me
 your names.
 
 
 f(1) Nicias was commander, along with Demosthenes, and later on
 Alcibiades, of the Athenian forces before Syracuse, in the ill-fated
 Sicilian Expedition, 415-413 B.C. He was much blamed for dilatoriness
 and indecision.
 
 PISTHETAERUS That is soon done; my name is Pisthetaerus.
 
 EPOPS And his?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Euelpides, of the deme of Thria.
 
 EPOPS Good! and good luck to you.
 
 PISTHETAERUS We accept the omen.
 
 EPOPS Come in here.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Very well, 'tis you who lead us and must introduce us.
 
 EPOPS Come then.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! my god! do come back here. Hi! tell us how we are to
 follow you. You can fly, but we cannot.
 
 EPOPS Well, well.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Remember Aesop's fables. It is told there, that the fox
 fared very ill, because he had made an alliance with the eagle.
 
 EPOPS Be at ease. You shall eat a certain root and wings will grow on
 your shoulders.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Then let us enter. Xanthias and Manes,(1) pick up our
 baggage.
 
 
 f(1) Servants of Pisthetaerus and Euelpides.
 
 CHORUS Hi! Epops! do you hear me?
 
 EPOPS What's the matter?
 
 CHORUS Take them off to dine well and call your mate, the melodious
 Procne, whose songs are worthy of the Muses; she will delight our
 leisure moments.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! I conjure you, accede to their wish; for this
 delightful bird will leave her rushes at the sound of your voice; for
 the sake of the gods, let her come here, so that we may contemplate the
 nightingale.(1)
 
 
 f(1) It has already been mentioned that, according to the legend
 followed by Aristophanes, Procne had been changed into a nightingale and
 Philomela into a swallow.
 
 EPOPS Let it be as you desire. Come forth, Procne, show yourself to
 these strangers.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! great Zeus! what a beautiful little bird! what a dainty
 form! what brilliant plumage!(1)
 
 
 f(1) The actor, representing Procne, was dressed out as a courtesan, but
 wore a mask of a bird.
 
 EUELPIDES Do you know how dearly I should like to splint her legs for
 her?
 
 PISTHETAERUS She is dazzling all over with gold, like a young girl.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Young unmarried girls wore golden ornaments; the apparel of married
 women was much simpler.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! how I should like to kiss her!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why, wretched man, she has two little sharp points on her
 beak!
 
 EUELPIDES I would treat her like an egg, the shell of which we remove
 before eating it; I would take off her mask and then kiss her pretty
 face.
 
 EPOPS Let us go in.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Lead the way, and may success attend us.
 
 CHORUS Lovable golden bird, whom I cherish above all others, you, whom I
 associate with all my songs, nightingale, you have come, you have come,
 to show yourself to me and to charm me with your notes. Come, you,
 who play spring melodies upon the harmonious flute,(1) lead off our
 anapaests.(2)
 
 Weak mortals, chained to the earth, creatures of clay as frail as the
 foliage of the woods, you unfortunate race, whose life is but darkness,
 as unreal as a shadow, the illusion of a dream, hearken to us, who
 are immortal beings, ethereal, ever young and occupied with eternal
 thoughts, for we shall teach you about all celestial matters; you shall
 know thoroughly what is the nature of the birds, what the origin of
 the gods, of the rivers, of Erebus, and Chaos; thanks to us, even
 Prodicus(3) will envy you your knowledge.
 
 At the beginning there was only Chaos, Night, dark Erebus, and
 deep Tartarus. Earth, the air and heaven had no existence. Firstly,
 black-winged Night laid a germless egg in the bosom of the infinite
 deeps of Erebus, and from this, after the revolution of long ages,
 sprang the graceful Eros with his glittering golden wings, swift as the
 whirlwinds of the tempest. He mated in deep Tartarus with dark Chaos,
 winged like himself, and thus hatched forth our race, which was the
 first to see the light. That of the Immortals did not exist until Eros
 had brought together all the ingredients of the world, and from their
 marriage Heaven, Ocean, Earth and the imperishable race of blessed gods
 sprang into being. Thus our origin is very much older than that of the
 dwellers in Olympus. We are the offspring of Eros; there are a thousand
 proofs to show it. We have wings and we lend assistance to lovers. How
 many handsome youths, who had sworn to remain insensible, have not been
 vanquished by our power and have yielded themselves to their lovers when
 almost at the end of their youth, being led away by the gift of a quail,
 a waterfowl, a goose, or a cock.(4)
 
 And what important services do not the birds render to mortals! First
 of all, they mark the seasons for them, springtime, winter, and autumn.
 Does the screaming crane migrate to Libya,--it warns the husbandman
 to sow, the pilot to take his ease beside his tiller hung up in his
 dwelling,(5) and Orestes(6) to weave a tunic, so that the rigorous cold
 may not drive him any more to strip other folk. When the kite reappears,
 he tells of the return of spring and of the period when the fleece of
 the sheep must be clipped. Is the swallow in sight? All hasten to sell
 their warm tunic and to buy some light clothing. We are your Ammon,
 Delphi, Dodona, your Phoebus Apollo.(7) Before undertaking anything,
 whether a business transaction, a marriage, or the purchase of food,
 you consult the birds by reading the omens, and you give this name of
 omen(8) to all signs that tell of the future. With you a word is an
 omen, you call a sneeze an omen, a meeting an omen, an unknown sound
 an omen, a slave or an ass an omen.(9) Is it not clear that we are a
 prophetic Apollo to you? If you recognize us as gods, we shall be your
 divining Muses, through us you will know the winds and the seasons,
 summer, winter, and the temperate months. We shall not withdraw
 ourselves to the highest clouds like Zeus, but shall be among you
 and shall give to you and to your children and the children of your
 children, health and wealth, long life, peace, youth, laughter, songs
 and feasts; in short, you will all be so well off, that you will be
 weary and satiated with enjoyment.
 
 Oh, rustic Muse of such varied note, tio, tio, tio, tiotinx, I sing
 with you in the groves and on the mountain tops, tio, tio, tio, tio,
 tiotinx.(10) I poured forth sacred strains from my golden throat in
 honour of the god Pan,(11) tio, tio, tio, tiotinx, from the top of the
 thickly leaved ash, and my voice mingles with the mighty choirs who
 extol Cybele on the mountain tops,(12) tototototototototinx. 'Tis to our
 concerts that Phrynichus comes to pillage like a bee the ambrosia of
 his songs, the sweetness of which so charms the ear, tio, tio, tio, tio,
 tinx.
 
 If there be one of you spectators who wishes to spend the rest of
 his life quietly among the birds, let him come to us. All that is
 disgraceful and forbidden by law on earth is on the contrary honourable
 among us, the birds. For instance, among you 'tis a crime to beat your
 father, but with us 'tis an estimable deed; it's considered fine to run
 straight at your father and hit him, saying, "Come, lift your spur if
 you want to fight."(13) The runaway slave, whom you brand, is only a
 spotted francolin with us.(14) Are you Phrygian like Spintharus?(15)
 Among us you would be the Phrygian bird, the goldfinch, of the race of
 Philemon.(16) Are you a slave and a Carian like Execestides? Among us
 you can create yourself fore-fathers;(17) you can always find relations.
 Does the son of Pisias want to betray the gates of the city to the foe?
 Let him become a partridge, the fitting offspring of his father; among
 us there is no shame in escaping as cleverly as a partridge.
 
 So the swans on the banks of the Hebrus, tio, tio, tio, tio, tiotinx,
 mingle their voices to serenade Apollo, tio, tio, tio, tio. tiotinx,
 flapping their wings the while, tio, tio, tio, tio, tiotinx; their notes
 reach beyond the clouds of heaven; all the dwellers in the forest stand
 still with astonishment and delight; a calm rests upon the waters, and
 the Graces and the choirs in Olympus catch up the strain, tio, tio, tio,
 tio, tiotinx.
 
 There is nothing more useful nor more pleasant than to have wings. To
 begin with, just let us suppose a spectator to be dying with hunger and
 to be weary of the choruses of the tragic poets; if he were winged, he
 would fly off, go home to dine and come back with his stomach filled.
 Some Patroclides in urgent need would not have to soil his cloak, but
 could fly off, satisfy his requirements, and, having recovered his
 breath, return. If one of you, it matters not who, had adulterous
 relations and saw the husband of his mistress in the seats of the
 senators, he might stretch his wings, fly thither, and, having appeased
 his craving, resume his place. Is it not the most priceless gift of all,
 to be winged? Look at Diitrephes!(18) His wings were only wicker-work
 ones, and yet he got himself chosen Phylarch and then Hipparch; from
 being nobody, he has risen to be famous; 'tis now the finest gilded cock
 of his tribe.(19)
 
 
 f(1) The actor, representing Procne, was a flute-player.
 
 f(2) The parabasis.
 
 f(3) A sophist of the island of Ceos, a disciple of Protagoras, as
 celebrated for his knowledge as for his eloquence. The Athenians
 condemned him to death as a corrupter of youth in 396 B.C.
 
 
 f(4) Lovers were wont to make each other presents of birds. The cock and
 the goose are mentioned, of course, in jest.
 
 f(5) i.e. that it gave notice of the approach of winter, during which
 season the Ancients did not venture to sea.
 
 f(6) A notorious robber.
 
 f(7) Meaning, "We are your oracles." --Dodona was an oracle in
 Epirus.--The temple of Zeus there was surrounded by a dense forest,
 all the trees of which were endowed with the gift of prophecy; both the
 sacred oaks and the pigeons that lived in them answered the questions of
 those who came to consult the oracle in pure Greek.
 
 f(8) The Greek word for 'omen' is the same as that for 'bird.'
 
 f(9) A satire on the passion of the Greeks for seeing an omen in
 everything.
 
 f(10) An imitation of the nightingale's song.
 
 f(11) God of the groves and wilds.
 
 f(12) The 'Mother of the Gods'; roaming the mountains, she held dances,
 always attended by Pan and his accompanying rout of Fauns and Satyrs.
 
 f(13) An allusion to cock-fighting; the birds are armed with brazen
 spurs.
 
 f(14) An allusion to the spots on this bird, which resemble the scars
 left by a branding iron.
 
 f(15) He was of Asiatic origin, but wished to pass for an Athenian.
 
 f(16) Or Philamnon, King of Thrace; the scholiast remarks that the
 Phrygians and the Thracians had a common origin.
 
 f(17) The Greek word here is also the name of a little bird.
 
 f(18) A basket-maker who had become rich.--The Phylarchs were the
 headmen of the tribes. They presided at the private assemblies and were
 charged with the management of the treasury.--The Hipparchs, as the name
 implies, were the leaders of the cavalry; there were only two of these
 in the Athenian army.
 
 f(19) He had become a senator.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Halloa! What's this? By Zeus! I never saw anything so funny
 in all my life.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Pisthetaerus and Euelpides now both return with wings.
 
 EUELPIDES What makes you laugh?
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis your bits of wings. D'you know what you look like?
 Like a goose painted by some dauber-fellow.
 
 EUELPIDES And you look like a close-shaven blackbird.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis ourselves asked for this transformation, and, as
 Aeschylus has it, "These are no borrowed feathers, but truly our
 own."(1)
 
 
 f(1) Meaning, 'tis we who wanted to have these wings.--The verse from
 Aeschylus, quoted here, is taken from 'The Myrmidons,' a tragedy of
 which only a few fragments remain.
 
 EPOPS Come now, what must be done?
 
 PISTHETAERUS First give our city a great and famous name, then sacrifice
 to the gods.
 
 EUELPIDES I think so too.
 
 EPOPS Let's see. What shall our city be called?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Will you have a high-sounding Laconian name? Shall we call
 it Sparta?
 
 EUELPIDES What! call my town Sparta? Why, I would not use esparto for my
 bed,(1) even though I had nothing but bands of rushes.
 
 
 f(1) The Greek word signified the city of Sparta, and also a kind of
 broom used for weaving rough matting, which served for the beds of the
 very poor.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Well then, what name can you suggest?
 
 EUELPIDES Some name borrowed from the clouds, from these lofty regions
 in which we dwell--in short, some well-known name.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Do you like Nephelococcygia?(1)
 
 
 f(1) A fanciful name constructed from (the word for) a cloud,
 and (the word for) a cuckoo; thus a city of clouds and
 cuckoos.--'Wolkenkukelheim' is a clever approximation in German.
 Cloud-cuckoo-town, perhaps, is the best English equivalent.
 
 EPOPS Oh! capital! truly 'tis a brilliant thought!
 
 EUELPIDES Is it in Nephelococcygia that all the wealth of Theovenes(1)
 and most of Aeschines'(2) is?
 
 
 f(1) He was a boaster nicknamed 'smoke,' because he promised a great
 deal and never kept his word.
 
 f(2) Also mentioned in 'The Wasps.'
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, 'tis rather the plain of Phlegra,(1) where the gods
 withered the pride of the sons of the Earth with their shafts.
 
 
 f(1) Because the war of the Titans against the gods was only a fiction
 of the poets.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! what a splendid city! But what god shall be its patron?
 for whom shall we weave the peplus?(1)
 
 
 f(1) A sacred cloth, with which the statue of Athene in the Acropolis
 was draped.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why not choose Athene Polias?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Meaning, to be patron-goddess of the city. Athene had a temple of
 this name.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! what a well-ordered town 'twould be to have a female deity
 armed from head to foot, while Clisthenes(1) was spinning!
 
 
 f(1) An Athenian effeminate, frequently ridiculed by Aristophanes.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Who then shall guard the Pelargicon?(1)
 
 
 f(1) This was the name of the wall surrounding the Acropolis.
 
 EPOPS One of us, a bird of Persian strain, who is everywhere proclaimed
 to be the bravest of all, a true chick of Ares.(1)
 
 
 f(1) i.e. the fighting cock.
 
 EUELPIDES Oh! noble chick! What a well-chosen god for a rocky home!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Come! into the air with you to help the workers who are
 building the wall; carry up rubble, strip yourself to mix the mortar,
 take up the hod, tumble down the ladder, an you like, post sentinels,
 keep the fire smouldering beneath the ashes, go round the walls, bell in
 hand,(1) and go to sleep up there yourself; then d(i)spatch two heralds,
 one to the gods above, the other to mankind on earth and come back here.
 
 
 f(1) To waken the sentinels, who might else have fallen asleep.--There
 are several merry contradictions in the various parts of this list of
 injunctions.
 
 EUELPIDES As for yourself, remain here, and may the plague take you for
 a troublesome fellow!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Go, friend, go where I send you, for without you my orders
 cannot be obeyed. For myself, I want to sacrifice to the new god, and I
 am going to summon the priest who must preside at the ceremony. Slaves!
 slaves! bring forward the basket and the lustral water.
 
 CHORUS I do as you do, and I wish as you wish, and I implore you to
 address powerful and solemn prayers to the gods, and in addition to
 immolate a sheep as a token of our gratitude. Let us sing the Pythian
 chant in honour of the god, and let Chaeris accompany our voices.
 
 PISTHETAERUS (TO THE FLUTE-PLAYER) Enough! but, by Heracles! what is
 this? Great gods! I have seen many prodigious things, but I never saw a
 muzzled raven.(1)
 
 
 f(1) In allusion to the leather strap which flute-players wore to
 constrict the cheeks and add to the power of the breath. The performer
 here no doubt wore a raven's mask.
 
 EPOPS Priest! 'tis high time! Sacrifice to the new gods.
 
 PRIEST I begin, but where is he with the basket? Pray to the Vesta of
 the birds, to the kite, who presides over the hearth, and to all the god
 and goddess-birds who dwell in Olympus.
 
 CHORUS Oh! Hawk, the sacred guardian of Sunium, oh, god of the storks!
 
 PRIEST Pray to the swan of Delos, to Latona the mother of the quails,
 and to Artemis, the goldfinch.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis no longer Artemis Colaenis, but Artemis the
 goldfinch.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Hellanicus, the Mitylenian historian, tells that this surname of
 Artemis is derived from Colaenus, King of Athens before Cecrops and a
 descendant of Hermes. In obedience to an oracle he erected a temple to
 the goddess, invoking her as Artemis Colaenis (the Artemis of Colaenus).
 
 PRIEST And to Bacchus, the finch and Cybele, the ostrich and mother of
 the gods and mankind.
 
 CHORUS Oh! sovereign ostrich, Cybele, The mother of Cleocritus,(1) grant
 health and safety to the Nephelococcygians as well as to the dwellers in
 Chios...
 
 
 f(1) This Cleocritus, says the scholiast, was long-necked and strutted
 like an ostrich.
 
 PISTHETAERUS The dwellers in Chios! Ah! I am delighted they should be
 thus mentioned on all occasions.(1)
 
 
 f(1) The Chians were the most faithful allies of Athens, and hence their
 name was always mentioned in prayers, decrees, etc.
 
 CHORUS ...to the heroes, the birds, to the sons of heroes, to the
 porphyrion, the pelican, the spoon-bill, the redbreast, the grouse, the
 peacock, the horned-owl, the teal, the bittern, the heron, the stormy
 petrel, the fig-pecker, the titmouse...
 
 PISTHETAERUS Stop! stop! you drive me crazy with your endless list.
 Why, wretch, to what sacred feast are you inviting the vultures and the
 sea-eagles? Don't you see that a single kite could easily carry off the
 lot at once? Begone, you and your fillets and all; I shall know how to
 complete the sacrifice by myself.
 
 PRIEST It is imperative that I sing another sacred chant for the rite of
 the lustral water, and that I invoke the immortals, or at least one of
 them, provided always that you have some suitable food to offer him;
 from what I see here, in the shape of gifts, there is naught whatever
 but horn and hair.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Let us address our sacrifices and our prayers to the winged
 gods.
 
 A POET Oh, Muse! celebrate happy Nephelococcygia in your hymns.
 
 PISTHETAERUS What have we here? Where did you come from, tell me? Who
 are you?
 
 POET I am he whose language is sweeter than honey, the zealous slave of
 the Muses, as Homer has it.
 
 PISTHETAERUS You a slave! and yet you wear your hair long?
 
 POET No, but the fact is all we poets are the assiduous slaves of the
 Muses, according to Homer.
 
 PISTHETAERUS In truth your little cloak is quite holy too through zeal!
 But, poet, what ill wind drove you here?
 
 POET I have composed verses in honour of your Nephelococcygia, a host of
 splendid dithyrambs and parthenians(1) worthy of Simonides himself.
 
 
 f(1) Verses sung by maidens.
 
 PISTHETAERUS And when did you compose them? How long since?
 
 POET Oh! 'tis long, aye, very long, that I have sung in honour of this
 city.
 
 PISTHETAERUS But I am only celebrating its foundation with this
 sacrifice;(1) I have only just named it, as is done with little babies.
 
 
 f(1) This ceremony took place on the tenth day after birth, and may be
 styled the pagan baptism.
 
 POET "Just as the chargers fly with the speed of the wind, so does the
 voice of the Muses take its flight. Oh! thou noble founder of the town
 of Aetna,(1) thou, whose name recalls the holy sacrifices,(2) make us
 such gift as thy generous heart shall suggest."
 
 
 f(1) Hiero, tyrant of Syracuse.--This passage is borrowed from Pindar.
 
 
 f(2) (Hiero) in Greek means 'sacrifice.'
 
 PISTHETAERUS He will drive us silly if we do not get rid of him by some
 present. Here! you, who have a fur as well as your tunic, take it off
 and give it to this clever poet. Come, take this fur; you look to me to
 be shivering with cold.
 
 POET My Muse will gladly accept this gift; but engrave these verses of
 Pindar's on your mind.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! what a pest! 'Tis impossible then to be rid of him!
 
 POET "Straton wanders among the Scythian nomads, but has no linen
 garment. He is sad at only wearing an animal's pelt and no tunic." Do
 you conceive my bent?
 
 PISTHETAERUS I understand that you want me to offer you a tunic. Hi!
 you (TO EUELPIDES), take off yours; we must help the poet.... Come, you,
 take it and begone.
 
 POET I am going, and these are the verses that I address to this city:
 "Phoebus of the golden throne, celebrate this shivery, freezing city;
 I have travelled through fruitful and snow-covered plains. Tralala!
 Tralala!"(1)
 
 
 f(1) A parody of poetic pathos, not to say bathos.
 
 PISTHETAERUS What are you chanting us about frosts? Thanks to the tunic,
 you no longer fear them. Ah! by Zeus! I could not have believed this
 cursed fellow could so soon have learnt the way to our city. Come,
 priest, take the lustral water and circle the altar.
 
 PRIEST Let all keep silence!
 
 A PROPHET Let not the goat be sacrificed.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Which the priest was preparing to sacrifice.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Who are you?
 
 PROPHET Who am I? A prophet.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Get you gone.
 
 PROPHET Wretched man, insult not sacred things. For there is an oracle
 of Bacis, which exactly applies to Nephelococcygia.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why did you not reveal it to me before I founded my city?
 
 PROPHET The divine spirit was against it.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Well, 'tis best to know the terms of the oracle.
 
 PROPHET "But when the wolves and the white crows shall dwell together
 between Corinth and Sicyon..."
 
 PISTHETAERUS But how do the Corinthians concern me?
 
 PROPHET 'Tis the regions of the air that Bacis indicated in this manner.
 "They must first sacrifice a white-fleeced goat to Pandora, and give the
 prophet, who first reveals my words, a good cloak and new sandals."
 
 PISTHETAERUS Are the sandals there?
 
 PROPHET Read. "And besides this a goblet of wine and a good share of the
 entrails of the victim."
 
 PISTHETAERUS Of the entrails--is it so written?
 
 PROPHET Read. "If you do as I command, divine youth, you shall be an
 eagle among the clouds; if not, you shall be neither turtle-dove, nor
 eagle, nor woodpecker."
 
 PISTHETAERUS Is all that there?
 
 PROPHET Read.
 
 PISTHETAERUS This oracle in no sort of way resembles the one Apollo
 dictated to me: "If an impostor comes without invitation to annoy you
 during the sacrifice and to demand a share of the victim, apply a stout
 stick to his ribs."
 
 PROPHET You are drivelling.
 
 PISTHETAERUS "And don't spare him, were he an eagle from out of the
 clouds, were it Lampon(1) himself or the great Diopithes."(2)
 
 
 f(1) Noted Athenian diviner, who, when the power was still shared
 between Thucydides and Pericles, predicted that it would soon be centred
 in the hands of the latter; his ground for this prophecy was the sight
 of a ram with a single horn.
 
 f(2) No doubt another Athenian diviner, and possibly the same person
 whom Aristophanes names in 'The Knights' and 'The Wasps' as being a
 thief.
 
 PROPHET Is all that there?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here, read it yourself, and go and hang yourself.
 
 PROPHET Oh! unfortunate wretch that I am.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Away with you, and take your prophecies elsewhere.
 
 METON(1) I have come to you.
 
 
 f(1) A celebrated geometrician and astronomer.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Yet another pest! What have you come to do? What's your
 plan? What's the purpose of your journey? Why these splendid buskins?
 
 METON I want to survey the plains of the air for you and to parcel them
 into lots.
 
 PISTHETAERUS In the name of the gods, who are you?
 
 METON Who am I? Meton, known throughout Greece and at Colonus.(1)
 
 
 f(1) A deme contiguous to Athens. It is as though he said, "Well known
 throughout all England and at Croydon.
 
 PISTHETAERUS What are these things?
 
 METON Tools for measuring the air. In truth, the spaces in the air have
 precisely the form of a furnace. With this bent ruler I draw a line
 from top to bottom; from one of its points I describe a circle with the
 compass. Do you understand?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Not the very least.
 
 METON With the straight ruler I set to work to inscribe a square within
 this circle; in its centre will be the market-place, into which all
 the straight streets will lead, converging to this centre like a star,
 which, although only orbicular, sends forth its rays in a straight line
 from all sides.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Meton, you new Thales...(1)
 
 
 f(1) Thales was no less famous as a geometrician than he was as a sage.
 
 METON What d'you want with me?
 
 PISTHETAERUS I want to give you a proof of my friendship. Use your legs.
 
 METON Why, what have I to fear?
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis the same here as in Sparta. Strangers are driven away,
 and blows rain down as thick as hail.
 
 METON Is there sedition in your city?
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, certainly not.
 
 METON What's wrong then?
 
 PISTHETAERUS We are agreed to sweep all quacks and impostors far from
 our borders.
 
 METON Then I'm off.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I fear 'tis too late. The thunder growls already. (BEATS
 HIM.)
 
 METON Oh, woe! oh, woe!
 
 PISTHETAERUS I warned you. Now, be off, and do your surveying somewhere
 else. (METON TAKES TO HIS HEELS.)
 
 AN INSPECTOR Where are the Proxeni?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Officers of Athens, whose duty was to protect strangers who came on
 political or other business, and see to their interests generally.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Who is this Sardanapalus?(1)
 
 
 f(1) He addresses the inspector thus because of the royal and
 magnificent manners he assumes.
 
 INSPECTOR I have been appointed by lot to come to Nephelococcygia as
 inspector.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Magistrates appointed to inspect the tributary towns.
 
 PISTHETAERUS An inspector! and who sends you here, you rascal?
 
 INSPECTOR A decree of T(e)leas.(1)
 
 
 f(1) A much-despised citizen, already mentioned. He ironically supposes
 him invested with the powers of an Archon, which ordinarily were
 entrusted only to men of good repute.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Will you just pocket your salary, do nothing, and be off?
 
 INSPECTOR I' faith! that I will; I am urgently needed to be at Athens
 to attend the assembly; for I am charged with the interests of
 Pharnaces.(1)
 
 
 f(1) A Persian satrap.--An allusion to certain orators, who, bribed with
 Asiatic gold, had often defended the interests of the foe in the Public
 Assembly.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Take it then, and be off. See, here is your salary. (BEATS
 HIM.)
 
 INSPECTOR What does this mean?
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis the assembly where you have to defend Pharnaces.
 
 INSPECTOR You shall testify that they dare to strike me, the inspector.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Are you not going to clear out with your urns? 'Tis not
 to be believed; they send us inspectors before we have so much as paid
 sacrifice to the gods.
 
 A DEALER IN DECREES "If the Nephelococcygian does wrong to the
 Athenian..."
 
 PISTHETAERUS Now whatever are these cursed parchments?
 
 DEALER IN DECREES I am a dealer in decrees, and I have come here to sell
 you the new laws.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Which?
 
 DEALER IN DECREES "The Nephelococcygians shall adopt the same weights,
 measures and decrees as the Olophyxians."(1)
 
 
 f(1) A Macedonian people in the peninsula of Chalcidice. This name is
 chosen because of its similarity to the Greek word (for) 'to groan.' It
 is from another verb, meaning the same thing, that Pisthetaerus coins
 the name of Ototyxians, i.e. groaners, because he is about to beat the
 dealer.--The mother-country had the right to impose any law it chose
 upon its colonies.
 
 PISTHETAERUS And you shall soon be imitating the Ototyxians. (BEATS
 HIM.)
 
 DEALER IN DECREES Hullo! what are you doing?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Now will you be off with your decrees? For I am going to
 let YOU see some severe ones.
 
 INSPECTOR (RETURNING) I summon Pisthetaerus for outrage for the month of
 Munychion.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Corresponding to our month of April.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ha! my friend! are you still there?
 
 DEALER IN DECREES "Should anyone drive away the magistrates and not
 receive them, according to the decree duly posted..."
 
 PISTHETAERUS What! rascal! you are there too?
 
 INSPECTOR Woe to you! I'll have you condemned to a fine of ten thousand
 drachmae.
 
 PISTHETAERUS And I'll smash your urns.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Which the inspector had brought with him for the purpose of
 inaugurating the assemblies of the people or some tribunal.
 
 INSPECTOR Do you recall that evening when you stooled against the column
 where the decrees are posted?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here! here! let him be seized. (THE INSPECTOR RUNS OFF.)
 Well! don't you want to stop any longer?
 
 PRIEST Let us get indoors as quick as possible; we will sacrifice the
 goat inside.(1)
 
 
 f(1) So that the sacrifices might no longer be interrupted.
 
 CHORUS Henceforth it is to me that mortals must address their sacrifices
 and their prayers. Nothing escapes my sight nor my might. My glance
 embraces the universe, I preserve the fruit in the flower by destroying
 the thousand kinds of voracious insects the soil produces, which attack
 the trees and feed on the germ when it has scarcely formed in the calyx;
 I destroy those who ravage the balmy terrace gardens like a deadly
 plague; all these gnawing crawling creatures perish beneath the lash of
 my wing. I hear it proclaimed everywhere: "A talent for him who shall
 kill Diagoras of Melos,(1) and a talent for him who destroys one of the
 dead tyrants."(2) We likewise wish to make our proclamation: "A talent
 to him among you who shall kill Philocrates, the Struthian;(3) four,
 if he brings him to us alive. For this Philocrates skewers the finches
 together and sells them at the rate of an obolus for seven. He tortures
 the thrushes by blowing them out, so that they may look bigger, sticks
 their own feathers into the nostrils of blackbirds, and collects
 pigeons, which he shuts up and forces them, fastened in a net, to decoy
 others." That is what we wish to proclaim. And if anyone is keeping
 birds shut up in his yard, let him hasten to let them loose; those who
 disobey shall be seized by the birds and we shall put them in chains, so
 that in their turn they may decoy other men.
 
 Happy indeed is the race of winged birds who need no cloak in winter!
 Neither do I fear the relentless rays of the fiery dog-days; when the
 divine grasshopper, intoxicated with the sunlight, when noon is burning
 the ground, is breaking out into shrill melody; my home is beneath the
 foliage in the flowery meadows. I winter in deep caverns, where I frolic
 with the mountain nymphs, while in spring I despoil the gardens of the
 Graces and gather the white, virgin berry on the myrtle bushes.
 
 I want now to speak to the judges about the prize they are going to
 award; if they are favourable to us, we will load them with benefits far
 greater than those Paris(4) received. Firstly, the owls of Laurium,(5)
 which every judge desires above all things, shall never be wanting to
 you; you shall see them homing with you, building their nests in your
 money-bags and laying coins. Besides, you shall be housed like the
 gods, for we shall erect gables(6) over your dwellings; if you hold
 some public post and want to do a little pilfering, we will give you the
 sharp claws of a hawk. Are you dining in town, we will provide you with
 crops.(7) But, if your award is against us, don't fail to have metal
 covers fashioned for yourselves, like those they place over statues;(8)
 else, look out! for the day you wear a white tunic all the birds will
 soil it with their droppings.
 
 
 f(1) A disciple of Democrites; he passed over from superstition to
 atheism. The injustice and perversity of mankind led him to deny the
 existence of the gods, to lay bare the mysteries and to break the
 idols. The Athenians had put a price on his head, so he left Greece and
 perished soon afterwards in a storm at sea.
 
 f(2) By this jest Aristophanes means to imply that tyranny is dead, and
 that no one aspires to despotic power, though this silly accusation was
 constantly being raised by the demagogues and always favourably received
 by the populace.
 
 f(3) A poulterer.--Strouthian, used in joke to designate him, as if from
 the name of his 'deme,' is derived from (the Greek for) 'a sparrow.' The
 birds' foe is thus grotesquely furnished with an ornithological surname.
 
 f(4) From Aphrodite (Venus), to whom he had awarded the apple, prize of
 beauty, in the contest of the "goddesses three."
 
 f(5) Laurium was an Athenian deme at the extremity of the Attic
 peninsula containing valuable silver mines, the revenues of which were
 largely employed in the maintenance of the fleet and payment of the
 crews. The "owls of Laurium," of course, mean pieces of money; the
 Athenian coinage was stamped with a representation of an owl, the bird
 of Athene.
 
 f(6) A pun, impossible to keep in English, on the two meanings of (the
 Greek) word which signifies both an eagle and the gable of a house or
 pediment of a temple.
 
 f(7) That is, birds' crops, into which they could stow away plenty of
 good things.
 
 f(8) The Ancients appear to have placed metal discs over statues
 standing in the open air, to save them from injury from the weather,
 etc.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Birds! the sacrifice is propitious. But I see no messenger
 coming from the wall to tell us what is happening. Ah! here comes one
 running himself out of breath as though he were running the Olympic
 stadium.
 
 MESSENGER Where, where is he? Where, where, where is he? Where, where,
 where is he? Where is Pisthetaerus, our leader?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here am I.
 
 MESSENGER The wall is finished.
 
 PISTHETAERUS That's good news.
 
 MESSENGER 'Tis a most beautiful, a most magnificent work of art. The
 wall is so broad that Proxenides, the Braggartian, and Theogenes could
 pass each other in their chariots, even if they were drawn by steeds as
 big as the Trojan horse.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis wonderful!
 
 MESSENGER Its length is one hundred stadia; I measured it myself.
 
 PISTHETAERUS A decent length, by Posidon! And who built such a wall?
 
 MESSENGER Birds--birds only; they had neither Egyptian brickmaker, nor
 stone-mason, nor carpenter; the birds did it all themselves; I could
 hardly believe my eyes. Thirty thousand cranes came from Libya with
 a supply of stones,(1) intended for the foundations. The water-rails
 chiselled them with their beaks. Ten thousand storks were busy making
 bricks; plovers and other water fowl carried water into the air.
 
 
 f(1) So as not to be carried away by the wind when crossing the sea,
 cranes are popularly supposed to ballast themselves with stones, which
 they carry in their beaks.
 
 PISTHETAERUS And who carried the mortar?
 
 MESSENGER Herons, in hods.
 
 PISTHETAERUS But how could they put the mortar into hods?
 
 MESSENGER Oh! 'twas a truly clever invention; the geese used their feet
 like spades; they buried them in the pile of mortar and then emptied
 them into the hods.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! to what use cannot feet be put?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Pisthetaerus modifies the Greek proverbial saying, "To what use
 cannot hands be put?"
 
 MESSENGER You should have seen how eagerly the ducks carried bricks.
 To complete the tale, the swallows came flying to the work, their beaks
 full of mortar and their trowel on their back, just the way little
 children are carried.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Who would want paid servants after this? But tell me, who
 did the woodwork?
 
 MESSENGER Birds again, and clever carpenters too, the pelicans, for they
 squared up the gates with their beaks in such a fashion that one would
 have thought they were using axes; the noise was just like a dockyard.
 Now the whole wall is tight everywhere, securely bolted and well
 guarded; it is patrolled, bell in hand; the sentinels stand everywhere
 and beacons burn on the towers. But I must run off to clean myself; the
 rest is your business.
 
 CHORUS Well! what do you say to it? Are you not astonished at the wall
 being completed so quickly?
 
 PISTHETAERUS By the gods, yes, and with good reason. 'Tis really not to
 be believed. But here comes another messenger from the wall to bring us
 some further news! What a fighting look he has!
 
 SECOND MESSENGER Oh! oh! oh! oh! oh! oh!
 
 PISTHETAERUS What's the matter?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER A horrible outrage has occurred; a god sent by Zeus
 has passed through our gates and has penetrated the realms of the air
 without the knowledge of the jays, who are on guard in the daytime.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis an unworthy and criminal deed. What god was it?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER We don't know that. All we know is, that he has got
 wings.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why were not guards sent against him at once?
 
 SECOND MESSENGER We have d(i)spatched thirty thousand hawks of the
 legion of Mounted Archers.(1) All the hook-clawed birds are moving
 against him, the kestrel, the buzzard, the vulture, the great-horned
 owl; they cleave the air, so that it resounds with the flapping of their
 wings; they are looking everywhere for the god, who cannot be far away;
 indeed, if I mistake not, he is coming from yonder side.
 
 
 f(1) A corps of Athenian cavalry was so named.
 
 PISTHETAERUS All arm themselves with slings and bows! This way, all our
 soldiers; shoot and strike! Some one give me a sling!
 
 CHORUS War, a terrible war is breaking out between us and the gods!
 Come, let each one guard Air, the son of Erebus,(1) in which the clouds
 float. Take care no immortal enters it without your knowledge. Scan
 all sides with your glance. Hark! methinks I can hear the rustle of the
 swift wings of a god from heaven.
 
 
 f(1) Chaos, Night, Tartarus, and Erebus alone existed in the beginning;
 Eros was born from Night and Erebus, and he wedded Chaos and begot
 Earth, Air, and Heaven; so runs the fable.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Hi! you woman! where are you flying to? Halt, don't stir!
 keep motionless! not a beat of your wing!--Who are you and from what
 country? You must say whence you come.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Iris appears from the top of the stage and arrests her flight in
 mid-career.
 
 IRIS I come from the abode of the Olympian gods.
 
 PISTHETAERUS What's your name, ship or cap?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Ship, because of her wings, which resemble oars; cap, because she
 no doubt wore the head-dress (as a messenger of the gods) with which
 Hermes is generally depicted.
 
 IRIS I am swift Iris.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Paralus or Salaminia?(1)
 
 
 f(1) The names of the two sacred galleys which carried Athenian
 officials on State business.
 
 IRIS What do you mean?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Let a buzzard rush at her and seize her.(1)
 
 
 f(1) A buzzard is named in order to raise a laugh, the Greek name also
 meaning, etymologically, provided with three testicles, vigorous in
 love.
 
 IRIS Seize me! But what do all these insults mean?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Woe to you!
 
 IRIS 'Tis incomprehensible.
 
 PISTHETAERUS By which gate did you pass through the wall, wretched
 woman?
 
 IRIS By which gate? Why, great gods, I don't know.
 
 PISTHETAERUS You hear how she holds us in derision. Did you present
 yourself to the officers in command of the jays? You don't answer. Have
 you a permit, bearing the seal of the storks?
 
 IRIS Am I awake?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Did you get one?
 
 IRIS Are you mad?
 
 PISTHETAERUS No head-bird gave you a safe-conduct?
 
 IRIS A safe-conduct to me, you poor fool!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! and so you slipped into this city on the sly and into
 these realms of air-land that don't belong to you.
 
 IRIS And what other roads can the gods travel?
 
 PISTHETAERUS By Zeus! I know nothing about that, not I. But they won't
 pass this way. And you still dare to complain! Why, if you were treated
 according to your deserts, no Iris would ever have more justly suffered
 death.
 
 IRIS I am immortal.
 
 PISTHETAERUS You would have died nevertheless.--Oh! 'twould be truly
 intolerable! What! should the universe obey us and the gods alone
 continue their insolence and not understand that they must submit to
 the law of the strongest in their due turn? But tell me, where are you
 flying to?
 
 IRIS I? The messenger of Zeus to mankind, I am going to tell them to
 sacrifice sheep and oxen on the altars and to fill their streets with
 the rich smoke of burning fat.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Of which gods are you speaking?
 
 IRIS Of which? Why, of ourselves, the gods of heaven.
 
 PISTHETAERUS You, gods?
 
 IRIS Are there others then?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Men now adore the birds as gods, and 'tis to them, by Zeus,
 that they must offer sacrifices, and not to Zeus at all!
 
 IRIS Oh! fool! fool! Rouse not the wrath of the gods, for 'tis terrible
 indeed. Armed with the brand of Zeus, Justice would annihilate your
 race; the lightning would strike you as it did Licymnius and consume
 both your body and the porticos of your palace.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Iris' reply is a parody of the tragic style.--'Lycimnius' is,
 according to the scholiast, the title of a tragedy by Euripides, which
 is about a ship that is struck by lightning.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here! that's enough tall talk. Just you listen and keep
 quiet! Do you take me for a Lydian or a Phrygian(1) and think to
 frighten me with your big words? Know, that if Zeus worries me again,
 I shall go at the head of my eagles, who are armed with lightning, and
 reduce his dwelling and that of Amphion to cinders.(2) I shall send more
 than six hundred porphyrions clothed in leopards' skins(3) up to heaven
 against him; and formerly a single Porphyrion gave him enough to do.
 As for you, his messenger, if you annoy me, I shall begin by stretching
 your legs asunder, and so conduct myself, Iris though you be, that
 despite my age, you will be astonished. I will show you something that
 will make you three times over.
 
 
 f(1) i.e. for a poltroon, like the slaves, most of whom came to Athens
 from these countries.
 
 f(2) A parody of a passage in the lost tragedy of 'Niobe' of Aeschylus.
 
 f(3) Because this bird has a spotted plumage.--Porphyrion is also the
 name of one of the Titans who tried to storm heave.
 
 IRIS May you perish, you wretch, you and your infamous words!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Won't you be off quickly? Come, stretch your wings or look
 out for squalls!
 
 IRIS If my father does not punish you for your insults...
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ha!... but just you be off elsewhere to roast younger folk
 than us with your lightning.
 
 CHORUS We forbid the gods, the sons of Zeus, to pass through our city
 and the mortals to send them the smoke of their sacrifices by this road.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis odd that the messenger we sent to the mortals has
 never returned.
 
 HERALD Oh! blessed Pisthetaerus, very wise, very illustrious, very
 gracious, thrice happy, very... Come, prompt me, somebody, do.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Get to your story!
 
 HERALD All peoples are filled with admiration for your wisdom, and they
 award you this golden crown.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I accept it. But tell me, why do the people admire me?
 
 HERALD Oh you, who have founded so illustrious a city in the air, you
 know not in what esteem men hold you and how many there are who burn
 with desire to dwell in it. Before your city was built, all men had a
 mania for Sparta; long hair and fasting were held in honour, men went
 dirty like Socrates and carried staves. Now all is changed. Firstly, as
 soon as 'tis dawn, they all spring out of bed together to go and seek
 their food, the same as you do; then they fly off towards the notices
 and finally devour the decrees. The bird-madness is so clear, that many
 actually bear the names of birds. There is a halting victualler, who
 styles himself the partridge; Menippus calls himself the swallow;
 Opuntius the one-eyed crow; Philocles the lark; Theogenes the fox-goose;
 Lycurgus the ibis; Chaerephon the bat; Syracosius the magpie; Midias the
 quail;(1) indeed he looks like a quail that has been hit hard over the
 head. Out of love for the birds they repeat all the songs which concern
 the swallow, the teal, the goose or the pigeon; in each verse you see
 wings, or at all events a few feathers. This is what is happening down
 there. Finally, there are more than ten thousand folk who are coming
 here from earth to ask you for feathers and hooked claws; so, mind you
 supply yourself with wings for the immigrants.
 
 
 f(1) All these surnames bore some relation to the character or the build
 of the individual to whom the poet applies them.--Chaerephon,
 Socrates' disciple, was of white and ashen hue.--Opuntius was
 one-eyed.--Syracosius was a braggart.--Midias had a passion for
 quail-fights, and, besides, resembled that bird physically.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! by Zeus, 'tis not the time for idling. Go as quick as
 possible and fill every hamper, every basket you can find with wings.
 Manes(1) will bring them to me outside the walls, where I will welcome
 those who present themselves.
 
 
 f(1) Pisthetaerus' servant, already mentioned.
 
 CHORUS This town will soon be inhabited by a crowd of men.
 
 PISTHETAERUS If fortune favours us.
 
 CHORUS Folk are more and more delighted with it.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Come, hurry up and bring them along.
 
 CHORUS Will not man find here everything that can please him--wisdom,
 love, the divine Graces, the sweet face of gentle peace?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! you lazy servant! won't you hurry yourself?
 
 CHORUS Let a basket of wings be brought speedily. Come, beat him as I
 do, and put some life into him; he is as lazy as an ass.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Aye, Manes is a great craven.
 
 CHORUS Begin by putting this heap of wings in order; divide them in
 three parts according to the birds from whom they came; the singing,
 the prophetic(1) and the aquatic birds; then you must take care to
 distribute them to the men according to their character.
 
 
 f(1) From the inspection of which auguries were taken, e.g. the eagles,
 the vultures, the crows.
 
 PISTHETAERUS (TO MANES) Oh! by the kestrels! I can keep my hands off you
 no longer; you are too slow and lazy altogether.
 
 A PARRICIDE(1) Oh! might I but become an eagle, who soars in the skies!
 Oh! might I fly above the azure waves of the barren sea!(2)
 
 
 f(1) Or rather, a young man who contemplated parricide.
 
 f(2) A parody of verses in Sophocles 'Oenomaus.'
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ha! 'twould seem the news was true; I hear someone coming
 who talks of wings.
 
 PARRICIDE Nothing is more charming than to fly; I burn with desire to
 live under the same laws as the birds; I am bird-mad and fly towards
 you, for I want to live with you and to obey your laws.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Which laws? The birds have many laws.
 
 PARRICIDE All of them; but the one that pleases me most is, that among
 the birds it is considered a fine thing to peck and strangle one's
 father.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Aye, by Zeus! according to us, he who dares to strike his
 father, while still a chick, is a brave fellow.
 
 PARRICIDE And therefore I want to dwell here, for I want to strangle my
 father and inherit his wealth.
 
 PISTHETAERUS But we have also an ancient law written in the code of the
 storks, which runs thus, "When the stork father has reared his young
 and has taught them to fly, the young must in their turn support the
 father."
 
 PARRICIDE 'Tis hardly worth while coming all this distance to be
 compelled to keep my father!
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, no, young friend, since you have come to us with such
 willingness, I am going to give you these black wings, as though you
 were an orphan bird; furthermore, some good advice, that I received
 myself in infancy. Don't strike your father, but take these wings in one
 hand and these spurs in the other; imagine you have a cock's crest on
 your head and go and mount guard and fight; live on your pay and respect
 your father's life. You're a gallant fellow! Very well, then! Fly to
 Thrace and fight.(1)
 
 
 f(1) The Athenians were then besieging Amphipolis in the Thracian
 Chalcidice.
 
 PARRICIDE By Bacchus! 'Tis well spoken; I will follow your counsel.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis acting wisely, by Zeus.
 
 CINESIAS(1) "On my light pinions I soar off to Olympus; in its
 capricious flight my Muse flutters along the thousand paths of poetry in
 turn..."
 
 
 f(1) There was a real Cinesias--a dythyrambic poet born at Thebes.
 
 PISTHETAERUS This is a fellow will need a whole shipload of wings.
 
 CINESIAS (singing) "...and being fearless and vigorous, it is seeking
 fresh outlet."
 
 PISTHETAERUS Welcome, Cinesias, you lime-wood man!(1) Why have you come
 here a-twisting your game leg in circles?
 
 
 f(1) The scholiast thinks that Cinesias, who was tall and slight of
 build, wore a kind of corset of lime-wood to support his waist--surely
 rather a far-fetched interpretation!
 
 CINESIAS "I want to become a bird, a tuneful nightingale."
 
 PISTHETAERUS Enough of that sort of ditty. Tell me what you want.
 
 CINESIAS Give me wings and I will fly into the topmost airs to gather
 fresh songs in the clouds, in the midst of the vapours and the fleecy
 snow.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Gather songs in the clouds?
 
 CINESIAS 'Tis on them the whole of our latter-day art depends. The most
 brilliant dithyrambs are those that flap their wings in void space
 and are clothed in mist and dense obscurity. To appreciate this, just
 listen.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! no, no, no!
 
 CINESIAS By Hermes! but indeed you shall. "I shall travel through thine
 ethereal empire like a winged bird, who cleaveth space with his long
 neck..."
 
 PISTHETAERUS Stop! easy all, I say!(1)
 
 
 f(1) The Greek word used here was the word of command employed to stop
 the rowers.
 
 CINESIAS "...as I soar over the seas, carried by the breath of the
 winds..."
 
 PISTHETAERUS By Zeus! but I'll cut your breath short.
 
 CINESIAS "...now rushing along the tracks of Notus, now nearing Boreas
 across the infinite wastes of the ether." (PISTHETAERUS BEATS HIM.) Ah!
 old man, that's a pretty and clever idea truly!
 
 PISTHETAERUS What! are you not delighted to be cleaving the air?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Cinesias makes a bound each time that Pisthetaerus strikes him.
 
 CINESIAS To treat a dithyrambic poet, for whom the tribes dispute with
 each other, in this style!(1)
 
 
 f(1) The tribes of Athens, or rather the rich citizens belonging to
 them, were wont on feast-days to give representations of dithyrambic
 choruses as well as of tragedies and comedies.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Will you stay with us and form a chorus of winged birds as
 slender as Leotrophides(1) for the Cecropid tribe?
 
 
 f(1) Another dithyrambic poet, a man of extreme leanness.
 
 CINESIAS You are making game of me, 'tis clear; but know that I shall
 never leave you in peace if I do not have wings wherewith to traverse
 the air.
 
 AN INFORMER What are these birds with downy feathers, who look so
 pitiable to me? Tell me, oh swallow with the long dappled wings.(1)
 
 
 f(1) A parody of a hemistich from 'Alcaeus.'--The informer is
 dissatisfied at only seeing birds of sombre plumage and poor appearance.
 He would have preferred to denounce the rich.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! but 'tis a regular invasion that threatens us. Here
 comes another of them, humming along.
 
 INFORMER Swallow with the long dappled wings, once more I summon you.
 
 PISTHETAERUS It's his cloak I believe he's addressing; 'faith, it stands
 in great need of the swallows' return.(1)
 
 
 f(1) The informer, says the scholiast, was clothed with a ragged cloak,
 the tatters of which hung down like wings, in fact, a cloak that could
 not protect him from the cold and must have made him long for the
 swallows' return, i.e. the spring.
 
 INFORMER Where is he who gives out wings to all comers?
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis I, but you must tell me for what purpose you want
 them.
 
 INFORMER Ask no questions. I want wings, and wings I must have.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Do you want to fly straight to Pellene?(1)
 
 
 f(1) A town in Achaia, where woollen cloaks were made.
 
 INFORMER I? Why, I am an accuser of the islands,(1) an informer...
 
 
 f(1) His trade was to accuse the rich citizens of the subject islands,
 and drag them before the Athenian court; he explains later the special
 advantages of this branch of the informer's business.
 
 PISTHETAERUS A fine trade, truly!
 
 INFORMER ...a hatcher of lawsuits. Hence I have great need of wings to
 prowl round the cities and drag them before justice.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Would you do this better if you had wings?
 
 INFORMER No, but I should no longer fear the pirates; I should return
 with the cranes, loaded with a supply of lawsuits by way of ballast.
 
 PISTHETAERUS So it seems, despite all your youthful vigour, you make it
 your trade to denounce strangers?
 
 INFORMER Well, and why not? I don't know how to dig.
 
 PISTHETAERUS But, by Zeus! there are honest ways of gaining a living at
 your age without all this infamous trickery.
 
 INFORMER My friend, I am asking you for wings, not for words.
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis just my words that give you wings.
 
 INFORMER And how can you give a man wings with your words?
 
 PISTHETAERUS 'Tis thus that all first start.
 
 INFORMER All?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Have you not often heard the father say to young men in the
 barbers' shops, "It's astonishing how Diitrephes' advice has made my son
 fly to horse-riding."--"Mine," says another, "has flown towards tragic
 poetry on the wings of his imagination."
 
 INFORMER So that words give wings?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Undoubtedly; words give wings to the mind and make a man
 soar to heaven. Thus I hope that my wise words will give you wings to
 fly to some less degrading trade.
 
 INFORMER But I do not want to.
 
 PISTHETAERUS What do you reckon on doing then?
 
 INFORMER I won't belie my breeding; from generation to generation we
 have lived by informing. Quick, therefore, give me quickly some light,
 swift hawk or kestrel wings, so that I may summon the islanders, sustain
 the accusation here, and haste back there again on flying pinions.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I see. In this way the stranger will be condemned even
 before he appears.
 
 INFORMER That's just it.
 
 PISTHETAERUS And while he is on his way here by sea, you will be flying
 to the islands to despoil him of his property.
 
 INFORMER You've hit it, precisely; I must whirl hither and thither like
 a perfect humming-top.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I catch the idea. Wait, i' faith, I've got some fine
 Corcyraean wings.(1) How do you like them?
 
 
 f(1) That is, whips--Corcyra being famous for these articles.
 
 INFORMER Oh! woe is me! Why, 'tis a whip!
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, no; these are the wings, I tell you, that set the top
 a-spinning.
 
 INFORMER Oh! oh! oh!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Take your flight, clear off, you miserable cur, or you will
 soon see what comes of quibbling and lying. Come, let us gather up our
 wings and withdraw.
 
 CHORUS In my ethereal flights I have seen many things new and strange
 and wondrous beyond belief. There is a tree called Cleonymus belonging
 to an unknown species; it has no heart, is good for nothing and is as
 tall as it is cowardly. In springtime it shoots forth calumnies instead
 of buds and in autumn it strews the ground with bucklers in place of
 leaves.(1)
 
 Far away in the regions of darkness, where no ray of light ever enters,
 there is a country, where men sit at the table of the heroes and dwell
 with them always--save always in the evening. Should any mortal meet the
 hero Orestes at night, he would soon be stripped and covered with blows
 from head to foot.(2)
 
 
 f(1) Cleonymous is a standing butt of Aristophanes' wit, both as an
 informer and a notorious poltroon.
 
 f(2) In allusion to the cave of the bandit Orestes; the poet terms him a
 hero only because of his heroic name Orestes.
 
 PROMETHEUS Ah! by the gods! if only Zeus does not espy me! Where is
 Pisthetaerus?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ha! what is this? A masked man!
 
 PROMETHEUS Can you see any god behind me?
 
 PISTHETAERUS No, none. But who are you, pray?
 
 PROMETHEUS What's the time, please?
 
 PISTHETAERUS The time? Why, it's past noon. Who are you?
 
 PROMETHEUS Is it the fall of day? Is it no later than that?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Prometheus wants night to come and so reduce the risk of being seen
 from Olympus.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! 'pon my word! but you grow tiresome.
 
 PROMETHEUS What is Zeus doing? Is he dispersing the clouds or gathering
 them?(1)
 
 
 f(1) The clouds would prevent Zeus seeing what was happening below him.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Take care, lest I lose all patience.
 
 PROMETHEUS Come, I will raise my mask.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! my dear Prometheus!
 
 PROMETHEUS Stop! stop! speak lower!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why, what's the matter, Prometheus?
 
 PROMETHEUS H'sh! h'sh! Don't call me by my name; you will be my ruin, if
 Zeus should see me here. But, if you want me to tell you how things
 are going in heaven, take this umbrella and shield me, so that the gods
 don't see me.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I can recognize Prometheus in this cunning trick. Come,
 quick then, and fear nothing; speak on.
 
 PROMETHEUS Then listen.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I am listening, proceed!
 
 PROMETHEUS It's all over with Zeus.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! and since when, pray?
 
 PROMETHEUS Since you founded this city in the air. There is not a man
 who now sacrifices to the gods; the smoke of the victims no longer
 reaches us. Not the smallest offering comes! We fast as though it were
 the festival of Demeter.(1) The barbarian gods, who are dying of hunger,
 are bawling like Illyrians(2) and threaten to make an armed descent upon
 Zeus, if he does not open markets where joints of the victims are sold.
 
 
 f(1) The third day of the festival of Demeter was a fast.
 
 f(2) A semi-savage people, addicted to violence and brigandage.
 
 PISTHETAERUS What! there are other gods besides you, barbarian gods who
 dwell above Olympus?
 
 PROMETHEUS If there were no barbarian gods, who would be the patron of
 Execestides?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Who, being reputed a stranger despite his pretension to the title
 of a citizen, could only have a strange god for his patron or tutelary
 deity.
 
 PISTHETAERUS And what is the name of these gods?
 
 PROMETHEUS Their name? Why, the Triballi.(1)
 
 
 f(1) The Triballi were a Thracian people; it was a term commonly used in
 Athens to describe coarse men, obscene debauchees and greedy parasites.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah, indeed! 'tis from that no doubt that we derive the word
 'tribulation.'(1)
 
 
 f(1) There is a similar pun in the Greek.
 
 PROMETHEUS Most likely. But one thing I can tell you for certain,
 namely, that Zeus and the celestial Triballi are going to send deputies
 here to sue for peace. Now don't you treat, unless Zeus restores the
 sceptre to the birds and gives you Basileia(1) in marriage.
 
 
 f(1) i.e. the 'supremacy' of Greece, the real object of the war.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Who is this Basileia?
 
 PROMETHEUS A very fine young damsel, who makes the lightning for
 Zeus; all things come from her, wisdom, good laws, virtue, the fleet,
 calumnies, the public paymaster and the triobolus.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! then she is a sort of general manageress to the god.
 
 PROMETHEUS Yes, precisely. If he gives you her for your wife, yours will
 be the almighty power. That is what I have come to tell you; for you
 know my constant and habitual goodwill towards men.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh, yes! 'tis thanks to you that we roast our meat.(1)
 
 
 f(1) Prometheus had stolen the fire from the gods to gratify mankind.
 
 PROMETHEUS I hate the gods, as you know.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Aye, by Zeus, you have always detested them.
 
 PROMETHEUS Towards them I am a veritable Timon;(1) but I must return in
 all haste, so give me the umbrella; if Zeus should see me from up there,
 he would think I was escorting one of the Canephori.(2)
 
 
 f(1) A celebrated misanthrope, contemporary to Aristophanes. Hating the
 society of men, he had only a single friend, Apimantus, to whom he
 was attached, because of their similarity of character; he also liked
 Alcibiades, because he foresaw that this young man would be the ruin of
 his country.
 
 f(2) The Canephori were young maidens, chosen from the first families
 of the city, who carried baskets wreathed with myrtle at the feast of
 Athene, while at those of Bacchus and Demeter they appeared with gilded
 baskets.--The daughters of 'Metics,' or resident aliens, walked behind
 them, carrying an umbrella and a stool.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Wait, take this stool as well.
 
 CHORUS Near by the land of the Sciapodes(1) there is a marsh, from the
 borders whereof the odious Socrates evokes the souls of men. Pisander(2)
 came one day to see his soul, which he had left there when still alive.
 He offered a little victim, a camel,(3) slit his throat and, following
 the example of Ulysses, stepped one pace backwards.(4) Then that bat of
 a Chaerephon(5) came up from hell to drink the camel's blood.
 
 
 f(1) According to Ctesias, the Sciapodes were a people who dwelt on the
 borders of the Atlantic. Their feet were larger than the rest of their
 bodies, and to shield themselves from the sun's rays they held up one of
 their feet as an umbrella.--By giving the Socratic philosophers the name
 of Sciapodes here Aristophanes wishes to convey that they are walking in
 the dark and busying themselves with the greatest nonsense.
 
 f(2) This Pisander was a notorious coward; for this reason the poet
 jestingly supposes that he had lost his soul, the seat of courage.
 
 f(3) Considering the shape and height of the camel, (it) can certainly
 not be included in the list of SMALL victims, e.g. the sheep and the
 goat.
 
 f(4) In the evocation of the dead, Book XI of the Odyssey.
 
 f(5) Chaerephon was given this same title by the Herald earlier in this
 comedy.--Aristophanes supposes him to have come from hell because he is
 lean and pallid.
 
 POSIDON(1) This is the city of Nephelococcygia, Cloud-cuckoo-town,
 whither we come as ambassadors. (TO TRIBALLUS) Hi! what are you up to?
 you are throwing your cloak over the left shoulder. Come, fling it quick
 over the right! And why, pray, does it draggle in this fashion? Have
 you ulcers to hide like Laespodias?(2) Oh! democracy!(3) whither, oh!
 whither are you leading us? Is it possible that the gods have chosen
 such an envoy?
 
 
 f(1) Posidon appears on the stage accompanied by Heracles and a
 Triballian god.
 
 f(2) An Athenian general.--Neptune is trying to give Triballus some
 notions of elegance and good behaviour.
 
 f(3) Aristophanes supposes that democracy is in the ascendant in Olympus
 as it is in Athens.
 
 TRIBALLUS Leave me alone.
 
 POSIDON Ugh! the cursed savage! you are by far the most barbarous of all
 the gods.--Tell me, Heracles, what are we going to do?
 
 HERACLES I have already told you that I want to strangle the fellow who
 has dared to block us in.
 
 POSIDON But, my friend, we are envoys of peace.
 
 HERACLES All the more reason why I wish to strangle him.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Hand me the cheese-grater; bring me the silphium for sauce;
 pass me the cheese and watch the coals.(1)
 
 
 f(1) He is addressing his servant, Manes.
 
 HERACLES Mortal! we who greet you are three gods.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Wait a bit till I have prepared my silphium pickle.
 
 HERACLES What are these meats?(1)
 
 
 f(1) Heracles softens at sight of the food.--Heracles is the glutton of
 the comic poets.
 
 PISTHETAERUS These are birds that have been punished with death for
 attacking the people's friends.
 
 HERACLES And you are seasoning them before answering us?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! Heracles! welcome, welcome! What's the matter?(1)
 
 
 f(1) He pretends not to have seen them at first, being so much engaged
 with his cookery.
 
 HERACLES The gods have sent us here as ambassadors to treat for peace.
 
 A SERVANT There's no more oil in the flask.
 
 PISTHETAERUS And yet the birds must be thoroughly basted with it.(1)
 
 
 f(1) He pretends to forget the presence of the ambassadors.
 
 HERACLES We have no interest to serve in fighting you; as for you, be
 friends and we promise that you shall always have rain-water in your
 pools and the warmest of warm weather. So far as these points go we are
 armed with plenary authority.
 
 PISTHETAERUS We have never been the aggressors, and even now we are
 as well disposed for peace as yourselves, provided you agree to one
 equitable condition, namely, that Zeus yield his sceptre to the birds.
 If only this is agreed to, I invite the ambassadors to dinner.
 
 HERACLES That's good enough for me. I vote for peace.
 
 POSIDON You wretch! you are nothing but a fool and a glutton. Do you
 want to dethrone your own father?
 
 PISTHETAERUS What an error! Why, the gods will be much more powerful if
 the birds govern the earth. At present the mortals are hidden beneath
 the clouds, escape your observation, and commit perjury in your name;
 but if you had the birds for your allies, and a man, after having sworn
 by the crow and Zeus, should fail to keep his oath, the crow would dive
 down upon him unawares and pluck out his eye.
 
 POSIDON Well thought of, by Posidon!(1)
 
 
 f(1) Posidon jestingly swears by himself.
 
 HERACLES My notion too.
 
 PISTHETAERUS (TO THE TRIBALLIAN) And you, what's your opinion?
 
 TRIBALLUS Nabaisatreu.(1)
 
 
 f(1) The barbarian god utters some gibberish which Pisthetaerus
 interprets into consent.
 
 PISTHETAERUS D'you see? he also approves. But hear another thing in
 which we can serve you. If a man vows to offer a sacrifice to some god,
 and then procrastinates, pretending that the gods can wait, and thus
 does not keep his word, we shall punish his stinginess.
 
 POSIDON Ah! ah! and how?
 
 PISTHETAERUS While he is counting his money or is in the bath, a kite
 will relieve him, before he knows it, either in coin or in clothes, of
 the value of a couple of sheep, and carry it to the god.
 
 HERACLES I vote for restoring them the sceptre.
 
 POSIDON Ask the Triballian.
 
 HERACLES Hi Triballian, do you want a thrashing?
 
 TRIBALLUS Saunaka baktarikrousa.
 
 HERACLES He says, "Right willingly."
 
 POSIDON If that be the opinion of both of you, why, I consent too.
 
 HERACLES Very well! we accord the sceptre.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Ah! I was nearly forgetting another condition. I will leave
 Here to Zeus, but only if the young Basileia is given me in marriage.
 
 POSIDON Then you don't want peace. Let us withdraw.
 
 PISTHETAERUS It matters mighty little to me. Cook, look to the gravy.
 
 HERACLES What an odd fellow this Posidon is! Where are you off to? Are
 we going to war about a woman?
 
 POSIDON What else is there to do?
 
 HERACLES What else? Why, conclude peace.
 
 POSIDON Oh! you ninny! do you always want to be fooled? Why, you are
 seeking your own downfall. If Zeus were to die, after having yielded
 them the sovereignty, you would be ruined, for you are the heir of all
 the wealth he will leave behind.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Oh! by the gods! how he is cajoling you. Step aside, that
 I may have a word with you. Your uncle is getting the better of you,
 my poor friend.(1) The law will not allow you an obolus of the paternal
 property, for you are a bastard and not a legitimate child.
 
 
 f(1) Heracles, the god of strength, was far from being remarkable in the
 way of cleverness.
 
 HERACLES I a bastard! What's that you tell me?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Why, certainly; are you not born of a stranger woman?
 Besides, is not Athene recognized as Zeus' sole heiress? And no daughter
 would be that, if she had a legitimate brother.
 
 HERACLES But what if my father wished to give me his property on his
 death-bed, even though I be a bastard?
 
 PISTHETAERUS The law forbids it, and this same Posidon would be the
 first to lay claim to his wealth, in virtue of being his legitimate
 brother. Listen; thus runs Solon's law: "A bastard shall not inherit, if
 there are legitimate children; and if there are no legitimate children,
 the property shall pass to the nearest kin."(1)
 
 
 f(1) This was Athenian law.
 
 HERACLES And I get nothing whatever of the paternal property?
 
 PISTHETAERUS Absolutely nothing. But tell me, has your father had you
 entered on the registers of his phratria?(1)
 
 
 f(1) The poet attributes to the gods the same customs as those which
 governed Athens, and according to which no child was looked upon as
 legitimate unless his father had entered him on the registers of his
 phratria. The phratria was a division of the tribe and consisted of
 thirty families.
 
 HERACLES No, and I have long been surprised at the omission.
 
 PISTHETAERUS What ails you, that you should shake your fist at heaven?
 Do you want to fight it? Why, be on my side, I will make you a king and
 will feed you on bird's milk and honey.
 
 HERACLES Your further condition seems fair to me. I cede you the young
 damsel.
 
 POSIDON But I, I vote against this opinion.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Then it all depends on the Triballian. (TO THE TRIBALLIAN.)
 What do you say?
 
 TRIBALLUS Big bird give daughter pretty and queen.
 
 HERACLES You say that you give her?
 
 POSIDON Why no, he does not say anything of the sort, that he gives her;
 else I cannot understand any better than the swallows.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Exactly so. Does he not say she must be given to the
 swallows?
 
 POSIDON Very well! you two arrange the matter; make peace, since you
 wish it so; I'll hold my tongue.
 
 HERACLES We are of a mind to grant you all that you ask. But come up
 there with us to receive Basileia and the celestial bounty.
 
 PISTHETAERUS Here are birds already cut up, and very suitable for a
 nuptial feast.
 
 HERACLES You go and, if you like, I will stay here to roast them.
 
 PISTHETAERUS You to roast them! you are too much the glutton; come along
 with us.
 
 HERACLES Ah! how well I would have treated myself!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Let some(one) bring me a beautiful and magnificent tunic
 for the wedding.
 
 CHORUS(1) At Phanae,(2) near the Clepsydra,(3) there dwells a people who
 have neither faith nor law, the Englottogastors,(4) who reap, sow, pluck
 the vines and the figs(5) with their tongues; they belong to a barbaric
 race, and among them the Philippi and the Gorgiases(6) are to be found;
 'tis these Englottogastorian Philippi who introduced the custom all over
 Attica of cutting out the tongue separately at sacrifices.(7)
 
 
 f(1) The chorus continues to tell what it has seen on its flights.
 
 f(2) The harbour of the island of Chios; but this name is here used
 in the sense of being the land of informers ((from the Greek for) 'to
 denounce').
 
 f(3) i.e. near the orators' platform, in the Public Assembly, or because
 there stood the water-clock, by which speeches were limited.
 
 f(4) A coined name, made up of (the Greek for) the tongue, and (for) the
 stomach, and meaning those who fill their stomach with what they gain
 with their tongues, to wit, the orators.
 
 f(5) (The Greek for) a fig forms part of the word which in Greek means
 an informer.
 
 f(6) Both rhetoricians.
 
 f(7) Because they consecrated it specially to the god of eloquence.
 
 A MESSENGER Oh, you, whose unbounded happiness I cannot express in
 words, thrice happy race of airy birds, receive your king in your
 fortunate dwellings. More brilliant than the brightest star that illumes
 the earth, he is approaching his glittering golden palace; the sun
 itself does not shine with more dazzling glory. He is entering with his
 bride at his side,(1) whose beauty no human tongue can express; in his
 hand he brandishes the lightning, the winged shaft of Zeus; perfumes
 of unspeakable sweetness pervade the ethereal realms. 'Tis a glorious
 spectacle to see the clouds of incense wafting in light whirlwinds
 before the breath of the Zephyr! But here he is himself. Divine Muse!
 let thy sacred lips begin with songs of happy omen.
 
 
 f(1) Basileia, whom he brings back from heaven.
 
 CHORUS Fall back! to the right! to the left! advance!(1) Fly around this
 happy mortal, whom Fortune loads with her blessings. Oh! oh! what grace!
 what beauty! Oh, marriage so auspicious for our city! All honour to
 this man! 'tis through him that the birds are called to such glorious
 destinies. Let your nuptial hymns, your nuptial songs, greet him and his
 Basileia! 'Twas in the midst of such festivities that the Fates formerly
 united Olympian Here to the King who governs the gods from the summit
 of his inaccessible throne. Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus! Rosy Eros with
 the golden wings held the reins and guided the chariot; 'twas he, who
 presided over the union of Zeus and the fortunate Here. Oh! Hymen! oh!
 Hymenaeus!
 
 
 f(1) Terms used in regulating a dance.
 
 PISTHETAERUS I am delighted with your songs, I applaud your verses. Now
 celebrate the thunder that shakes the earth, the flaming lightning of
 Zeus and the terrible flashing thunderbolt.
 
 CHORUS Oh, thou golden flash of the lightning! oh, ye divine shafts of
 flame, that Zeus has hitherto shot forth! Oh, ye rolling thunders, that
 bring down the rain! 'Tis by the order of OUR king that ye shall now
 stagger the earth! Oh, Hymen! 'tis through thee that he commands the
 universe and that he makes Basileia, whom he has robbed from Zeus, take
 her seat at his side. Oh! Hymen! oh! Hymenaeus!
 
 PISTHETAERUS Let all the winged tribes of our fellow-citizens follow the
 bridal couple to the palace of Zeus(1) and to the nuptial couch! Stretch
 forth your hands, my dear wife! Take hold of me by my wings and let us
 dance; I am going to lift you up and carry you through the air.
 
 
 f(1) Where Pisthetaerus is henceforth to reign.
 
 CHORUS Oh, joy! Io Paean! Tralala! victory is thing, oh, thou greatest
 of the gods!
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Ted Garvin and the Distributed Proofreaders Team
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 
 Translated from the Greek of
 
 ARISTOPHANES
 
 Illustrations by Norman Lindsay
 
 
 
 
 FOREWORD
 
 _Lysistrata_ is the greatest work by Aristophanes. This blank and rash
 statement is made that it may be rejected. But first let it be
 understood that I do not mean it is a better written work than the
 _Birds_ or the _Frogs_, or that (to descend to the scale of values that
 will be naturally imputed to me) it has any more appeal to the
 collectors of "curious literature" than the _Ecclesiazusae_ or the
 _Thesmophoriazusae_. On the mere grounds of taste I can see an at least
 equally good case made out for the _Birds_. That brightly plumaged
 fantasy has an aerial wit and colour all its own. But there are certain
 works in which a man finds himself at an angle of vision where there is
 an especially felicitous union of the aesthetic and emotional elements
 which constitute the basic qualities of his uniqueness. We recognize
 these works as being welded into a strange unity, as having a
 homogeneous texture of ecstasy over them that surpasses any aesthetic
 surface of harmonic colour, though that harmony also is understood by
 the deeper welling of imagery from the core of creative exaltation. And
 I think that this occurs in _Lysistrata_. The intellectual and spiritual
 tendrils of the poem are more truly interwoven, the operation of their
 centres more nearly unified; and so the work goes deeper into life. It
 is his greatest play because of this, because it holds an intimate
 perfume of femininity and gives the finest sense of the charm of a
 cluster of girls, the sweet sense of their chatter, and the contact of
 their bodies, that is to be found before Shakespeare, because that
 mocking gaiety we call Aristophanies reaches here its most positive
 acclamation of life, vitalizing sex with a deep delight, a rare
 happiness of the spirit.
 
 Indeed it is precisely for these reasons that it is _not_ considered
 Aristophanes' greatest play.
 
 To take a case which is sufficiently near to the point in question, to
 make clear what I mean: the supremacy of _Antony and Cleopatra_ in the
 Shakespearean aesthetic is yet jealously disputed, and it seems silly to
 the academic to put it up against a work like _Hamlet_. But it is the
 comparatively more obvious achievement of _Hamlet_, its surface
 intellectuality, which made it the favourite of actors and critics. It
 is much more difficult to realize the complex and delicately passionate
 edge of the former play's rhythm, its tides of hugely wandering emotion,
 the restless, proud, gay, and agonized reaction from life, of the blood,
 of the mind, of the heart, which is its unity, than to follow the
 relatively straightforward definition of Hamlet's nerves. Not that
 anything derogatory to _Hamlet_ or the _Birds_ is intended; but the
 value of such works is not enhanced by forcing them into contrast with
 other works which cover deeper and wider nexus of aesthetic and
 spiritual material. It is the very subtlety of the vitality of such
 works as _Antony and Cleopatra_ and _Lysistrata_ that makes it so easy
 to undervalue them, to see only a phallic play and political pamphlet in
 one, only a chronicle play in a grandiose method in the other. For we
 have to be in a highly sensitized condition before we can get to that
 subtle point where life and the image mix, and so really perceive the
 work at all; whereas we can command the response to a lesser work which
 does not call so finely on the full breadth and depth of our spiritual
 resources.
 
 I amuse myself at times with the fancy that Homer, Sappho, and
 Aristophanes are the inviolable Trinity of poetry, even to the extent of
 being reducible to One. For the fiery and lucid directness of Sappho, if
 her note of personal lyricism is abstracted, is seen to be an element of
 Homer, as is the profoundly balanced humour of Aristophanes, at once
 tenderly human and cruelly hard, as of a god to whom all sympathies and
 tolerances are known, but who is invulnerable somewhere, who sees from a
 point in space where the pressure of earth's fear and pain, and so its
 pity, is lifted. It is here that the Shakespearean and Homeric worlds
 impinge and merge, not to be separated by any academic classifications.
 They meet in this sensitivity equally involved and aloof, sympathetic
 and arrogant, suffering and joyous; and in this relation we see
 Aristophanes as the forerunner of Shakespeare, his only one. We see also
 that the whole present aesthetic of earth is based in Homer. We live and
 grow in the world of consciousness bequeathed to us by him; and if we
 grow beyond it through deeper Shakespearean ardours, it is because those
 beyond are rooted in the broad basis of the Homeric imagination. To
 shift that basis is to find the marshes of primitive night and fear
 alone beneath the feet: Christianity.
 
 And here we return to the question of the immorality of _Lysistrata_.
 First we may inquire: is it possible for a man whose work has so
 tremendous a significance in the spiritual development of mankind--and I
 do not think anyone nowadays doubts that a work of art is the sole
 stabilizing force that exists for life--is it possible for a man who
 stands so grandly at head of an immense stream of liberating effort to
 write an immoral work? Surely the only enduring moral virtue which can
 be claimed is for that which moves to more power, beauty and delight in
 the future? The plea that the question of changing customs arises is not
 valid, for customs ratified by Aristophanes, by Rabelais, by
 Shakespeare, have no right to change. If they have changed, let us try
 immediately to return from our disgraceful refinements to the nobler and
 more rarefied heights of lyric laughter, tragic intensity, and wit, for
 we cannot have the first two without the last. And anyhow, how can a
 social custom claim precedence over the undying material of the senses
 and the emotions of man, over the very generating forces of life?
 
 How could the humanistic emotions, such as pity, justice, sympathy,
 exist save as pacifistic quietings of the desire to slay, to hurt, to
 torment. Where the desire to hurt is gone pity ceases to be a
 significant, a central emotion. It must of course continue to exist, but
 it is displaced in the spiritual hierarchy; and all that moves
 courageously, desirously, and vitally into the action of life takes on a
 deeper and subtler intention. Lust, then, which on the lower plane was
 something to be very frightened of, becomes a symbol of the highest
 spirituality. It is right for Paul to be terrified of sex and so to hate
 it, because he has so freshly escaped a bestial condition of life that
 it threatens to plunge him back if he listens to one whisper But it is
 also right for a Shakespeare to suck every drop of desire from life,
 for he is building into a higher condition, one self-willed,
 self-responsible, the discipline of which comes from joy, not fear.
 
 Sex, therefore, is an animal function, one admits, one insists; it may
 be only that. But also in the bewildering and humorous and tragic
 duality of all life's energies, it is the bridge to every eternity which
 is not merely a spectral condition of earth disembowelled of its lusts.
 For sex holds the substance of the image. But we must remember with
 Heine that Aristophanes is the God of this ironic earth, and that all
 argument is apparently vitiated from the start by the simple fact that
 Wagner and a rooster are given an analogous method of making love. And
 therefore it seems impeccable logic to say that all that is most unlike
 the rooster is the most spiritual part of love. All will agree on that,
 schisms only arise when one tries to decide what does go farthest from
 the bird's automatic mechanism. Certainly not a Dante-Beatrice affair
 which is only the negation of the rooster in terms of the swooning
 bombast of adolescence, the first onslaught of a force which the
 sufferer cannot control or inhabit with all the potentialities of his
 body and soul. But the rooster is troubled by no dreams of a divine
 orgy, no carnival-loves like Beethoven's _Fourth Symphony_, no heroic
 and shining lust gathering and swinging into a merry embrace like the
 third act of _Siegfried_. It is desire in this sense that goes farthest
 from the animal.
 
 Consciously, no one can achieve the act of love on earth as a completed
 thing of grace, with whatever delirium of delight, with whatever
 ingenious preciosity, we go through its process. Only as an image of
 beauty mated in some strange hermaphroditic ecstasy is that possible. I
 mean only as a dream projected into a hypothetical, a real heaven. But
 on earth we cannot complete the cycle in consciousness that would give
 us the freedom of an image in which two identities mysteriously realize
 their separate unities by the absorption of a third thing, the
 constructive rhythm of a work of art. It is thus that Tristan and Isolde
 become wholly distinct individuals, yet wholly submerged in the unity
 that is Wagner; and so reconcile life's duality by balancing its
 opposing laughters in a definite form--thereby sending out into life a
 profounder duality than existed before. A Platonic equipoise,
 Nietzsche's Eternal Recurrence--the only real philosophic problem,
 therefore one of which these two philosophers alone are aware.
 
 But though Wagner with Mathilde Wesendonck in his arms was Tristan in
 the arms of Isolde, he did not find a melody instead of a kiss on his
 lips; he did not find a progression of harmonies melting through the
 contours of a warm beauty with a blur of desperate ecstasies, semitones
 of desire, he found only the anxious happiness of any other lover.
 Nevertheless, he was gathering the substance of the second act of
 _Tristan und Isolde_. And it is this that Plato means when he says that
 fornication is something immortal in mortality. He does not mean that
 the act itself is a godlike thing, a claim which any bedroom mirror
 would quickly deride. He means that it is a symbol, an essential
 condition, and a part of something that goes deeper into life than any
 geometry of earth's absurd, passionate, futile, and very necessary
 antics would suggest.
 
 It is a universal fallacy that because works like the comedies of
 Aristophanes discuss certain social or ethical problems, they are
 inspired by them. Aristophanes wrote to express his vision on life, his
 delight in life itself seen behind the warping screen of contemporary
 event; and for his purposes anything from Euripides to Cleon served as
 ground work. Not that he would think in those terms, naturally: but the
 rationalizing process that goes on in consciousness during the creation
 of a work of art, for all its appearance of directing matters, is the
 merest weathercock in the wind of the subconscious intention. As an
 example of how utterly it is possible to misunderstand the springs of
 inspiration in a poem, we may take the following remark of B. B. Rogers:
 _It is much to be regretted that the phallus element should be so
 conspicuous in this play.... (This) coarseness, so repulsive to
 ourselves, was introduced, it is impossible to doubt, for the express
 purpose of counter-balancing the extreme earnestness and gravity of the
 play_. It seems so logical, so irrefutable; and so completely
 misinterprets every creative force of Aristophanes' Psyche that it
 certainly deserves a little admiration. It is in the best academic
 tradition, and everyone respects a man for writing so mendaciously. The
 effort of these castrators is always to show that the parts considered
 offensive are not the natural expression of the poet, that they are
 dictated externally. They argue that Shakespeare's coarseness is the
 result of the age and not personal predilection, completely ignoring the
 work of men like Sir Philip Sidney and Spenser, indeed practically all
 the pre-Shakespearean writers, in whom none of this so-called grossness
 exists. Shakespeare wrote sculduddery because he liked it, and for no
 other reason; his sensuality is the measure of his vitality. These liars
 pretend similarly that because Rabelais had a humanistic reason for much
 of his work--the destructior Mediaevalism, and the Church, which purpose
 they construe of course as an effort to purify, etc.--therefore he only
 put the lewdery to make the rest palatable, when it should be obvious
 even to an academic how he glories in his wild humour.
 
 What the academic cannot understand is that in such works, while
 attacking certain conditions, the creative power of the vigorous spirits
 is so great that it overflows and saturates the intellectual conception
 with their own passionate sense of life. It is for this reason that
 these works have an eternal significance. If Rabelais were merely a
 social reformer, then the value of his work would not have outlived his
 generation. If _Lysistrata_ were but a wise political tract, it would
 have merely an historical interest, and it would have ceased spiritually
 at 404 B.C.
 
 But Panurge is as fantastic and fascinating a character now as he was
 300 years ago, Lysistrata and her girls as freshly bodied as any girl
 kissed to-day. Therefore the serious part of the play is that which
 deals with them, the frivolous part that in which Rogers detects gravity
 and earnestness.
 
 Aristophanes is the lord of all who take life as a gay adventure, who
 defy all efforts to turn life into a social, economic, or moral
 abstraction. Is it therefore just that the critics who, by some dark
 instinct, unerringly pick out the exact opposite of any creator's real
 virtues as his chief characteristics, should praise him as an idealistic
 reformer? An "ideal" state of society was the last thing Aristophanes
 desired. He wished, certainly, to eliminate inhumanities and baseness;
 but only that there might be free play for laughter, for individual
 happiness.
 
 Consequently the critics lay the emphasis on the effort to cleanse
 society, not the method of laughter. Aristophanes wished to destroy
 Cleon because that demagogue failed to realize the poet's conception of
 dignified government and tended to upset the stability of Hellas. But it
 was the stability of life, the vindication of all individual freedoms,
 in which he was ultimately interested.
 
 JACK LINDSAY.
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 The Persons of the drama.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 CALONICE
 MYRRHINE
 LAMPITO
 Stratyllis, etc.
 Chorus of Women.
 MAGISTRATE
 CINESIAS
 SPARTAN HERALD
 ENVOYS
 ATHENIANS
 Porter, Market Idlers, etc.
 Chorus of old Men.
 
 
 LYSISTRATA _stands alone with the Propylaea at her back._
 
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 If they were trysting for a Bacchanal,
 A feast of Pan or Colias or Genetyllis,
 The tambourines would block the rowdy streets,
 But now there's not a woman to be seen
 Except--ah, yes--this neighbour of mine yonder.
 
 _Enter_ CALONICE.
 
 Good day Calonice.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Good day Lysistrata.
 But what has vexed you so? Tell me, child.
 What are these black looks for? It doesn't suit you
 To knit your eyebrows up glumly like that.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Calonice, it's more than I can bear,
 I am hot all over with blushes for our sex.
 Men say we're slippery rogues--
 
 CALONICE
 
 And aren't they right?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yet summoned on the most tremendous business
 For deliberation, still they snuggle in bed.
 
 CALONICE
 
 My dear, they'll come. It's hard for women, you know,
 To get away. There's so much to do;
 Husbands to be patted and put in good tempers:
 Servants to be poked out: children washed
 Or soothed with lullays or fed with mouthfuls of pap.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 But I tell you, here's a far more weighty object.
 
 CALONICE
 
 What is it all about, dear Lysistrata,
 That you've called the women hither in a troop?
 What kind of an object is it?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 A tremendous thing!
 
 CALONICE
 
 And long?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Indeed, it may be very lengthy.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Then why aren't they here?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 No man's connected with it;
 If that was the case, they'd soon come fluttering along.
 No, no. It concerns an object I've felt over
 And turned this way and that for sleepless nights.
 
 CALONICE
 
 It must be fine to stand such long attention.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 So fine it comes to this--Greece saved by Woman!
 
 CALONICE
 
 By Woman? Wretched thing, I'm sorry for it.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Our country's fate is henceforth in our hands:
 To destroy the Peloponnesians root and branch--
 
 CALONICE
 
 What could be nobler!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Wipe out the Boeotians--
 
 CALONICE
 
 Not utterly. Have mercy on the eels!
 [Footnote: The Boeotian eels were highly esteemed delicacies in Athens.]
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 But with regard to Athens, note I'm careful
 Not to say any of these nasty things;
 Still, thought is free.... But if the women join us
 From Peloponnesus and Boeotia, then
 Hand in hand we'll rescue Greece.
 
 CALONICE
 
 How could we do
 Such a big wise deed? We women who dwell
 Quietly adorning ourselves in a back-room
 With gowns of lucid gold and gawdy toilets
 Of stately silk and dainty little slippers....
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 These are the very armaments of the rescue.
 These crocus-gowns, this outlay of the best myrrh,
 Slippers, cosmetics dusting beauty, and robes
 With rippling creases of light.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Yes, but how?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 No man will lift a lance against another--
 
 CALONICE
 
 I'll run to have my tunic dyed crocus.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Or take a shield--
 
 CALONICE
 
 I'll get a stately gown.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Or unscabbard a sword--
 
 CALONICE
 
 Let me buy a pair of slipper.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Now, tell me, are the women right to lag?
 
 CALONICE
 
 They should have turned birds, they should have grown
 wings and flown.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 My friend, you'll see that they are true Athenians:
 Always too late. Why, there's not a woman
 From the shoreward demes arrived, not one from Salamis.
 
 CALONICE
 
 I know for certain they awoke at dawn,
 And got their husbands up if not their boat sails.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 And I'd have staked my life the Acharnian dames
 Would be here first, yet they haven't come either!
 
 CALONICE
 
 Well anyhow there is Theagenes' wife
 We can expect--she consulted Hecate.
 But look, here are some at last, and more behind them.
 See ... where are they from?
 
 CALONICE
 
 From Anagyra they come.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yes, they generally manage to come first.
 
 _Enter_ MYRRHINE.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Are we late, Lysistrata? ... What is that?
 Nothing to say?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I've not much to say for you,
 Myrrhine, dawdling on so vast an affair.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I couldn't find my girdle in the dark.
 But if the affair's so wonderful, tell us, what is it?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 No, let us stay a little longer till
 The Peloponnesian girls and the girls of Bocotia
 Are here to listen.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 That's the best advice.
 Ah, there comes Lampito.
 
 _Enter_ LAMPITO.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Welcome Lampito!
 Dear Spartan girl with a delightful face,
 Washed with the rosy spring, how fresh you look
 In the easy stride of your sleek slenderness,
 Why you could strangle a bull!
 
 LAMPITO
 
 I think I could.
 It's frae exercise and kicking high behint.
 
 [Footnote: The translator has put the speech of the Spartan characters
 in Scotch dialect which is related to English about as was the Spartan
 dialect to the speech of Athens. The Spartans, in their character,
 anticipated the shrewd, canny, uncouth Scotch highlander of modern
 times.]
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 What lovely breasts to own!
 
 LAMPITO
 
 Oo ... your fingers
 Assess them, ye tickler, wi' such tender chucks
 I feel as if I were an altar-victim.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Who is this youngster?
 
 LAMPITO
 
 A Boeotian lady.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 There never was much undergrowth in Boeotia,
 Such a smooth place, and this girl takes after it.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Yes, I never saw a skin so primly kept.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 This girl?
 
 LAMPITO
 
 A sonsie open-looking jinker!
 She's a Corinthian.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yes, isn't she
 Very open, in some ways particularly.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 But who's garred this Council o' Women to meet here?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I have.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 Propound then what you want o' us.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 What is the amazing news you have to tell?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I'll tell you, but first answer one small question.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 As you like.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Are you not sad your children's fathers
 Go endlessly off soldiering afar
 In this plodding war? I am willing to wager
 There's not one here whose husband is at home.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Mine's been in Thrace, keeping an eye on Eucrates
 For five months past.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 And mine left me for Pylos
 Seven months ago at least.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 And as for mine
 No sooner has he slipped out frae the line
 He straps his shield and he's snickt off again.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 And not the slightest glitter of a lover!
 And since the Milesians betrayed us, I've not seen
 The image of a single upright man
 To be a marble consolation to us.
 Now will you help me, if I find a means
 To stamp the war out.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 By the two Goddesses, Yes!
 I will though I've to pawn this very dress
 And drink the barter-money the same day.
 
 CALONICE
 
 And I too though I'm split up like a turbot
 And half is hackt off as the price of peace.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 And I too! Why, to get a peep at the shy thing
 I'd clamber up to the tip-top o' Taygetus.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Then I'll expose my mighty mystery.
 O women, if we would compel the men
 To bow to Peace, we must refrain--
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 From what?
 O tell us!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Will you truly do it then?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 We will, we will, if we must die for it.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 We must refrain from every depth of love....
 Why do you turn your backs? Where are you going?
 Why do you bite your lips and shake your heads?
 Why are your faces blanched? Why do you weep?
 Will you or won't you, or what do you mean?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 No, I won't do it. Let the war proceed.
 
 CALONICE
 
 No, I won't do it. Let the war proceed.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 You too, dear turbot, you that said just now
 You didn't mind being split right up in the least?
 
 CALONICE
 
 Anything else? O bid me walk in fire
 But do not rob us of that darling joy.
 What else is like it, dearest Lysistrata?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 And you?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 O please give me the fire instead.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Lewd to the least drop in the tiniest vein,
 Our sex is fitly food for Tragic Poets,
 Our whole life's but a pile of kisses and babies.
 But, hardy Spartan, if you join with me
 All may be righted yet. O help me, help me.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 It's a sair, sair thing to ask of us, by the Twa,
 A lass to sleep her lane and never fill
 Love's lack except wi' makeshifts.... But let it be.
 Peace maun be thought of first.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 My friend, my friend!
 The only one amid this herd of weaklings.
 
 CALONICE
 
 But if--which heaven forbid--we should refrain
 As you would have us, how is Peace induced?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 By the two Goddesses, now can't you see
 All we have to do is idly sit indoors
 With smooth roses powdered on our cheeks,
 Our bodies burning naked through the folds
 Of shining Amorgos' silk, and meet the men
 With our dear Venus-plats plucked trim and neat.
 Their stirring love will rise up furiously,
 They'll beg our arms to open. That's our time!
 We'll disregard their knocking, beat them off--
 And they will soon be rabid for a Peace.
 I'm sure of it.
 
 LAMPITO
 
           Just as Menelaus, they say,
 Seeing the bosom of his naked Helen
 Flang down the sword.
 
 CALONICE
 
                But we'll be tearful fools
 If our husbands take us at our word and leave us.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 There's only left then, in Pherecrates' phrase,
 _To flay a skinned dog_--flay more our flayed desires.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Bah, proverbs will never warm a celibate.
 But what avail will your scheme be if the men
 Drag us for all our kicking on to the couch?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Cling to the doorposts.
 
 CALONICE
 
                But if they should force us?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yield then, but with a sluggish, cold indifference.
 There is no joy to them in sullen mating.
 Besides we have other ways to madden them;
 They cannot stand up long, and they've no delight
 Unless we fit their aim with merry succour.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Well if you must have it so, we'll all agree.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 For us I ha' no doubt. We can persuade
 Our men to strike a fair an' decent Peace,
 But how will ye pitch out the battle-frenzy
 O' the Athenian populace?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I promise you
 We'll wither up that curse.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 I don't believe it.
 Not while they own ane trireme oared an' rigged,
 Or a' those stacks an' stacks an' stacks O' siller.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I've thought the whole thing out till there's no flaw.
 We shall surprise the Acropolis today:
 That is the duty set the older dames.
 While we sit here talking, they are to go
 And under pretence of sacrificing, seize it.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 Certie, that's fine; all's working for the best.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Now quickly, Lampito, let us tie ourselves
 To this high purpose as tightly as the hemp of words
 Can knot together.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 Set out the terms in detail
 And we'll a' swear to them.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Of course.... Well then
 Where is our Scythianess? Why are you staring?
 First lay the shield, boss downward, on the floor
 And bring the victim's inwards.
 
 CAILONICE
 
 But, Lysistrata,
 What is this oath that we're to swear?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 What oath!
 In Aeschylus they take a slaughtered sheep
 And swear upon a buckler. Why not we?
 
 CALONICE
 
 O Lysistrata, Peace sworn on a buckler!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 What oath would suit us then?
 
 CALONICE
 
 Something burden bearing
 Would be our best insignia.... A white horse!
 Let's swear upon its entrails.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 A horse indeed!
 
 CALONICE
 
 Then what will symbolise us?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 This, as I tell you--
 First set a great dark bowl upon the ground
 And disembowel a skin of Thasian wine,
 Then swear that we'll not add a drop of water.
 
 LAMPITO
   Ah, what aith could clink pleasanter than that!
 
 LYSISTRATA
   Bring me a bowl then and a skin of wine.
 
 CALONICE
   My dears, see what a splendid bowl it is;
   I'd not say No if asked to sip it off.
 
 LYSISTRATA
   Put down the bowl. Lay hands, all, on the victim.
   Skiey Queen who givest the last word in arguments,
   And thee, O Bowl, dear comrade, we beseech:
   Accept our oblation and be propitious to us.
 
 CALONICE
   What healthy blood, la, how it gushes out!
 
 LAMPITO
   An' what a leesome fragrance through the air.
 
 LYSISTRATA
   Now, dears, if you will let me, I'll speak first.
 
 CALONICE
   Only if you draw the lot, by Aphrodite!
 
 LYSISTRATA
   SO, grasp the brim, you, Lampito, and all.
   You, Calonice, repeat for the rest
   Each word I say. Then you must all take oath
   And pledge your arms to the same stern conditions--
 
 LYSISTRATA
   To husband or lover I'll not open arms
 
 CALONICE
 
 _To husband or lover I'll not open arms_
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Though love and denial may enlarge his charms.
 
 CALONICE
 
 _Though love and denial may enlarge his charms._
 O, O, my knees are failing me, Lysistrata!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 But still at home, ignoring him, I'll stay,
 
 CALONICE
 
 _But still at home, ignoring him, I'll stay,_
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Beautiful, clad in saffron silks all day.
 
 CALONICE
 
 _Beautiful, clad in saffron silks all day._
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 If then he seizes me by dint of force,
 
 CALONICE
 
 _If then he seizes me by dint of force,_
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I'll give him reason for a long remorse.
 
 CALONICE
 
 _I'll give him reason for a long remorse._
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I'll never lie and stare up at the ceiling,
 
 CALONICE
 
 _I'll never lie and stare up at the ceiling,_
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Nor like a lion on all fours go kneeling.
 
 CALONICE
 
 _Nor like a lion on all fours go kneeling._
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 If I keep faith, then bounteous cups be mine.
 
 CALONICE
 
 _If I keep faith, then bounteous cups be mine._
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 If not, to nauseous water change this wine.
 
 CALONICE
   _If not, to nauseous water change this wine._
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Do you all swear to this?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 We do, we do.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Then I shall immolate the victim thus.
 _She drinks._
 
 CALONICE
 
 Here now, share fair, haven't we made a pact?
 Let's all quaff down that friendship in our turn.
 
 LAMPITO
 
 Hark, what caterwauling hubbub's that?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 As I told you,
 The women have appropriated the citadel.
 So, Lampito, dash off to your own land
 And raise the rebels there. These will serve as hostages,
 While we ourselves take our places in the ranks
 And drive the bolts right home.
 
 CALONICE
 
 But won't the men
 March straight against us?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 And what if they do?
 No threat shall creak our hinges wide, no torch
 Shall light a fear in us; we will come out
 To Peace alone.
 
 CALONICE
 
 That's it, by Aphrodite!
 As of old let us seem hard and obdurate.
 
 LAMPITO _and some go off; the others go up into the Acropolis._
 
 _Chorus of_ OLD MEN _enter to attack the captured Acropolis_.
 
 Make room, Draces, move ahead; why your shoulder's chafed, I see,
 With lugging uphill these lopped branches of the olive-tree.
 How upside-down and wrong-way-round a long life sees things grow.
 Ah, Strymodorus, who'd have thought affairs could tangle so?
 
 The women whom at home we fed,
 Like witless fools, with fostering bread,
 Have impiously come to this--
 They've stolen the Acropolis,
 With bolts and bars our orders flout
 And shut us out.
 
 Come, Philurgus, bustle thither; lay our faggots on the ground,
 In neat stacks beleaguering the insurgents all around;
 And the vile conspiratresses, plotters of such mischief dire,
 Pile and burn them all together in one vast and righteous pyre:
 Fling with our own hands Lycon's wife to fry in the thickest fire.
 By Demeter, they'll get no brag while I've a vein to beat!
 Cleomenes himself was hurtled out in sore defeat.
 His stiff-backed Spartan pride was bent.
 Out, stripped of all his arms, he went:
 A pigmy cloak that would not stretch
 To hide his rump (the draggled wretch),
 Six sprouting years of beard, the spilth
 Of six years' filth.
 
 That was a siege! Our men were ranged in lines of seventeen deep
 Before the gates, and never left their posts there, even to sleep.
 Shall I not smite the rash presumption then of foes like these,
 Detested both of all the gods and of Euripides--
 Else, may the Marathon-plain not boast my trophied victories!
 
 Ah, now, there's but a little space
 To reach the place!
 A deadly climb it is, a tricky road
 With all this bumping load:
 A pack-ass soon would tire....
 How these logs bruise my shoulders! further still
 Jog up the hill,
 And puff the fire inside,
 Or just as we reach the top we'll find it's died.
 Ough, phew!
 I choke with the smoke.
 
 Lord Heracles, how acrid-hot
 Out of the pot
 This mad-dog smoke leaps, worrying me
 And biting angrily....
 'Tis Lemnian fire that smokes,
 Or else it would not sting my eyelids thus....
 Haste, all of us;
 Athene invokes our aid.
 Laches, now or never the assault must be made!
 Ough, phew!
 I choke with the smoke. ..
 
 Thanked be the gods! The fire peeps up and crackles as it should.
 Now why not first slide off our backs these weary loads of wood
 And dip a vine-branch in the brazier till it glows, then straight
 Hurl it at the battering-ram against the stubborn gate?
 If they refuse to draw the bolts in immediate compliance,
 We'll set fire to the wood, and smoke will strangle their defiance.
 
 Phew, what a spluttering drench of smoke! Come, now from off my back....
 Is there no Samos-general to help me to unpack?
 Ah there, that's over! For the last time now it's galled my shoulder.
 Flare up thine embers, brazier, and dutifully smoulder,
 To kindle a brand, that I the first may strike the citadel.
 Aid me, Lady Victory, that a triumph-trophy may tell
 How we did anciently this insane audacity quell!
 
 _Chorus of_ WOMEN.
 
 What's that rising yonder? That ruddy glare, that smoky skurry?
 O is it something in a blaze? Quick, quick, my comrades, hurry!
 Nicodice, helter-skelter!
 Or poor Calyce's in flames
 And Cratylla's stifled in the welter.
 O these dreadful old men
 And their dark laws of hate!
 There, I'm all of a tremble lest I turn out to be too late.
 I could scarcely get near to the spring though I rose before dawn,
 What with tattling of tongues and rattling of pitchers in one jostling din
 With slaves pushing in!....
 
 Still here at last the water's drawn
 And with it eagerly I run
 To help those of my friends who stand
 In danger of being burned alive.
 For I am told a dribbling band
 Of greybeards hobble to the field,
 Great faggots in each palsied hand,
 As if a hot bath to prepare,
 And threatening that out they'll drive
 These wicked women or soon leave them charring into ashes
 there.
 O Goddess, suffer not, I pray, this harsh deed to be done,
 But show us Greece and Athens with their warlike acts repealed!
 For this alone, in this thy hold,
 Thou Goddess with the helm of gold,
 We laid hands on thy sanctuary,
 Athene.... Then our ally be
 And where they cast their fires of slaughter
 Direct our water!
 
 STRATYLLIS (_caught_)
 
 Let me go!
 
 WOMEN
 
 You villainous old men, what's this you do?
 No honest man, no pious man, could do such things as you.
 
 MEN
 
 Ah ha, here's something most original, I have no doubt:
 A swarm of women sentinels to man the walls without.
 
 WOMEN
 
 So then we scare you, do we? Do we seem a fearful host?
 You only see the smallest fraction mustered at this post.
 
 MEN
 
 Ho, Phaedrias, shall we put a stop to all these chattering tricks?
 Suppose that now upon their backs we splintered these our sticks?
 
 WOMEN
 
 Let us lay down the pitchers, so our bodies will be free,
   In case these lumping fellows try to cause some injury.
 
 MEN
 
 O hit them hard and hit again and hit until they run away,
 And perhaps they'll learn, like Bupalus, not to have too much to say.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Come on, then--do it! I won't budge, but like a dog I'll bite
 At every little scrap of meat that dangles in my sight.
 
 MEN
 
 Be quiet, or I'll bash you out of any years to come.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Now you just touch Stratyllis with the top-joint of your thumb.
 
 MEN
 
 What vengeance can you take if with my fists your face I beat?
 
 WOMEN
 
 I'll rip you with my teeth and strew your entrails at your feet.
 
 MEN
 
 Now I appreciate Euripides' strange subtlety:
 Woman is the most shameless beast of all the beasts that be.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Rhodippe, come, and let's pick up our water-jars once more.
 
 MEN
 
 Ah cursed drab, what have you brought this water for?
 
 WOMEN
 
 What is your fire for then, you smelly corpse? Yourself to burn?
 
 MEN
 
 To build a pyre and make your comrades ready for the urn.
 
 WOMEN
 
 And I've the water to put out your fire immediately.
 
 MEN
 
 What, you put out my fire?
 
 WOMEN
 
 Yes, sirrah, as you soon will see.
 
 MEN
 
 I don't know why I hesitate to roast you with this flame.
 
 WOMEN
 
 If you have any soap you'll go off cleaner than you came.
 
 MEN
 
 Cleaner, you dirty slut?
 
 WOMEN
 
 A nuptial-bath in which to lie!
 
 MEN
 
 Did you hear that insolence?
 
 WOMEN
 
 I'm a free woman, I.
 
 MEN
 
 I'll make you hold your tongue.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Henceforth you'll serve in no more juries.
 
 MEN
 
 Burn off her hair for her.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Now forward, water, quench their furies!
 
 MEN
 
 O dear, O dear!
 
 WOMEN
 
 So ... was it hot?
 
 MEN
 
 Hot! ... Enough, O hold.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Watered, perhaps you'll bloom again--why not?
 
 MEN
 
 Brrr, I'm wrinkled up from shivering with cold.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Next time you've fire you'll warm yourself and leave us to our lot.
 
 MAGISTRATE _enters with attendant_ SCYTHIANS.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Have the luxurious rites of the women glittered
 Their libertine show, their drumming tapped out crowds,
 The Sabazian Mysteries summoned their mob,
 Adonis been wept to death on the terraces,
 As I could hear the last day in the Assembly?
 For Demostratus--let bad luck befoul him--
 Was roaring, "We must sail for Sicily,"
 While a woman, throwing herself about in a dance
 Lopsided with drink, was shrilling out "Adonis,
 Woe for Adonis." Then Demostratus shouted,
 "We must levy hoplites at Zacynthus,"
 And there the woman, up to the ears in wine,
 Was screaming "Weep for Adonis" on the house-top,
 The scoundrelly politician, that lunatic ox,
 Bellowing bad advice through tipsy shrieks:
 Such are the follies wantoning in them.
 
 MEN
 
 O if you knew their full effrontery!
 All of the insults they've done, besides sousing us
 With water from their pots to our public disgrace
 For we stand here wringing our clothes like grown-up infants.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 By Poseidon, justly done! For in part with us
 The blame must lie for dissolute behaviour
 And for the pampered appetites they learn.
 Thus grows the seedling lust to blossoming:
 We go into a shop and say, "Here, goldsmith,
 You remember the necklace that you wrought my wife;
 Well, the other night in fervour of a dance
 Her clasp broke open. Now I'm off for Salamis;
 If you've the leisure, would you go tonight
 And stick a bolt-pin into her opened clasp."
 Another goes to a cobbler; a soldierly fellow,
 Always standing up erect, and says to him,
 "Cobbler, a sandal-strap of my wife's pinches her,
 Hurts her little toe in a place where she's sensitive.
 Come at noon and see if you can stretch out wider
 This thing that troubles her, loosen its tightness."
 And so you view the result. Observe my case--
 I, a magistrate, come here to draw
 Money to buy oar-blades, and what happens?
 The women slam the door full in my face.
 But standing still's no use. Bring me a crowbar,
 And I'll chastise this their impertinence.
 What do you gape at, wretch, with dazzled eyes?
 Peering for a tavern, I suppose.
 Come, force the gates with crowbars, prise them apart!
 I'll prise away myself too.... (LYSISTRATA _appears._)
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Stop this banging.
 I'm coming of my own accord.... Why bars?
 It is not bars we need but common sense.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Indeed, you slut! Where is the archer now?
 Arrest this woman, tie her hands behind.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 If he brushes me with a finger, by Artemis,
 The public menial, he'll be sorry for it.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Are you afraid? Grab her about the middle.
 Two of you then, lay hands on her and end it.
 
 CALONICE
 
 By Pandrosos I if your hand touches her
 I'll spread you out and trample on your guts.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 My guts! Where is the other archer gone?
 Bind that minx there who talks so prettily.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 By Phosphor, if your hand moves out her way
 You'd better have a surgeon somewhere handy.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 You too! Where is that archer? Take that woman.
 I'll put a stop to these surprise-parties.
 
 STRATYLLIS
 
 By the Tauric Artemis, one inch nearer
 My fingers, and it's a bald man that'll be yelling.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Tut tut, what's here? Deserted by my archers....
 But surely women never can defeat us;
 Close up your ranks, my Scythians. Forward at them.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 By the Goddesses, you'll find that here await you
 Four companies of most pugnacious women
 Armed cap-a-pie from the topmost louring curl
 To the lowest angry dimple.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 On, Scythians, bind them.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 On, gallant allies of our high design,
 Vendors of grain-eggs-pulse-and-vegetables,
 Ye garlic-tavern-keepers of bakeries,
 Strike, batter, knock, hit, slap, and scratch our foes,
 Be finely imprudent, say what you think of them....
 Enough! retire and do not rob the dead.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 How basely did my archer-force come off.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Ah, ha, you thought it was a herd of slaves
 You had to tackle, and you didn't guess
 The thirst for glory ardent in our blood.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 By Apollo, I know well the thirst that heats you--
 Especially when a wine-skin's close.
 
 MEN
 
 You waste your breath, dear magistrate, I fear, in answering back.
 What's the good of argument with such a rampageous pack?
 Remember how they washed us down (these very clothes I wore)
 With water that looked nasty and that smelt so even more.
 
 WOMEN
 
 What else to do, since you advanced too dangerously nigh.
 If you should do the same again, I'll punch you in the eye.
 Though I'm a stay-at-home and most a quiet life enjoy,
 Polite to all and every (for I'm naturally coy),
 Still if you wake a wasps' nest then of wasps you must beware.
 
 MEN
 
 How may this ferocity be tamed? It grows too great to bear.
 Let us question them and find if they'll perchance declare
 The reason why they strangely dare
 To seize on Cranaos' citadel,
 This eyrie inaccessible,
 This shrine above the precipice,
 The Acropolis.
 Probe them and find what they mean with this idle talk; listen,
 but watch they don't try to deceive.
 You'd be neglecting your duty most certainly if now this mystery
 unplumbed you leave.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Women there! Tell what I ask you, directly....
 Come, without rambling, I wish you to state
 What's your rebellious intention in barring up thus on our noses
 our own temple-gate.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 To take first the treasury out of your management, and so stop the war
 through the absence of gold.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Is gold then the cause of the war?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yes, gold caused it and miseries more, too many to be told.
 'Twas for money, and money alone, that Pisander with all of the army of
 mob-agitators.
 Raised up revolutions. But, as for the future, it won't be worth while
 to set up to be traitors.
 Not an obol they'll get as their loot, not an obol! while we have the
 treasure-chest in our command.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 What then is that you propose?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Just this--merely to take the exchequer henceforth in hand.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 The exchequer!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yes, why not? Of our capabilities you have had various clear evidences.
 Firstly remember we have always administered soundly the budget of all
 home-expenses.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 But this matter's different.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 How is it different?
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Why, it deals chiefly with war-time supplies.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 But we abolish war straight by our policy.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 What will you do if emergencies arise?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Face them our own way.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 What _you_ will?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yes _we_ will!
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Then there's no help for it; we're all destroyed.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 No, willy-nilly you must be safeguarded.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 What madness is this?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Why, it seems you're annoyed.
 It must be done, that's all.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Such awful oppression never,
 O never in the past yet I bore.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 You must be saved, sirrah--that's all there is to it.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 If we don't want to be saved?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 All the more.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Why do you women come prying and meddling in matters of state touching
 war-time and peace?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 That I will tell you.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 O tell me or quickly I'll--
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Hearken awhile and from threatening cease.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 I cannot, I cannot; it's growing too insolent.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Come on; you've far more than we have to dread.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Stop from your croaking, old carrion-crow there....
 Continue.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Be calm then and I'll go ahead.
 All the long years when the hopeless war dragged along we, unassuming,
 forgotten in quiet,
 Endured without question, endured in our loneliness all your incessant
 child's antics and riot.
 Our lips we kept tied, though aching with silence, though well all the
 while in our silence we knew
 How wretchedly everything still was progressing by listening dumbly the
 day long to you.
 For always at home you continued discussing the war and its politics
 loudly, and we
 Sometimes would ask you, our hearts deep with sorrowing though we spoke
 lightly, though happy to see,
 "What's to be inscribed on the side of the Treaty-stone
 What, dear, was said in the Assembly today?"
 "Mind your own business," he'd answer me growlingly
 "hold your tongue, woman, or else go away."
 And so I would hold it.
 
 WOMEN
 
 I'd not be silent for any man living on earth, no, not I!
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Not for a staff?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Well, so I did nothing but sit in the house, feeling dreary, and sigh,
 While ever arrived some fresh tale of decisions more foolish by far and
 presaging disaster.
 Then I would say to him, "O my dear husband, why still do they rush on
 destruction the faster?"
 At which he would look at me sideways, exclaiming, "Keep for your web
 and your shuttle your care,
 Or for some hours hence your cheeks will be sore and hot; leave this
 alone, war is Man's sole affair!"
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 By Zeus, but a man of fine sense, he.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 How sensible?
 You dotard, because he at no time had lent
 His intractable ears to absorb from our counsel one temperate word of
 advice, kindly meant?
 But when at the last in the streets we heard shouted (everywhere ringing
 the ominous cry)
 "Is there no one to help us, no saviour in Athens?" and, "No, there is
 no one," come back in reply.
 At once a convention of all wives through Hellas here for a serious
 purpose was held,
 To determine how husbands might yet back to wisdom despite their
 reluctance in time be compelled.
 Why then delay any longer? It's settled. For the future you'll take
 up our old occupation.
 Now in turn you're to hold tongue, as we did, and listen while we show
 the way to recover the nation.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 _You_ talk to _us!_ Why, you're mad. I'll not stand it.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Cease babbling, you fool; till I end, hold your tongue.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 If I should take orders from one who wears veils, may my
 neck straightaway be deservedly wrung.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 O if that keeps pestering you,
 I've a veil here for your hair,
 I'll fit you out in everything
 As is only fair.
 
 CALONICE
 
 Here's a spindle that will do.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I'll add a wool-basket too.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Girdled now sit humbly at home,
 Munching beans, while you card wool and comb. For war from now on
 is the Women's affair.
 
 WOMEN.
 
 Come then, down pitchers, all,
 And on, courageous of heart,
 In our comradely venture
 Each taking her due part.
 
 I could dance, dance, dance, and be fresher after,
 I could dance away numberless suns,
 To no weariness let my knees bend.
 Earth I could brave with laughter,
 Having such wonderful girls here to friend.
 O the daring, the gracious, the beautiful ones!
 Their courage unswerving and witty
 Will rescue our city.
 
 O sprung from the seed of most valiant-wombed grand-mothers,
 scions of savage and dangerous nettles!
 Prepare for the battle, all. Gird up your angers. Our way
 the wind of sweet victory settles.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 O tender Eros and Lady of Cyprus, some flush of beauty I
 pray you devise
 To flash on our bosoms and, O Aphrodite, rosily gleam on
 our valorous thighs!
 Joy will raise up its head through the legions warring and
 all of the far-serried ranks of mad-love
 Bristle the earth to the pillared horizon, pointing in vain to
 the heavens above.
 I think that perhaps then they'll give us our title--
 Peace-makers.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
           What do you mean? Please explain.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
   First, we'll not see you now flourishing arms about into the
     Marketing-place clang again.
 
 WOMEN
   No, by the Paphian.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Still I can conjure them as past were the herbs stand or crockery's sold
 Like Corybants jingling (poor sots) fully armoured, they noisily round
 on their promenade strolled.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 And rightly; that's discipline, they--
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 But what's sillier than to go on an errand of buying a fish
 Carrying along an immense. Gorgon-buckler instead the usual platter
 or dish?
 A phylarch I lately saw, mounted on horse-back, dressed for the part
 with long ringlets and all,
 Stow in his helmet the omelet bought steaming from an old woman who
 kept a food-stall.
 Nearby a soldier, a Thracian, was shaking wildly his spear like Tereus
 in the play,
 To frighten a fig-girl while unseen the ruffian filched from her
 fruit-trays the ripest away.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 How, may I ask, will your rule re-establish order and justice in lands
 so tormented?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Nothing is easier.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Out with it speedily--what is this plan that you boast you've invented?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 If, when yarn we are winding, It chances to tangle, then, as perchance you
 may know, through the skein
 This way and that still the spool we keep passing till it is finally clear
 all again:
 So to untangle the War and its errors, ambassadors out on all sides we will
 send
 This way and that, here, there and round about--soon you will find that the
 War has an end.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 So with these trivial tricks of the household, domestic analogies of
 threads, skeins and spools,
 You think that you'll solve such a bitter complexity, unwind such political
 problems, you fools!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Well, first as we wash dirty wool so's to cleanse it, so with a pitiless
 zeal we will scrub
 Through the whole city for all greasy fellows; burrs too, the parasites,
 off we will rub.
 That verminous plague of insensate place-seekers soon between thumb and
 forefinger we'll crack.
 All who inside Athens' walls have their dwelling into one great common
 basket we'll pack.
 Disenfranchised or citizens, allies or aliens, pell-mell the lot of them
 in we will squeeze.
 Till they discover humanity's meaning.... As for disjointed and far
 colonies,
 Them you must never from this time imagine as scattered about just like
 lost hanks of wool.
 Each portion we'll take and wind in to this centre, inward to Athens
 each loyalty pull,
 Till from the vast heap where all's piled together at last can be woven
 a strong Cloak of State.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 How terrible is it to stand here and watch them carding and winding at
 will with our fate,
 Witless in war as they are.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 What of us then, who ever in vain for our children must weep
 Borne but to perish afar and in vain?
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Not that, O let that one memory sleep!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Then while we should be companioned still merrily, happy as brides may,
 the livelong night,
 Kissing youth by, we are forced to lie single.... But leave for a moment
 our pitiful plight,
 It hurts even more to behold the poor maidens helpless wrinkling in
 staler virginity.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Does not a man age?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Not in the same way. Not as a woman grows withered, grows he.
 He, when returned from the war, though grey-headed, yet
 if he wishes can choose out a wife.
 But she has no solace save peering for omens, wretched and
 lonely the rest of her life.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 But the old man will often select--
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 O why not finish and die?
 A bier is easy to buy,
 A honey-cake I'll knead you with joy,
 This garland will see you are decked.
 
 CALONICE
 
 I've a wreath for you too.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I also will fillet you.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 What more is lacking? Step aboard the boat.
 See, Charon shouts ahoy.
 You're keeping him, he wants to shove afloat.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Outrageous insults! Thus my place to flout!
 Now to my fellow-magistrates I'll go
 And what you've perpetrated on me show.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Why are you blaming us for laying you out?
 Assure yourself we'll not forget to make
 The third day offering early for your sake.
 
 MAGISTRATE _retires_, LYSISTRATA _returns within_.
 
 OLD MEN.
 
 All men who call your loins your own, awake at last, arise
 And strip to stand in readiness. For as it seems to me
 Some more perilous offensive in their heads they now devise.
 I'm sure a Tyranny
 Like that of Hippias
 In this I detect....
 They mean to put us under
 Themselves I suspect,
 And that Laconians assembling
 At Cleisthenes' house have played
 A trick-of-war and provoked them
 Madly to raid
 The Treasury, in which term I include
 The Pay for my food.
 
 For is it not preposterous
 They should talk this way to us
 On a subject such as battle!
 
 And, women as they are, about bronze bucklers dare prattle--
 Make alliance with the Spartans--people I for one
 Like very hungry wolves would always most sincere shun....
 Some dirty game is up their sleeve,
 I believe.
 A Tyranny, no doubt... but they won't catch me, that know.
 Henceforth on my guard I'll go,
 A sword with myrtle-branches wreathed for ever in my hand,
 And under arms in the Public Place I'll take my watchful stand,
 Shoulder to shoulder with Aristogeiton. Now my staff I'll draw
 And start at once by knocking
 that shocking
 Hag upon the jaw.
 
 WOMEN.
 
 Your own mother will not know you when you get back to the town.
 But first, my friends and allies, let us lay these garments down,
 And all ye fellow-citizens, hark to me while I tell
 What will aid Athens well.
 Just as is right, for I
 Have been a sharer
 In all the lavish splendour
 Of the proud city.
 I bore the holy vessels
 At seven, then
 I pounded barley
 At the age of ten,
 And clad in yellow robes,
 Soon after this,
 I was Little Bear to
 Brauronian Artemis;
 Then neckletted with figs,
 Grown tall and pretty,
 I was a Basket-bearer,
 And so it's obvious I should
 Give you advice that I think good,
 The very best I can.
 It should not prejudice my voice that I'm not born a man,
 If I say something advantageous to the present situation.
 For I'm taxed too, and as a toll provide men for the nation
 While, miserable greybeards, you,
 It is true,
 Contribute nothing of any importance whatever to our needs;
 But the treasure raised against the Medes
 You've squandered, and do nothing in return, save that you make
 Our lives and persons hazardous by some imbecile mistakes
 What can you answer? Now be careful, don't arouse my spite,
 Or with my slipper I'll take you napping,
 faces slapping
 Left and right.
 
 MEN.
 
 What villainies they contrive!
 Come, let vengeance fall,
 You that below the waist are still alive,
 Off with your tunics at my call--
 Naked, all.
 For a man must strip to battle like a man.
 No quaking, brave steps taking, careless what's ahead, white shoed,
 in the nude, onward bold,
 All ye who garrisoned Leipsidrion of old....
 Let each one wag
 As youthfully as he can,
 And if he has the cause at heart
 Rise at least a span.
 
 We must take a stand and keep to it,
 For if we yield the smallest bit
 To their importunity.
 Then nowhere from their inroads will be left to us immunity.
 But they'll be building ships and soon their navies will attack us,
 As Artemisia did, and seek to fight us and to sack us.
 And if they mount, the Knights they'll rob
 Of a job,
 For everyone knows how talented they all are in the saddle,
 Having long practised how to straddle;
 No matter how they're jogged there up and down, they're never thrown.
 Then think of Myron's painting, and each horse-backed Amazon
 In combat hand-to-hand with men.... Come, on these women fall,
 And in pierced wood-collars let's stick
 quick
 The necks of one and all.
 
 WOMEN.
 
 Don't cross me or I'll loose
 The Beast that's kennelled here....
 And soon you will be howling for a truce,
 Howling out with fear.
 But my dear,
 Strip also, that women may battle unhindered....
 But you, you'll be too sore to eat garlic more, or one black bean,
 I really mean, so great's my spleen, to kick you black and blue
 With these my dangerous legs.
 I'll hatch the lot of you,
 If my rage you dash on,
 The way the relentless Beetle
 Hatched the Eagle's eggs.
 
 Scornfully aside I set
 Every silly old-man threat
 While Lampito's with me.
 Or dear Ismenia, the noble Theban girl. Then let decree
 Be hotly piled upon decree; in vain will be your labours,
 You futile rogue abominated by your suffering neighbour
 To Hecate's feast I yesterday went--
 Off I sent
 To our neighbours in Boeotia, asking as a gift to me
 For them to pack immediately
 That darling dainty thing ... a good fat eel [1] I meant of course;
 
 [Footnote 1:_Vide supra_, p. 23.]
 
 But they refused because some idiotic old decree's in force.
 O this strange passion for decrees nothing on earth can check,
 Till someone puts a foot out tripping you,
 and slipping you
 Break your neck.
 
 LYSISTRATA _enters in dismay_.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Dear Mistress of our martial enterprise,
 Why do you come with sorrow in your eyes?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 O 'tis our naughty femininity,
 So weak in one spot, that hath saddened me.
 
 WOMEN
 
 What's this? Please speak.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Poor women, O so weak!
 
 WOMEN
 
 What can it be? Surely your friends may know.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yea, I must speak it though it hurt me so.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Speak; can we help? Don't stand there mute in need.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I'll blurt it out then--our women's army's mutinied.
 
 WOMEN
 
 O Zeus!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 What use is Zeus to our anatomy?
 Here is the gaping calamity I meant:
 I cannot shut their ravenous appetites
 A moment more now. They are all deserting.
 The first I caught was sidling through the postern
 Close by the Cave of Pan: the next hoisting herself
 With rope and pulley down: a third on the point
 Of slipping past: while a fourth malcontent, seated
 For instant flight to visit Orsilochus
 On bird-back, I dragged off by the hair in time....
 They are all snatching excuses to sneak home.
 Look, there goes one.... Hey, what's the hurry?
 
 1ST WOMAN
 
 I must get home. I've some Milesian wool
 Packed wasting away, and moths are pushing through it.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Fine moths indeed, I know. Get back within.
 
 1ST WOMAN
 
 By the Goddesses, I'll return instantly.
 I only want to stretch it on my bed.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 You shall stretch nothing and go nowhere either.
 
 1ST WOMAN
 
 Must I never use my wool then?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 If needs be.
 
 2ND WOMAN
 
 How unfortunate I am! O my poor flax!
 It's left at home unstript.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 So here's another
 That wishes to go home and strip her flax.
 Inside again!
 
 2ND WOMAN
 
 No, by the Goddess of Light,
 I'll be back as soon as I have flayed it properly.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 You'll not flay anything. For if you begin
 There'll not be one here but has a patch to be flayed.
 
 3RD WOMAN
 
 O holy Eilithyia, stay this birth
 Till I have left the precincts of the place!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 What nonsense is this?
 
 3RD WOMAN
 
 I'll drop it any minute.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Yesterday you weren't with child.
 
 3RD WOMAN
 
 But I am today.
 O let me find a midwife, Lysistrata.
 O quickly!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Now what story is this you tell?
 What is this hard lump here?
 
 3RD WOMAN
 
 It's a male child.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 By Aphrodite, it isn't. Your belly's hollow,
 And it has the feel of metal.... Well, I soon can see.
 You hussy, it's Athene's sacred helm,
 And you said you were with child.
 
 3RD WOMAN
 
 And so I am.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Then why the helm?
 
 3RD WOMAN
 
 So if the throes should take me
 Still in these grounds I could use it like a dove
 As a laying-nest in which to drop the child.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 More pretexts! You can't hide your clear intent,
 And anyway why not wait till the tenth day
 Meditating a brazen name for your brass brat?
 
 WOMAN
 
 And I can't sleep a wink. My nerve is gone
 Since I saw that snake-sentinel of the shrine.
 
 WOMAN
 
 And all those dreadful owls with their weird hooting!
 Though I'm wearied out, I can't close an eye.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 You wicked women, cease from juggling lies.
 You want your men. But what of them as well?
 They toss as sleepless in the lonely night,
 I'm sure of it. Hold out awhile, hold out,
 But persevere a teeny-weeny longer.
 An oracle has promised Victory
 If we don't wrangle. Would you hear the words?
 
 WOMEN
 
 Yes, yes, what is it?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Silence then, you chatterboxes.
 Here--
 _Whenas the swallows flocking in one place from the hoopoes
 Deny themselves love's gambols any more,
 All woes shall then have ending and great Zeus the Thunderer
 Shall put above what was below before._
 
 WOMEN
 
 Will the men then always be kept under us?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 _But if the swallows squabble among themselves and fly away
 Out of the temple, refusing to agree,
 Then The Most Wanton Birds in all the World
 They shall be named for ever. That's his decree._
 
 WOMAN
 
 It's obvious what it means.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
                      Now by all the gods
 We must let no agony deter from duty,
 Back to your quarters. For we are base indeed,
 My friends, if we betray the oracle.
 
 _She goes out._
 
 
 OLD MEN.
 
 I'd like to remind you of a fable they used to employ,
 When I was a little boy:
 How once through fear of the marriage-bed a young man,
 Melanion by name, to the wilderness ran,
 And there on the hills he dwelt.
 For hares he wove a net
 Which with his dog he set--
 Most likely he's there yet.
 For he never came back home, so great was the fear he felt.
 I loathe the sex as much as he,
 And therefore I no less shall be
 As chaste as was Melanion.
 
 MAN
 
 Grann'am, do you much mind men?
 
 WOMAN
 
 Onions you won't need, to cry.
 
 MAN
 
 From my foot you shan't escape.
 
 WOMAN
 
 What thick forests I espy.
 
 MEN
 
 So much Myronides' fierce beard
 And thundering black back were feared,
 That the foe fled when they were shown--
 Brave he as Phormion.
 
 WOMEN.
 
 Well, I'll relate a rival fable just to show to you
 A different point of view:
 There was a rough-hewn fellow, Timon, with a face
 That glowered as through a thorn-bush in a wild, bleak place.
 He too decided on flight,
 This very Furies' son,
 All the world's ways to shun
 And hide from everyone,
 Spitting out curses on all knavish men to left and right.
 But though he reared this hate for men,
 He loved the women even then,
 And never thought them enemies.
 
 WOMAN
 
 O your jaw I'd like to break.
 
 MAN
 
 That I fear do you suppose?
 
 WOMAN
 
 Learn what kicks my legs can make.
 
 MAN
 
 Raise them up, and you'll expose--
 
 WOMAN
 
 Nay, you'll see there, I engage,
 All is well kept despite my age,
 And tended smooth enough to slip
 From any adversary's grip.
 
 LYSISTRATA _appears_.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Hollo there, hasten hither to me
 Skip fast along.
 
 WOMAN
 
 What is this? Why the noise?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 A man, a man! I spy a frenzied man!
 He carries Love upon him like a staff.
 O Lady of Cyprus, and Cythera, and Paphos,
 I beseech you, keep our minds and hands to the oath.
 
 WOMAN
 
 Where is he, whoever he is?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 By the Temple of Chloe.
 
 WOMAN
 
 Yes, now I see him, but who can he be?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Look at him. Does anyone recognise his face?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I do. He is my husband, Cinesias.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 You know how to work. Play with him, lead him on,
 Seduce him to the cozening-point--kiss him, kiss him,
 Then slip your mouth aside just as he's sure of it,
 Ungirdle every caress his mouth feels at
 Save that the oath upon the bowl has locked.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 You can rely on me.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I'll stay here to help
 In working up his ardor to its height
 Of vain magnificence.... The rest to their quarters.
 
 _Enter_ CINESIAS.
 
 Who is this that stands within our lines?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 I.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 A man?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Too much a man!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Then be off at once.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Who are you that thus eject me?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Guard for the day.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 By all the gods, then call Myrrhine hither.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 So, call Myrrhine hither! Who are you?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 I am her husband Cinesias, son of Anthros.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Welcome, dear friend! That glorious name of yours
 Is quite familiar in our ranks. Your wife
 Continually has it in her mouth.
 She cannot touch an apple or an egg
 But she must say, "This to Cinesias!"
 
 CINESIAS
 
 O is that true?
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 By Aphrodite, it is.
 If the conversation strikes on men, your wife
 Cuts in with, "All are boobies by Cinesias."
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Then call her here.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 And what am I to get?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 This, if you want it.... See, what I have here.
 But not to take away.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Then I'll call her.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Be quick, be quick. All grace is wiped from life
 Since she went away. O sad, sad am I
 When there I enter on that loneliness,
 And wine is unvintaged of the sun's flavour.
 And food is tasteless. But I've put on weight.
 
 MYRRHINE (_above_)
 
 I love him O so much! but he won't have it.
 Don't call me down to him.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Sweet little Myrrhine!
 What do you mean? Come here.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 O no I won't.
 Why are you calling me? You don't want me.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Not want you! with this week-old strength of love.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Farewell.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Don't go, please don't go, Myrrhine.
 At least you'll hear our child. Call your mother, lad.
 
 CHILD
 
 Mummy ... mummy ... mummy!
 
 CINESIAS
 
 There now, don't you feel pity for the child?
 He's not been fed or washed now for six days.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I certainly pity him with so heartless a father.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Come down, my sweetest, come for the child's sake.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 A trying life it is to be a mother!
 I suppose I'd better go.             _She comes down._
 
 CINESIAS
 
 How much younger she looks,
 How fresher and how prettier! Myrrhine,
 Lift up your lovely face, your disdainful face;
 And your ankle ... let your scorn step out its worst;
 It only rubs me to more ardor here.
 
 MYRRHINE (_playing with the child_)
 
 You're as innocent as he's iniquitous.
 Let me kiss you, honey-petting, mother's darling.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 How wrong to follow other women's counsel
 And let loose all these throbbing voids in yourself
 As well as in me. Don't you go throb-throb?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Take away your hands.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Everything in the house
 Is being ruined.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I don't care at all.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 The roosters are picking all your web to rags.
 Do you mind that?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Not I.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 What time we've wasted
 We might have drenched with Paphian laughter, flung
 On Aphrodite's Mysteries. O come here.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Not till a treaty finishes the war.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 If you must have it, then we'll get it done.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Do it and I'll come home. Till then I am bound.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Well, can't your oath perhaps be got around?
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 No ... no ... still I'll not say that I don't love you.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 You love me! Then dear girl, let me also love you.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 You must be joking. The boy's looking on.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Here, Manes, take the child home!... There, he's gone.
 There's nothing in the way now. Come to the point.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Here in the open! In plain sight?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 In Pan's cave.
 A splendid place.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Where shall I dress my hair again
 Before returning to the citadel?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 You can easily primp yourself in the Clepsydra.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 But how can I break my oath?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Leave that to me,
 I'll take all risk.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Well, I'll make you comfortable.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Don't worry. I'd as soon lie on the grass.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 No, by Apollo, in spite of all your faults
 I won't have you lying on the nasty earth.
 (_From here MYRRHINE keeps on going off to fetch things._)
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Ah, how she loves me.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Rest there on the bench,
 While I arrange my clothes. O what a nuisance,
 I must find some cushions first.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Why some cushions?
 Please don't get them!
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 What? The plain, hard wood?
 Never, by Artemis! That would be too vulgar.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Open your arms!
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 No. Wait a second.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 O....
 Then hurry back again.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Here the cushions are.
 Lie down while I--O dear! But what a shame,
 You need more pillows.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 I don't want them, dear.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 But I do.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Thwarted affection mine,
 They treat you just like Heracles at a feast
 With cheats of dainties, O disappointing arms!
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Raise up your head.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 There, that's everything at last.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Yes, all.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Then run to my arms, you golden girl.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I'm loosening my girdle now. But you've not forgotten?
 You're not deceiving me about the Treaty?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 No, by my life, I'm not.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Why, you've no blanket.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 It's not the silly blanket's warmth but yours I want.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Never mind. You'll soon have both. I'll come straight back.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 The woman will choke me with her coverlets.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Get up a moment.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 I'm up high enough.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Would you like me to perfume you?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 By Apollo, no!
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 By Aphrodite, I'll do it anyway.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Lord Zeus, may she soon use up all the myrrh.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Stretch out your hand. Take it and rub it in.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Hmm, it's not as fragrant as might be; that is,
 Not before it's smeared. It doesn't smell of kisses.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 How silly I am: I've brought you Rhodian scents.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 It's good enough, leave it, love.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 You must be jesting.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 Plague rack the man who first compounded scent!
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 Here, take this flask.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 I've a far better one.
 Don't tease me, come here, and get nothing more.
 
 MYRRHINE
 
 I'm coming.... I'm just drawing off my shoes....
 You're sure you will vote for Peace?
 
 CINESIAS
 
 I'll think about it.
 _She runs off._
 I'm dead: the woman's worn me all away.
 She's gone and left me with an anguished pulse.
 
 MEN
 
 Baulked in your amorous delight
 How melancholy is your plight.
 With sympathy your case I view;
 For I am sure it's hard on you.
 What human being could sustain
 This unforeseen domestic strain,
 And not a single trace
 Of willing women in the place!
 
 CINESIAS
 
 O Zeus, what throbbing suffering!
 
 MEN
 
 She did it all, the harlot, she
 With her atrocious harlotry.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Nay, rather call her darling-sweet.
 
 MEN
 
 What, sweet? She's a rude, wicked thing.
 
 CINESIAS
 
 A wicked thing, as I repeat.
 O Zeus, O Zeus,
 Canst Thou not suddenly let loose
 Some twirling hurricane to tear
 Her flapping up along the air
 And drop her, when she's whirled around,
 Here to the ground
 Neatly impaled upon the stake
 That's ready upright for her sake.
 _He goes out._
 
 _Enter_ SPARTAN HERALD.
 
 _The_ MAGISTRATE _comes forward_.
 
 HERALD
 
 What here gabs the Senate an' the Prytanes?
 I've fetcht despatches for them.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Are you a man
 Or a monstrosity?
 
 HERALD
 
 My scrimp-brained lad,
 I'm a herald, as ye see, who hae come frae Sparta
 Anent a Peace.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Then why do you hide that lance
 That sticks out under your arms?
 
 HERALD.
 
 I've brought no lance.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Then why do you turn aside and hold your cloak
 So far out from your body? Is your groin swollen
 With stress of travelling?
 
 HERALD
 
 By Castor, I'll swear
 The man is wud.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Indeed, your cloak is wide,
 My rascal fellow.
 
 HERALD
 
 But I tell ye No!
 Enow o' fleering!
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Well, what is it then?
 
 HERALD
 
 It's my despatch cane.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Of course--a Spartan cane!
 But speak right out. I know all this too well.
 Are new privations springing up in Sparta?
 
 HERALD
 
 Och, hard as could be: in lofty lusty columns
 Our allies stand united. We maun get Pellene.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 Whence has this evil come? Is it from Pan?
 
 HERALD
 
 No. Lampito first ran asklent, then the others
 Sprinted after her example, and blocked, the hizzies,
 Their wames unskaithed against our every fleech.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 What did you do?
 
 HERALD
 
 We are broken, and bent double,
 Limp like men carrying lanthorns in great winds
 About the city. They winna let us even
 Wi' lightest neif skim their primsie pretties
 Till we've concluded Peace-terms wi' a' Hellas.
 
 MAGISTRATE
 
 So the conspiracy is universal;
 This proves it. Then return to Sparta. Bid them
 Send envoys with full powers to treat of Peace;
 And I will urge the Senate here to choose
 Plenipotentiary ambassadors,
 As argument adducing this connection.
 
 HERALD
 
 I'm off. Your wisdom none could contravert.
 _They retire._
 
 MEN
 
 There is no beast, no rush of fire, like woman so untamed.
 She calmly goes her way where even panthers would be shamed.
 
 WOMEN
 
 And yet you are fool enough, it seems, to dare to war with me,
 When for your faithful ally you might win me easily.
 
 MEN
 
 Never could the hate I feel for womankind grow less.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Then have your will. But I'll take pity on your nakedness.
 For I can see just how ridiculous you look, and so
 Will help you with your tunic if close up I now may go.
 
 MEN
 
 Well, that, by Zeus, is no scoundrel-deed, I frankly will admit.
 I only took them off myself in a scoundrel raging-fit.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Now you look sensible, and that you're men no one could doubt.
 If you were but good friends again, I'd take the insect out
 That hurts your eye.
 
 MEN
 
 Is that what's wrong? That nasty bitie thing.
 Please squeeze it out, and show me what it is that makes this sting.
 It's been paining me a long while now.
 
 WOMEN
 
 Well I'll agree to that,
 Although you're most unmannerly. O what a giant gnat.
 Here, look! It comes from marshy Tricorysus, I can tell.
 
 MEN
 
 O thank you. It was digging out a veritable well.
 Now that it's gone, I can't hold back my tears. See how they fall.
 
 WOMEN
 
 I'll wipe them off, bad as you are, and kiss you after all.
 
 MEN
 
 I won't be kissed.
 
 WOMEN
 
 O yes, you will. Your wishes do not matter.
 
 MEN
 
 O botheration take you all! How you cajole and flatter.
 A hell it is to live with you; to live without, a hell:
 How truly was that said. But come, these enmities let's quell.
 You stop from giving orders and I'll stop from doing wrong.
 So let's join ranks and seal our bargain with a choric song.
 
 CHORUS.
 
 Athenians, it's not our intention
 To sow political dissension
 By giving any scandal mention;
 But on the contrary to promote good feeling in the state
 By word and deed. We've had enough calamities of late.
 So let a man or woman but divulge
 They need a trifle, say,
 Two minas, three or four,
 I've purses here that bulge.
 There's only one condition made
 (Indulge my whim in this I pray)--
 When Peace is signed once more,
 On no account am I to be repaid.
 
 And I'm making preparation
 For a gay select collation
 With some youths of reputation.
 I've managed to produce some soup and they're slaughtering for me
 A sucking-pig: its flesh should taste as tender as could be.
 I shall expect you at my house today.
 To the baths make an early visit,
 And bring your children along;
 Don't dawdle on the way.
 Ask no one; enter as if the place
 Was all your own--yours henceforth is it.
 If nothing chances wrong,
 The door will then be shut bang in your face.
 
 _The_ SPARTAN AMBASSADORS _approach_.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Here come the Spartan envoys with long, worried beards.
 Hail, Spartans how do you fare?
 Did anything new arise?
 
 SPARTANS
 
 No need for a clutter o' words. Do ye see our condition?
 
 CHORUS
 
 The situation swells to greater tension.
 Something will explode soon.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 It's awfu' truly.
 But come, let us wi' the best speed we may
 Scribble a Peace.
 
 CHORUS
 
 I notice that our men
 Like wrestlers poised for contest, hold their clothes
 Out from their bellies. An athlete's malady!
 Since exercise alone can bring relief.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Can anyone tell us where Lysistrata is?
 There is no need to describe our men's condition,
 It shows up plainly enough.
 
 CHORUS
 
 It's the same disease.
 Do you feel a jerking throbbing in the morning?
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 By Zeus, yes! In these straits, I'm racked all through.
 Unless Peace is soon declared, we shall be driven
 In the void of women to try Cleisthenes.
 
 CHORUS
 
 Be wise and cover those things with your tunics.
 Who knows what kind of person may perceive you?
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 By Zeus, you're right.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 By the Twa Goddesses,
 Indeed ye are. Let's put our tunics on.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Hail O my fellow-sufferers, hail Spartans.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 O hinnie darling, what a waefu' thing!
 If they had seen us wi' our lunging waddies!
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Tell us then, Spartans, what has brought you here?
 
 SPARTANS
 
 We come to treat o' Peace.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Well spoken there!
 And we the same. Let us callout Lysistrata
 Since she alone can settle the Peace-terms.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 Callout Lysistratus too if ye don't mind.
 
 CHORUS
 
 No indeed. She hears your voices and she comes.
 
 _Enter LYSISTRATA_
 
 Hail, Wonder of all women! Now you must be in turn
 Hard, shifting, clear, deceitful, noble, crafty, sweet, and stern.
 The foremost men of Hellas, smitten by your fascination,
 Have brought their tangled quarrels here for your sole arbitration.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 An easy task if the love's raging home-sickness
 Doesn't start trying out how well each other
 Will serve instead of us. But I'll know at once
 If they do. O where's that girl, Reconciliation?
 Bring first before me the Spartan delegates,
 And see you lift no rude or violent hands--
 None of the churlish ways our husbands used.
 But lead them courteously, as women should.
 And if they grudge fingers, guide them by other methods,
 And introduce them with ready tact. The Athenians
 Draw by whatever offers you a grip.
 Now, Spartans, stay here facing me. Here you,
 Athenians. Both hearken to my words.
 I am a woman, but I'm not a fool.
 And what of natural intelligence I own
 Has been filled out with the remembered precepts
 My father and the city-elders taught me.
 First I reproach you both sides equally
 That when at Pylae and Olympia,
 At Pytho and the many other shrines
 That I could name, you sprinkle from one cup
 The altars common to all Hellenes, yet
 You wrack Hellenic cities, bloody Hellas
 With deaths of her own sons, while yonder clangs
 The gathering menace of barbarians.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 We cannot hold it in much longer now.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Now unto you, O Spartans, do I speak.
 Do you forget how your own countryman,
 Pericleidas, once came hither suppliant
 Before our altars, pale in his purple robes,
 Praying for an army when in Messenia
 Danger growled, and the Sea-god made earth quaver.
 Then with four thousand hoplites Cimon marched
 And saved all Sparta. Yet base ingrates now,
 You are ravaging the soil of your preservers.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 By Zeus, they do great wrong, Lysistrata.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 Great wrong, indeed. O! What a luscious wench!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 And now I turn to the Athenians.
 Have you forgotten too how once the Spartans
 In days when you wore slavish tunics, came
 And with their spears broke a Thessalian host
 And all the partisans of Hippias?
 They alone stood by your shoulder on that day.
 They freed you, so that for the slave's short skirt
 You should wear the trailing cloak of liberty.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 I've never seen a nobler woman anywhere.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Nor I one with such prettily jointing hips.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Now, brethren twined with mutual benefactions,
 Can you still war, can you suffer such disgrace?
 Why not be friends? What is there to prevent you?
 
 SPARTANS
 
 We're agreed, gin that we get this tempting Mole.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Which one?
 
 SPARTANS
 
 That ane we've wanted to get into,
 O for sae lang.... Pylos, of course.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 By Poseidon,
 Never!
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Give it up.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Then what will we do?
 We need that ticklish place united to us--
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Ask for some other lurking-hole in return.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Then, ah, we'll choose this snug thing here, Echinus,
 Shall we call the nestling spot? And this backside haven,
 These desirable twin promontories, the Maliac,
 And then of course these Megarean Legs.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 Not that, O surely not that, never that.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Agree! Now what are two legs more or less?
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 I want to strip at once and plough my land.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 And mine I want to fertilize at once.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 And so you can, when Peace is once declared.
 If you mean it, get your allies' heads together
 And come to some decision.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 What allies?
 There's no distinction in our politics:
 We've risen as one man to this conclusion;
 Every ally is jumping-mad to drive it home.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 And ours the same, for sure.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 The Carystians first!
 I'll bet on that.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 I agree with all of you.
 Now off, and cleanse yourselves for the Acropolis,
 For we invite you all in to a supper
 From our commissariat baskets. There at table
 You will pledge good behaviour and uprightness;
 Then each man's wife is his to hustle home.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Come, as quickly as possible.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 As quick as ye like.
 Lead on.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 O Zeus, quick, quick, lead quickly on.
 _They hurry off._
 
 CHORUS.
 
 Broidered stuffs on high I'm heaping,
 Fashionable cloaks and sweeping
 Trains, not even gold gawds keeping.
 Take them all, I pray you, take them all (I do not care)
 And deck your children--your daughter, if the Basket she's to bear.
 Come, everyone of you, come in and take
 Of this rich hoard a share.
 Nought's tied so skilfully
 But you its seal can break
 And plunder all you spy inside.
 I've laid out all that I can spare,
 And therefore you will see
 Nothing unless than I you're sharper-eyed.
 If lacking corn a man should be
 While his slaves clamour hungrily
 And his excessive progeny,
 Then I've a handfull of grain at home which is always to be had,
 And to which in fact a more-than-life-size loaf I'd gladly add.
 Then let the poor bring with them bag or sack
 And take this store of food.
 Manes, my man, I'll tell
 To help them all to pack
 Their wallets full. But O take care.
 I had forgotten; don't intrude,
 Or terrified you'll yell.
 My dog is hungry too, and bites--beware!
 
 Some _LOUNGERS_ from the Market with torches approach
 the Banqueting hall. The _PORTER_ bars their entrance.
 
 1ST MARKET-LOUNGER
 
 Open the door.
 
 PORTER
 
 Here move along.
 
 1ST MARKET-LOUNGER
 
 What's this?
 You're sitting down. Shall I singe you with my torch?
 That's vulgar! O I couldn't do it ... yet
 If it would gratify the audience,
 I'll mortify myself.
 
 2ND MARKET-LOUNGER
 
 And I will too.
 We'll both be crude and vulgar, yes we will.
 
 PORTER
 
 Be off at once now or you'll be wailing
 Dirges for your hair. Get off at once,
 And see you don't disturb the Spartan envoys
 Just coming out from the splendid feast they've had.
 
 _The banqueters begin to come out._
 
 1ST ATHENIAN
 
 I've never known such a pleasant banquet before,
 And what delightful fellows the Spartans are.
 When we are warm with wine, how wise we grow.
 
 2ND ATHENIAN
 
 That's only fair, since sober we're such fools:
 This is the advice I'd give the Athenians--
 See our ambassadors are always drunk.
 For when we visit Sparta sober, then
 We're on the alert for trickery all the while
 So that we miss half of the things they say,
 And misinterpret things that were never said,
 And then report the muddle back to Athens.
 But now we're charmed with each other. They might cap
 With the Telamon-catch instead of the Cleitagora,
 And we'd applaud and praise them just the same;
 We're not too scrupulous in weighing words.
 
 PORTER
 
 Why, here the rascals come again to plague me.
 Won't you move on, you sorry loafers there!
 
 MARKET-LOUNGER
 
 Yes, by Zeus, they're already coming out.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 Now hinnie dearest, please tak' up your pipe
 That I may try a spring an' sing my best
 In honour o' the Athenians an' oursels.
 
 ATHENIANS
 
 Aye, take your pipe. By all the gods, there's nothing
 Could glad my heart more than to watch you dance.
 
 SPARTANS.
 
 Mnemosyne,
 Let thy fire storm these younkers,
 O tongue wi' stormy ecstasy
 My Muse that knows
 Our deeds and theirs, how when at sea
 Their navies swooped upon
 The Medes at Artemision--
 Gods for their courage, did they strike
 Wrenching a triumph frae their foes;
 While at Thermopylae
 Leonidas' army stood: wild-boars they were like
 Wild-boars that wi' fierce threat
 Their terrible tusks whet;
 The sweat ran streaming down each twisted face,
 Faen blossoming i' strange petals o' death
 Panted frae mortal breath,
 The sweat drenched a' their bodies i' that place,
 For the hurly-burly o' Persians glittered more
 Than the sands on the shore.
 
 Come, Hunting Girl, an' hear my prayer--
 You whose arrows whizz in woodlands, come an' bless
 This Peace we swear.
 Let us be fenced wi' age long amity,
 O let this bond stick ever firm through thee
 In friendly happiness.
 Henceforth no guilefu' perjury be seen!
 O hither, hither O
 Thou wildwood queen.
 
 LYSISTRATA
 
 Earth is delighted now, peace is the voice of earth.
 Spartans, sort out your wives: Athenians, yours.
 Let each catch hands with his wife and dance his joy,
 Dance out his thanks, be grateful in music,
 And promise reformation with his heels.
 
 ATHENIANS.
 
 O Dancers, forward. Lead out the Graces,
 Call Artemis out;
 Then her brother, the Dancer of Skies,
 That gracious Apollo.
 Invoke with a shout
 Dionysus out of whose eyes
 Breaks fire on the maenads that follow;
 And Zeus with his flares of quick lightning, and call,
 Happy Hera, Queen of all,
 And all the Daimons summon hither to be
 Witnesses of our revelry
 And of the noble Peace we have made,
 Aphrodite our aid.
 Io Paieon, Io, cry--
 For victory, leap!
 Attained by me, leap!
 Euoi Euoi Euai Euai.
 
 SPARTANS
 
 Piper, gie us the music for a new sang.
 
 SPARTANS.
 
 Leaving again lovely lofty Taygetus
 Hither O Spartan Muse, hither to greet us,
 And wi' our choric voice to raise
 To Amyclean Apollo praise,
 And Tyndareus' gallant sons whose days
 Alang Eurotas' banks merrily pass,
 An' Athene o' the House o' Brass.
 
 Now the dance begin;
 Dance, making swirl your fringe o' woolly skin,
 While we join voices
 To hymn dear Sparta that rejoices
 I' a beautifu' sang,
 An' loves to see
 Dancers tangled beautifully;
 For the girls i' tumbled ranks
 Alang Eurotas' banks
 Like wanton fillies thrang,
 Frolicking there
 An' like Bacchantes shaking the wild air
 To comb a giddy laughter through the hair,
 Bacchantes that clench thyrsi as they sweep
 To the ecstatic leap.
 
 An' Helen, Child o' Leda, come
 Thou holy, nimble, gracefu' Queen,
 Lead thou the dance, gather thy joyous tresses up i' bands
 An' play like a fawn. To madden them, clap thy hands,
 And sing praise to the warrior goddess templed i' our lands,
 Her o' the House o' Brass.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Ted Garvin, Marvin A. Hodges, Charles Franks
 and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE FROGS OF ARISTOPHANES
 
 By Aristophanes
 
 The Harvard Classics
 
 Edited By Charles W Eliot Lld
 
 Nine Greek Dramas
 
 By AEschylus, Sophocles, Euripides And Aristophanes
 
 
 
 Translations By
 
   E D A Morshead
   E H Plumptre
   Gilbert Murray
   And
   B B Rogers
 
 
 With Introductions And Notes
 
 
 VOLUME 8
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTORY NOTE
 
 
 Aristophanes, _the greatest of comic writers in Greek and in the
 opinion of many, in any language, is the only one of the Attic
 comedians any of whose works has survived in complete form He was born
 in Athens about the middle of the fifth century B C, and had his first
 comedy produced when he was so young that his name was withheld on
 account of his youth. He is credited with over forty plays, eleven of
 which survive, along with the names and fragments of some twenty-six
 others. His satire deal with political, religious, and literary topics,
 and with all its humor and fancy is evidently the outcome of profound
 conviction and a genuine patriotism. The Attic comedy was produced at
 the festivals of Dionysus, which were marked by great license, and to
 this, rather than to the individual taste of the poet, must be ascribed
 the undoubted coarseness of many of the jests. Aristophanes seems,
 indeed, to have been regarded by his contemporaries as a man of noble
 character. He died shortly after the production of his "Plutus," in 388
 B. C.
 
 "The Frogs" was produced the year after the death of Euripides, and
 laments the decay of Greek tragedy which Aristophanes attributed to
 that writer. It is an admirable example of the brilliance of his style,
 and of that mingling of wit and poetry with rollicking humor and keen
 satirical point which is his chief characteristic. Here, as elsewhere,
 he stands for tradition against innovation of all kinds, whether in
 politics, religion, or art. The hostility to Euripides displayed here
 and in several other plays, like his attacks on Socrates, is a result
 of this attitude of conservatism. The present play is notable also as a
 piece of elaborate if not over-serious literary criticism from the pen
 of a great poet._
 
 
 
 THE FROGS OF ARISTOPHANES
 
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE
 
 
 THE GOD DIONYSUS
 
 XANTHIAS, _his slave_
 
 AESCHYLUS
 
 EURIPIDES
 
 HERACLES
 
 PLUTO
 
 CHARON AEACUS, _house porter to Pluto_
 
 A CORPSE
 
 A MAIDSERVANT OF PERSEPHONE
 
 A LANDLADY IN HADES
 
 PLATHANE, _her servant_
 
 A CHORUS OF FROGS
 
 A CHORUS OF INITIATED PERSONS
 
 _Attendants at a Funeral;
 
 Women worshipping Iacchus;
 
 Servants of Pluto, &c._
 
 
 *****
 
   _XANTHIAS_
 
   Shall I crack any of those old jokes, master,
   At which the audience never fail to laugh?
 
   DIONYSUS. Aye, what you will, except _I'm getting crushed:_ Fight shy
   of that: I'm sick of that already.
 
   XAN. Nothing else smart?
 
   DIO. Aye, save _my shoulder's aching._
 
   XAN. Come now, that comical joke?
 
   DIO. With all my heart. Only be careful not to shift your pole,
   And--
 
   XAN. What?
 
   DIO. And vow that you've a bellyache.
 
   XAN. May I not say I'm overburdened so
   That if none ease me, I must ease myself?
 
   DIO. For mercy's sake, not till I'm going to vomit.
 
   XAN.
 
   What! must I bear these burdens, and not make
   One of the jokes Ameipsias and Lycis
   And Phrynichus, in every play they write,
   Put in the mouths of all their burden-bearers?
 
   DIO.
 
   Don't make them; no! I tell you when I see
   Their plays, and hear those jokes, I come away
   More than a twelvemonth older than I went.
 
   XAN.
 
   O thrice unlucky neck of mine, which now
   Is _getting crushed_, yet must not crack its joke!
 
   DIO.
 
   Now is not this fine pampered insolence
   When I myself, Dionysus, son of--Pipkin,
   Toil on afoot, and let this fellow ride,
   Taking no trouble, and no burden bearing?
 
   XAN. What, don't I bear?
 
   DIO. How can you when you're riding?
 
   XAN. Why, I bear these.
 
   DIO. How?
 
   XAN. Most unwillingly.
 
   DIO. Does not the donkey bear the load you're bearing?
 
   XAN. Not what I bear myself: by Zeus, not he.
 
   DIO. How can you bear, when you are borne yourself?
 
   XAN. Don't know: but anyhow _my shoulder's aching_.
 
   DIO.
 
   Then since you say the donkey helps you not,
   You lift him up and carry him in turn.
 
   XAN.
 
   O hang it all! why didn't I fight at sea?
   You should have smarted bitterly for this.
 
   DIO.
 
   Get down, you rascal; I've been trudging on
   Till now I've reached the portal, where I'm going
   First to turn in.
   Boy! Boy! I say there, Boy!
 
   HERACLES.
 
   Who banged the door? How like a prancing Centaur
   He drove against it! Mercy o' me, what's this?
 
   DIO. Boy.
 
   XAN. Yes.
 
   DIO. Did you observe?
 
   XAN. What?
 
   DIO. How alarmed He is.
 
   XAN. Aye truly, lest you've lost your wits.
 
   HER. O by Demeter, I can't choose but laugh.
   Biting my lips won't stop me. Ha! ha! ha!
 
   DIO. Pray you, come hither, I have need of you.
 
   HER. I vow I can't help laughing, I can't help it.
   A lion's hide upon a yellow silk, a club and buskin!
   What's it all about? Where were you going?
 
   DIO. I was serving lately aboard the--Cleisthenes.
 
   HER. And fought?
 
   DIO. And sank more than a dozen of the enemy's ships.
 
   HER. You two?
 
   DIO. We two.
 
   HER. And then I awoke, and lo!
 
   DIO. There as, on deck, I'm reading to myself
   The Andromeda, a sudden pang of longing
   Shoots through my heart, you can't conceive how keenly.
 
   HER. How big a pang.
 
   DIO. A small one, Molon's size.
 
   HER. Caused by a woman?
 
   DIO. No.
 
   HER. A boy?
 
   DIO. No, no.
 
   HER. A man?
 
   DIO. Ah! ah!
 
   HER. Was it for Cleisthenes?
 
   DIO. Don't mock me, brother; on my life I am
   In a bad way: such fierce desire consumes me.
 
   HER. Aye, little brother? how?
 
   DIO. I can't describe it. But yet I'll tell you in a riddling way.
   Have you e'er felt a sudden lust for soup?
 
   HER. Soup! Zeus-a-mercy, yes, ten thousand times.
 
   DIO. Is the thing clear, or must I speak again?
 
   HER. Not of the soup: I'm clear about the soup.
 
   DIO. Well, just that sort of pang devours my heart
   For lost Euripides.
 
   HER. A dead man too.
 
   DIO. And no one shall persuade me not to go after the man.
 
   HER. Do you mean below, to Hades?
 
   DIO. And lower still, if there's a lower still.
 
   HER. What on earth for?
 
   DIO. I want a genuine poet, "For some are not, and those that are, are
   bad."
 
   HER. What! does not Iophon live?
 
   DIO. Well, he's the sole Good thing remaining, if even he is good.
   For even of that I'm not exactly certain.
 
   HER. If go you must, there's Sophocles--he comes Before Euripides--why
   not take _him_?
 
   DIO. Not till I've tried if Iophon's coin rings true
   When he's alone, apart from Sophocles.
   Besides, Euripides the crafty rogue,
   Will find a thousand shifts to get away,
   But _he_ was easy here, is easy there.
 
   HER. But Agathon, where is he?
 
   DIO. He has gone and left us, A genial poet, by his friends much
   missed.
 
   HER. Gone where?
 
   DIO. To join the blessed in their banquets.
 
   HER. But what of Xenocles?
 
   DIO. O he be hanged!
 
   HER. Pythangelus?
 
   XAN. But never a word of me, Not though my shoulder's chafed so
   terribly.
 
   HER. But have you not a shoal of little songsters,
   Tragedians by the myriad, who can chatter
   A furlong faster than Euripides?
 
   DIO. Those be mere vintage-leavings, jabberers, choirs
   Of swallow-broods, degraders of their art,
   Who get one chorus, and are seen no more,
   The Muses' love once gained. But O my friend,
   Search where you will, you'll never find a true
   Creative genius, uttering startling things.
 
   HER. Creative? how do you mean?
 
   DIO. I mean a man Who'll dare some novel venturesome conceit,
   _Air, Zeus's chamber_, or _Time's foot_, or this,
   _'Twas not my mind that swore: my tongue committed
   A little perjury on its own account._
 
   HER. You like that style?
 
   DIO. Like it? I dote upon it.
 
   HER. I vow it's ribald nonsense, and you know it.
 
   DIO. "Rule not my mind": you've got a house to mind.
 
   HER. Really and truly though 'tis paltry stuff.
 
   DIO. Teach me to dine!
 
   XAN. But never a word of me.
 
   DIO. But tell me truly--'twas for this I came
   Dressed up to mimic you--what friends received
   And entertained you when you went below
   To bring back Cerberus, in case I need them.
   And tell me too the havens, fountains, shops,
   Roads, resting-places, stews, refreshment rooms,
   Towns, lodgings, hostesses, with whom were found
   The fewest bugs.
 
   XAN. But never a word of me.
 
   HER. You are really game to go?
 
   DIO. O drop that, can't you? And tell me this: of all the roads you
   know
   Which is the quickest way to get to Hades? I want one not too warm, nor
   yet too cold.
 
   HER. Which shall I tell you first? which shall it be?
   There's one by rope and bench: you launch away
   And--hang yourself.
 
   DIO. No thank you: that's too stifling.
 
   HER. Then there's a track, a short and beaten cut.
   By pestle and mortar.
 
   DIO. Hemlock, do you mean?
 
   HER. Just so.
 
   DIO. No, that's too deathly cold a way;
   You have hardly started ere your shins get numbed.
 
   HER. Well, would you like a steep and swift descent?
 
   DIO. Aye, that's the style: my walking powers are small.
 
   HER. Go down to the Cerameicus.
 
   DIO. And do what?
 
   HER. Climb to the tower's top pinnacle--
 
   DIO. And then?
 
   HER. Observe the torch-race started, and when all
   The multitude is shouting _Let them go_,
   Let yourself go.
 
   DIO. Go whither?
 
   HER. To the ground.
 
   DIO. O that would break my brain's two envelopes. I'll not try that
 
   HER. Which will you try?
 
   DIO. The way you went yourself.
 
   HER. A parlous voyage that,
   For first you'll come to an enormous lake Of fathomless depth.
 
   DIO. And how am I to cross?
 
   HER. An ancient mariner will row you over
   In a wee boat, _so_ big.
   The fare's two obols.
 
   DIO. Fie! The power two obols have, the whole world through!
   How came they thither?
 
   HER. Theseus took them down.
   And next you'll see great snakes and savage monsters
   In tens of thousands.
 
   DIO. You needn't try to scare me, I'm going to go.
 
   HER. Then weltering seas of filth
   And ever-rippling dung: and plunged therein,
   Whoso has wronged the stranger here on earth,
   Or robbed his boylove of the promised pay,
   Or swinged his mother, or profanely smitten
   His father's cheek, or sworn an oath forsworn,
   Or copied out a speech of Morsimus.
 
   DIO. There too, perdie, should _he_ be plunged, whoe'er
   Has danced the sword-dance of Cinesias.
 
   HER. And next the breath of flutes will float around you,
   And glorious sunshine, such as ours, you'll see,
   And myrtle groves, and happy bands who clap
   Their hands in triumph, men and women too.
 
   DIO. And who are they?
 
   HER. The happy mystic bands.
 
   XAN. And I'm the donkey in the mystery show.
   But I'll not stand it, not one instant longer.
 
   HER. Who'll tell you everything you want to know.
   You'll find them dwelling close beside the road
   You are going to travel, just at Pluto's gate.
   And fare thee well, my brother.
 
   DIO. And to you Good cheer.
 
   (_To Xan._) Now sirrah, pick you up the traps.
 
   XAN. Before I've put them down?
 
   DIO. And quickly too.
 
   XAN. No, prithee, no; but hire a body, one
   They're carrying out, on purpose for the trip.
 
   DIO. If I can't find one?
 
   XAN. Then I'll take them.
 
   DIO. Good. And see! they are carrying out a body now.
   Hallo! you there, you deadman, are you willing
   To carry down our little traps to Hades?
 
   CORPSE. What are they?
 
   DIO. These.
 
   CORP. Two drachmas for the job?
 
   DIO. Nay, that's too much.
 
   CORP. Out of the pathway, you!
 
   DIO. Beshrew thee, stop: may-be we'll strike a bargain.
 
   CORP. Pay me two drachmas, or it's no use talking.
 
   DIO. One and a half.
 
   CORP. I'd liefer live again!
 
   XAN. How absolute the knave is!
   He be hanged! I'll go myself.
 
   DIO. You're the right sort, my man.
   Now to the ferry.
 
   CHARON. Yoh, up! lay her to.
 
   XAN. Whatever's that?
 
   DIO. Why, that's the lake, by Zeus,
   Whereof he spake, and yon's the ferry-boat.
 
   XAN. Poseidon, yes, and that old fellow's Charon.
 
   DIO. Charon! O welcome, Charon! welcome, Charon.
 
   CHAR. Who's for the Rest from every pain and ill?
   Who's for the Lethe's plain? the Donkey-shearings?
   Who's for Cerberia? Taenarum? or the Ravens?
 
   DIO. I.
 
   CHAR. Hurry in.
 
   DIO. But where are you going really? In truth to the Ravens?
 
   CHAR. Aye, for your behoof. Step in.
 
   DIO. (_To Xan._) Now, lad.
 
   CHAR. A slave? I take no slave,
   Unless he has fought for his bodyrights at sea.
 
   XAN. I couldn't go. I'd got the eye-disease.
 
   CHAR. Then fetch a circuit round about the lake.
 
   XAN. Where must I wait?
 
   CHAR. Beside the Withering stone,
   Hard by the Rest.
 
   DIO. You understand?
 
   XAN. Too well. O, what ill omen crost me as I started!
 
   CHAR. (_To DIO._) Sit to the oar. (_Calling._) Who else for the boat?
   Be quick.
 
   (_To DIO._) Hi! what are you doing?
 
   DIO. What am I doing? Sitting On to the oar.
   You told me to, yourself.
 
   CHAR. Now sit you there, you little Potgut.
 
   DIO. So?
 
   CHAR. Now stretch your arms full length before you.
 
   DIO. So?
 
   CHAR. Come, don't keep fooling; plant your feet, and now
   Pull with a will.
 
   DIO. Why, how am _I_ to pull? I'm not an oarsman, seaman,
   Salaminian. I can't!
 
   CHAR. You can. Just dip your oar in once,
   You'll hear the loveliest timing songs.
 
   DIO. What from?
 
   CHAR. Frog-swans, most wonderful.
 
   DIO. Then give the word.
 
   CHAR. Heave ahoy! heave ahoy!!
 
   FROGS.
 
    Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax!
    Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax!
    We children of the fountain and the lake
    Let us wake
    Our full choir-shout, as the flutes are ringing out,
    Our symphony of clear-voiced song.
    The song we used to love in the Marshland up above,
    In praise of DIOnysus to produce,
    Of Nysaean DIOnysus, son of Zeus,
    When the revel-tipsy throng, all crapulous and gay,
    To our precinct reeled along on the holy
    Pitcher day.
    Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
 
   DIO. O, dear! O dear! now I declare I've got a bump upon my rump.
 
   FR. Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
 
   DIO. But you, perchance, don't care.
 
   FR. Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
 
   DIO. Hang you, and your ko-axing too! There's nothing but ko-ax with
   you.
 
   FR. That is right, Mr. Busybody, right!
   For the Muses of the lyre love us well;
   And hornfoot Pan who plays on the pipe his jocund lays;
   And Apollo, Harper bright, in our Chorus takes delight
   For the strong reed's sake which I grow within my lake
   To be girdled in his lyre's deep shell.
   Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
 
   DIO.
 
     My hands are blistered very sore;
     My stern below is sweltering so,
     'Twill soon, I know, upturn and roar
     Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
     O tuneful race, O pray give o'er,
     O sing no more.
 
   FR. Ah, no! ah, no! Loud and louder our chant must flow.
   Sing if ever ye sang of yore,
   When in sunny and glorious days
   Through the rushes and marsh-flags springing
   On we swept, in the joy of singing
   Myriad-divine roundelays.
   Or when fleeing the storm, we went
   Down to the depths, and our choral song
   Wildly raised to a loud and long
   Bubble-bursting accompaniment.
 
   FR. and DIO. Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
 
   DIO. This timing song I take from you.
 
   FR. That's a dreadful thing to do.
 
   DIO. Much more dreadful, if I row
   Till I burst myself, I trow.
 
   FR. and DIO. Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
 
   DIO. Go, hang yourselves; for what care I?
 
   FR. All the same we'll shout and cry,
   Stretching all our throats with song,
   Shouting, crying, all day long.
 
   FR. and DIO. Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
 
   DIO. In this you'll never, never win.
 
   FR. This you shall not beat us in.
 
   DIO. No, nor ye prevail o'er me.
   Never! never! I'll my song
   Shout, if need be, all day long,
   Until I've learned to master your ko-ax.
   Brekekekex, ko-ax, ko-ax.
   I thought I'd put a stop to your ko-ax.
 
   CHAR. Stop! Easy! Take the oar and push her to now pay your fare and
   go.
 
   DIO. Here 'tis: two obols. Xanthias! where's Xanthias?
   Is it Xanthias there?
 
   XAN. Hoi, hoi!
 
   DIO. Come hither.
 
   XAN. Glad to meet you, master.
 
   DIO. What have you there?
 
   XAN. Nothing but filth and darkness.
 
   DIO. But tell me, did you see the parricides
   And perjured folk he mentioned?
 
   XAN. Didn't you?
 
   DIO. Poseidon, yes. Why look! (_pointing to the audience_)
   I see them now. What's the next step?
 
   XAN. We'd best be moving on.
   This is the spot where Heracles declared
   Those savage monsters dwell.
 
   DIO. O hang the fellow.
   That's all his bluff: he thought to scare me off,
   The jealous dog, knowing my plucky ways.
   There's no such swaggerer lives as Heracles.
   Why, I'd like nothing better than to achieve
   Some bold adventure, worthy of our trip.
 
   XAN. I know you would. Hallo! I hear a noise.
 
   DIO. Where? what?
 
   XAN. Behind us, there.
 
   DIO. Get you behind.
 
   XAN. No, it's in front.
 
   DIO. Get you in front directly.
 
   XAN. And now I see the most ferocious monster.
 
   DIO. O, what's it like?
 
   XAN. Like everything by turns.
   Now it's a bull: now it's a mule: and now
   The loveliest girl.
 
   DIO. O, where? I'll go and meet her.
 
   XAN. It's ceased to be a girl: it's a dog now.
 
   DIO. It is Empusa!
 
   XAN. Well, its face is all
   Ablaze with fire.
 
   DIO. Has it a copper leg?
 
   XAN. A copper leg, yes, one; and one of cow dung.
 
   DIO. O, whither shall I flee?
 
   XAN. O, whither I?
 
   DIO. My priest, protect me, and we'll sup together.
 
   XAN. King Heracles, we're done for.
 
   DIO. O, forbear, Good fellow, call me anything but that.
 
   XAN. Well then, Dionysus.
 
   DIO. O, that's worse again.
 
   XAN. (_To the Spectre_.) Aye, go thy way.
   O master, here, come here.
 
   DIO. O, what's up now?
 
   XAN. Take courage; all's serene.
   And, like Hegelochus, we now may say
   "Out of the storm there comes a new fine wether."
   Empusa's gone.
 
   DIO. Swear it.
 
   XAN. By Zeus she is.
 
   DIO. Swear it again.
 
   XAN. By Zeus.
 
   DIO. Again
 
   XAN. By Zeus. O dear, O dear, how pale I grew to see her,
   But he, from fright has yellowed me all over.
 
   DIO. Ah me, whence fall these evils on my head?
   Who is the god to blame for my destruction?
   Air, Zeus's chamber, or the Foot of Time?
 
   (_A flute is played behind the scenes_.)
 
   DIO. Hist!
 
   XAN. What's the matter.
 
   DIO. Didn't you hear it?
 
   XAN. What?
 
   DIO. The breath of flutes.
 
   XAN. Aye, and a whiff of torches
   Breathed o'er me too; a very mystic whiff.
 
   DIO. Then crouch we down, and mark what's going on.
 
   CHORUS. (_In the distance_.) O Iacchus! O Iacchus! O Iacchus!
 
   XAN. I have it, master: 'tis those blessed Mystics,
   Of whom he told us, sporting hereabouts.
   They sing the Iacchus which Diagoras made.
 
   DIO. I think so too: we had better both keep quiet
   And so find out exactly what it is.
 
   (_The calling forth of Iacchus_.)
 
   CHOR.
 
     O Iacchus! power excelling, here in stately temple dwelling,
     O Iacchus! O Iacchus!
     Come to tread this verdant level,
     Come to dance in mystic revel,
     Come whilst round thy forehead hurtles
     Many a wreath of fruitful myrtles,
     Come with wild and saucy paces
     Mingling in our joyous dance,
     Pure and holy, which embraces all the charms of all the Graces
     When the mystic choirs advance.
 
   XAN. Holy and sacred queen, Demeter's daughter, O, what a jolly whiff
   of pork breathed o'er me!
 
   DIO. Hist! and perchance you'll get some tripe yourself.
 
   _(The welcome to Iacchus.)_
 
   CHOR. Come, arise, from sleep awaking,
     come the fiery torches shaking,
     O Iacchus! O Iacchus!
     Morning Star that shinest nightly.
     Lo, the mead is blazing brightly,
     Age forgets its years and sadness,
     Aged knees curvet for gladness,
     Lift thy flashing torches o'er us,
     Marshal all thy blameless train,
     Lead, O lead the way before us;
     lead the lovely youthful Chorus
     To the marshy flowery plain.
 
   _(The warning-off of the profane.)_
 
   All evil thoughts and profane be still: far hence, far hence from our
        choirs depart,
   Who knows not well what the Mystics tell, or is not holy and pure of
        heart;
   Who ne'er has the noble revelry learned, or danced the dance of the
        Muses high;
   Or shared in the Bacchic rites which old bull-eating Cratinus's words
        supply;
   Who vulgar coarse buffoonery loves, though all untimely the jests they
        make;
   Or lives not easy and kind with all, or kindling faction forbears to
        slake,
   But fans the fire, from a base desire some pitiful gain for himself to
        reap;
   Or takes, in office, his gifts and bribes, while the city is tossed on
        the stormy deep;
   Who fort or fleet to the foe betrays; or, a vile Thorycion, ships away
   Forbidden stores from Aegina's shores, to Epidaurus across the Bay
   Transmitting oarpads and sails and tar, that curst collector of five
        per cents;
   The knave who tries to procure supplies for the use of the enemy's
        armaments;
   The Cyclian singer who dares befoul the Lady Hecate's wayside shrine;
   The public speaker who once lampooned in our Bacchic feast, would, with
        heart malign,
   Keep nibbling away the Comedians' pay;--to these I utter my warning
        cry,
   I charge them once, I charge them twice, I charge them thrice, that
        they draw not nigh
   To the sacred dance of the Mystic choir. But YE, my comrades, awake the
        song,
   The night-long revels of joy and mirth which ever of right to our feast
        belong.
 
   (_The start of the procession_.)
 
     Advance, true hearts, advance!
     On to the gladsome bowers,
     On to the sward, with flowers
          Embosomed bright!
     March on with jest, and jeer, and dance,
     Full well ye've supped to-night.
 
   (_The processional hymn to Persephone_.)
 
     March, chanting loud your lays,
     Your hearts and voices raising,
     The Saviour goddess praising
          Who vows she'll still
     Our city save to endless days,
     Whate'er Thorycion's will.
 
   Break off the measure, and change the time; and now with chanting and
        hymns adorn
   Demeter, goddess mighty and high, the harvest-queen, the giver of corn.
 
   (_The processional hymn to Demeter_.)
 
     O Lady, over our rites presiding,
     Preserve and succour thy choral throng,
     And grant us all, in thy help confiding,
     To dance and revel the whole day long;
     AND MUCH in earnest, and much in jest,
     Worthy thy feast, may we speak therein.
     And when we have bantered and laughed our best,
     The victor's wreath be it ours to win.
 
   Call we now the youthful god, call him hither without delay,
   Him who travels amongst his chorus, dancing along on the Sacred Way.
 
   (_The processional hymn to Iacchus_.)
 
     O, come with the joy of thy festival song,
     O, come to the goddess, O, mix with our throng
     Untired, though the journey be never so long.
          O Lord of the frolic and dance,
          Iacchus, beside me advance!
     For fun, and for cheapness, our dress thou hast rent,
     Through thee we may dance to the top of our bent,
     Reviling, and jeering, and none will resent.
          O Lord of the frolic and dance,
          Iacchus, beside me advance!
     A sweet pretty girl I observed in the show,
     Her robe had been torn in the scuffle, and lo,
     There peeped through the tatters a bosom of snow.
          O Lord of the frolic and dance,
          Iacchus, beside me advance!
 
   DIO. Wouldn't I like to follow on, and try
   A little sport and dancing?
 
   XAN. Wouldn't I?
 
   (_The banter at the bridge of Cephisus_.)
 
     CHOR. Shall we all a merry joke
     At Archedemus poke,
     Who has not cut his guildsmen yet, though seven years old;
     Yet up among the dead
     He is demagogue and head,
     And contrives the topmost place of the rascaldom to hold?
     And Cleisthenes, they say, Is among the tombs all day,
     Bewailing for his lover with a lamentable whine.
     And Callias, I'm told,
     Has become a sailor bold,
     And casts a lion's hide o'er his members feminine.
 
     DIO. Can any of you tell
     Where Pluto here may dwell,
     For we, sirs, are two strangers who were never here before?
 
     CHOR. O, then no further stray,
     Nor again enquire the way,
     For know that ye have journeyed to his very entrance-door
 
     DIO. Take up the wraps, my lad.
 
     XAN. Now is not this too bad?
     Like "Zeus's Corinth," he "the wraps" keeps saying o'er and o'er.
 
     CHOR. Now wheel your sacred dances through the glade with flowers
         bedight,
     All ye who are partakers of the holy festal rite;
     And I will with the women and the holy maidens go
     Where they keep the nightly vigil, an auspicious light to show.
 
   (_The departure for the Thriasian Plain_)
 
     Now haste we to the roses,
     And the meadows full of posies,
     Now haste we to the meadows
          In our own old way,
     In choral dances blending,
     In dances never ending,
     Which only for the holy
          The Destinies array.
     O happy mystic chorus,
     The blessed sunshine o'er us
     On us alone is smiling,
          In its soft sweet light:
     On us who strove for ever
     With holy, pure endeavour,
     Alike by friend and stranger
          To guide our steps aright.
 
   DIO. What's the right way to knock? I wonder how
   The natives here are wont to knock at doors.
 
   XAN. No dawdling: taste the door. You've got, remember,
   The lion-hide and pride of Heracles.
 
   DIO. Boy! boy!
 
   AEACUS. Who's there?
 
   DIO. I, Heracles the strong!
 
   AEAC. O, you most shameless desperate ruffian, you!
   O, villain, villain, arrant vilest villain!
   Who seized our Cerberus by the throat, and fled,
   And ran, and rushed, and bolted, haling off
   The dog, my charge! But now I've got thee fast.
   So close the Styx's inky-hearted rock,
   The blood-bedabbled peak of Acheron
   Shall hem thee in: the hell-hounds of Cocytus
   Prowl round thee; whilst the hundred-headed Asp
   Shall rive thy heart-strings: the Tartesian Lamprey,
   Prey on thy lungs: and those Tithrasian Gorgons
   Mangle and tear thy kidneys, mauling them,
   Entrails and all, into one bloody mash.
   I'll speed a running foot to fetch them hither.
 
   XAN. Hallo! what now?
 
   DIO. I've done it: call the god.
 
   XAN. Get up, you laughing-stock; get up directly, Before you're seen.
 
   DIO. What, _I_ get up? I'm fainting. Please dab a sponge of water on my
   heart.
 
   XAN. Here!
 
   DIO. Dab it, you.
 
   XAN. Where? O, ye golden gods, Lies your heart THERE?
 
   DIO. It got so terrified
   It fluttered down into my stomach's pit.
 
   XAN. Cowardliest of gods and men!
 
   DIO. The cowardliest? I? What I, who asked you for a sponge, a thing
   A coward never would have done!
 
   XAN. What then?
 
   DIO. A coward would have lain there wallowing;
   But I stood up, and wiped myself withal.
 
   XAN. Poseidon! quite heroic.
 
   DIO. 'Deed I think so. But weren't _you_ frightened at those dreadful
   threats And shoutings?
 
   XAN, Frightened? Not a bit. I cared not.
 
   DIO. Come then, if you're so _very_ brave a man,
   Will you be I, and take the hero's club
   And lion's skin, since you're so monstrous plucky?
   And I'll be now the slave, and bear the luggage.
 
   XAN. Hand them across. I cannot choose but take them.
   And now observe the Xanthio-heracles
   If I'm a coward and a sneak like you.
 
   DIO. Nay, you're the rogue from Melite's own self.
   And I'll pick up and carry on the traps.
 
   MAID. O welcome, Heracles! come in, sweetheart.
   My Lady, when they told her, set to work,
   Baked mighty loaves, boiled two or three tureens
   Of lentil soup, roasted a prime ox whole,
   Made rolls and honey-cakes. So come along.
 
   XAN. (Declining.) You are too kind.
 
   MAID. I will not let you go. I will not LET you! Why, she's stewing
   slices Of juicy bird's-flesh, and she's making comfits, And tempering
   down her richest wine. Come, dear, Come along in.
 
   XAN. (Still declining.) Pray thank her.
 
   MAID. O you're jesting, I shall not let you off: there's such a lovely
   Flute-girl all ready, and we've two or three Dancing-girls also.
 
   XAN. Eh! what! Dancing-girls?
 
   MAID. Young budding virgins, freshly tired and trimmed.
   Come, dear, come in. The cook was dishing up
   The cutlets, and they are bringing in the tables.
 
   XAN. Then go you in, and tell those dancing-girls
   Of whom you spake, I'm coming in
   Myself. Pick up the traps, my lad, and follow me.
 
   DIO. Hi! stop! you're not in earnest, just because I dressed you up, in
   fun, as Heracles? Come, don't keep fooling, Xanthias, but lift
   And carry in the traps yourself.
 
   XAN. Why! what! You are never going to strip me of these togs
   You gave me!
 
   DIO. Going to? No, I'm doing it now.
   Off with that lion-skin.
 
   XAN. Bear witness all
   The gods shall judge between us.
 
   DIO. Gods indeed! Why how could _you_ (the vain and foolish thought!)
   A slave, a mortal, act Alcmena's son?
 
   XAN. All right then, take them; maybe, if God will,
   You'll soon require my services again.
 
     CHOR. This is the part of a dexterous clever
     Man with his wits about him ever,
     One who has travelled the world to see;
     Always to shift, and to keep through all
     Close to the sunny side of the wall;
     Not like a pictured block to be,
     Standing always in one position;
     Nay but to veer, with expedition,
     And ever to catch the favouring breeze,
     This is the part of a shrewd tactician,
     This is to be a--THERAMENES!
     DIO. Truly an exquisite joke 'twould be,
     Him with a dancing girl to see,
     Lolling at ease on Milesian rugs;
     Me, like a slave, beside him standing,
     Aught that he wants to his lordship handing;
     Then as the damsel fair he hugs,
     Seeing me all on fire to embrace her,
     He would perchance (for there's no man baser),
     Turning him round like a lazy lout,
     Straight on my mouth deliver a facer,
     Knocking my ivory choirmen out.
 
   HOSTESS. O Plathane! Plathane! Here's that naughty man,
   That's he who got into our tavern once,
   And ate up sixteen loaves.
 
   PLATHANE. O, so he is! The very man.
 
   XAN. Bad luck for somebody!
 
   HOS. O and, besides, those twenty bits of stew,
   Half-obol pieces.
 
   XAN. Somebody's going to catch it!
 
   HOS. That garlic too.
 
   DIO. Woman, you're talking nonsense. You don't know what you're saying.
 
   HOS. O, you thought I shouldn't know you with your buskins on!
   Ah, and I've not yet mentioned all that fish,
   No, nor the new-made cheese: he gulped it down,
   Baskets and all, unlucky that we were.
   And when I just alluded to the price,
   He looked so fierce, and bellowed like a bull.
 
   XAN. Yes, that's his way: that's what he always does.
 
   HOS. O, and he drew his sword, and seemed quite mad.
 
   PLA. O, that he did.
 
   HOS. And terrified us so
   We sprang up to the cockloft, she and I.
   Then out he hurled, decamping with the rugs.
 
   XAN. That's his way too; but something must be done.
 
   HOS. Quick, run and call my patron Cleon here!
 
   PLA. O, if you meet him, call Hyperbolus! We'll pay you out to-day.
 
   HOS. O filthy throat, O how I'd like to take a stone, and hack
   Those grinders out with which you chawed my wares.
 
   PLA. I'd like to pitch you in the deadman's pit.
 
   HOS. I'd like to get a reaping-hook and scoop
   That gullet out with which you gorged my tripe.
   But I'll to Cleon: he'll soon serve his writs;
   He'll twist it out of you to-day, he will.
 
   DRO. Perdition seize me, if I don't love Xanthias.
 
   XAN. Aye, aye, I know your drift: stop, stop that talking.
   I won't be Heracles.
 
   DRO. O, don't say so, Dear, darling Xanthias.
 
   XAN. Why, how can I, A slave, a mortal, act Alcmena's son!
 
   DRO. Aye, aye, I know you are vexed, and I deserve it,
   And if you pummel me, I won't complain.
   But if I strip you of these togs again,
   Perdition seize myself, my wife, my children,
   And, most of all, that blear-eyed Archedemus.
 
   XAN. That oath contents me: on those terms I take them.
 
     CHOR. Now that at last you appear once more,
     Wearing the garb that at first you wore,
     Wielding the club and the tawny skin,
     Now it is yours to be up and doing,
     Glaring like mad, and your youth renewing,
     Mindful of him whose guise you are in.
     If, when caught in a bit of a scrape, you
     Suffer a word of alarm to escape you,
     Showing yourself but a feckless knave,
     Then will your master at once undrape you,
     Then you'll again be the toiling slave.
 
     XAN. There, I admit, you have given to me a
     Capital hint, and the like idea,
     Friends, had occurred to myself before.
     Truly if anything good befell
     He would be wanting, I know full well,
     Wanting to take to the togs once more.
     Nevertheless, while in these I'm vested,
     Ne'er shall you find me craven-crested,
     No, for a dittany look I'll wear,
     Aye and methinks it will soon be tested,
     Hark! how the portals are rustling there.
 
   AEAC. Seize the dog-stealer, bind him, pinion him,
   Drag him to justice!
 
   DIO. Somebody's going to catch it.
 
   XAN. (_Striking out_.) Hands off! get away! stand back!
 
   ABAC. Eh? You're for fighting. Ho! Ditylas, Sceblyas, and Pardocas,
   Come hither, quick; fight me this sturdy knave.
 
   DIO. Now isn't it a shame the man should strike
   And he a thief besides?
 
   AEAC. A monstrous shame!
 
   DIO. A regular burning shame!
 
   XAN. By the Lord Zeus,
   If ever I was here before, if ever
   I stole one hair's-worth from you, let me die!
   And now I'll make you a right noble offer,
   Arrest my lad: torture him as you will,
   And if you find I'm guilty, take and kill me.
 
   AEAC. Torture him, how?
 
   XAN. In any mode you please.
   Pile bricks upon him: stuff his nose with acid:
   Flay, rack him, hoist him; flog him with a scourge
   Of prickly bristles: only not with this,
   A soft-leaved onion, or a tender leek.
 
   AEAC. A fair proposal. If I strike too hard
   And maim the boy, I'll make you compensation.
 
   XAN. I shan't require it. Take him out and flog him.
 
   ABAC. Nay, but I'll do it here before your eyes.
   Now then, put down the traps, and mind you speak
   The truth, young fellow.
 
   DIO. (_In agony_.) Man! don't torture ME!
   I am a god. You'll blame yourself hereafter
   If you touch ME.
 
   AEAC. Hillo! What's that you are saying?
 
   DIO. I say I'm Bacchus, son of Zeus, a god, Anid _he's_ the slave.
 
   AEAC. You hear him?
 
   XAN. Hear him? Yes. All the more reason you should flog him well.
   For if he is a god, he won't perceive it.
 
   DIO. Well, but you say that you're a god yourself.
   So why not _you_ be flogged as well as I?
 
   XAN. A fair proposal. And be this the test,
   Whichever of us two you first behold
   Flinching or crying out--he's not the god.
 
   AEAC. Upon my word you're quite the gentleman,
   You're all for right and justice. Strip then, both.
 
   XAN. How can you test us fairly?
 
   AEAC. Easily, I'll give you blow for blow.
 
   XAN. A good idea. We're ready! Now! (_Aeacus strikes him_), see if you
   catch me flinching.
 
   AEAC. I struck you.
 
   XAN. (_Incredulously_.) No!
 
   ABAC Well, it seems "no," indeed.
   Now then I'll strike the other (_Strikes DIO_.).
 
   DIO. Tell me when?
 
   AEAC. I struck you.
 
   DIO. Struck me? Then why didn't I sneeze?
 
   AEAC. Don't know, I'm sure. I'll try the other again.
 
   XAN. And quickly too. Good gracious!
 
   AEAC. Why "good gracious"? Not hurt you, did I?
 
   XAN. No, I merely thought of The Diomeian feast of Heracles.
 
   AEAC. A holy man! 'Tis now the other's turn.
 
   DIO. Hi! Hi!
 
   AEAC. Hallo!
 
   DIO. Look at those horsemen, look!
 
   AEAC. But why these tears?
 
   DIO. There's such a smell of onions.
 
   AEAC. Then you don't mind it?
 
   DIO. (_Cheerfully_.) Mind it? Not a bit.
 
   AEAC. Well, I must go to the other one again.
 
   XAN. O! O!
 
   AEAC. Hallo!
 
   XAN. Do pray pull out this thorn.
 
   AEAC. What does it mean? 'Tis this one's turn again.
 
   DIO. (_Shrieking_.) Apollo! Lord! (_Calmly_) of Delos and of Pytho.
 
   XAN. He flinched! You heard him?
 
   DIO. Not at all; a jolly Verse of Hipponax flashed across my mind.
 
   XAN. You don't half do it: cut his flanks to pieces.
 
   AEAC. By Zeus, well thought on. Turn your belly here.
 
   DIO. (_Screaming_.) Poseidon!
 
   XAN. There! he's flinching.
 
   DIO. (Singing) who dost reign
   Amongst the Aegean peaks and creeks
   And o'er the deep blue main.
 
   AEAC. No, by Demeter, still I can't find out
   Which is the god, but come ye both indoors;
   My lord himself and Persephassa there,
   Being gods themselves, will soon find out the truth.
 
   DIO. Right! right! I only wish you had thought of that
   Before you gave me those tremendous whacks.
 
     CHOR. Come, Muse, to our Mystical Chorus, O come to the joy of my
         song,
     O see on the benches before us that countless and wonderful throng,
     Where wits by the thousand abide, with more than a Cleophon's
         pride--
     On the lips of that foreigner base, of Athens the bane and disgrace,
     There is shrieking, his kinsman by race,
     The garrulous swallow of Thrace;
     From that perch of exotic descent,
     Rejoicing her sorrow to vent,
     She pours to her spirit's content, a nightingale's woeful lament,
     That e'en though the voting be equal, his ruin will soon be the
         sequel.
 
     Well it suits the holy Chorus evermore with counsel wise
     To exhort and teach the city: this we therefore now
         advise--
     End the townsmen's apprehensions; equalize the rights of all;
     If by Phrynichus's wrestlings some perchance sustained a fall,
     Yet to these 'tis surely open, having put away their sin,
     For their slips and vacillations pardon at your hands to win.
     Give your brethren back their franchise.
     Sin and shame it were that slaves,
     Who have once with stern devotion fought your battle on the waves,
     Should be straightway lords and masters, yea Plataeans fully
         blown--
     Not that this deserves our censure; there I praise you; there alone
     Has the city, in her anguish, policy and wisdom
         shown--
     Nay but these, of old accustomed on our ships to fight and win,
     (They, their father too before them), these our very kith and kin,
     You should likewise, when they ask you, pardon for their single sin.
     O by nature best and wisest, O relax your jealous ire,
     Let us all the world as kinsfolk and as citizens acquire,
     All who on our ships will battle well and bravely by our side
     If we cocker up our city, narrowing her with senseless pride
     Now when she is rocked and reeling in the cradles of the sea,
     Here again will after ages deem we acted brainlessly.
 
     And O if I'm able to scan the habits and life of a man
     Who shall rue his iniquities soon! not long shall that little baboon,
     That Cleigenes shifty and small, the wickedest bathman of all
     Who are lords of the earth--which is brought from the isle of
         Cimolus, and wrought
             With nitre and lye into soap--
             Not long shall he vex us, I hope.
             And this the unlucky one knows,
             Yet ventures a peace to oppose,
     And being addicted to blows he carries a stick as he goes,
     Lest while he is tipsy and reeling, some robber his cloak should be
         stealing.
 
     Often has it crossed my fancy, that the city loves to deal
     With the very best and noblest members of her commonweal,
     Just as with our ancient coinage, and the newly-minted gold.
     Yea for these, our sterling pieces, all of pure Athenian mould,
     All of perfect die and metal, all the fairest of the fair,
     All of workmanship unequalled, proved and valued every-where
 
     Both amongst our own Hellenes and Barbarians far away,
     These we use not: but the worthless pinchbeck coins of yesterday,
     Vilest die and basest metal, now we always use instead.
     Even so, our sterling townsmen, nobly born and nobly bred,
     Men of worth and rank and metal, men of honourable fame,
     Trained in every liberal science, choral dance and manly game,
     These we treat with scorn and insult, but the strangers newliest
          come,
     Worthless sons of worthless fathers, pinchbeck townsmen, yellowy
          scum,
     Whom in earlier days the city hardly would have stooped to use
     Even for her scapegoat victims, these for every task we choose.
     O unwise and foolish people, yet to mend your ways begin;
     Use again the good and useful: so hereafter, if ye win
     'Twill be due to this your wisdom: if ye fall, at least 'twill be
     Not a fall that brings dishonour, falling from a worthy tree.
 
   AEAC. By Zeus the Saviour, quite the gentleman
   Your master is.
 
   XAN. Gentleman? I believe you. He's all for wine and women, is my
   master.
 
   AEAC. But not to have flogged you, when the truth came out
   That you, the slave, were passing off as master!
 
   XAN. He'd get the worst of that.
 
   AEAC. Bravo! that's spoken Like a true slave: that's what I love
   myself.
 
   XAN. You love it, do you?
 
   AEAC. Love it? I'm entranced
   When I can curse my lord behind his back.
 
   XAN. How about grumbling, when you have felt the stick,
   And scurry out of doors?
 
   AEAC. That's jolly too.
 
   XAN. How about prying?
 
   AEAC. That beats everything!
 
   XAN. Great Kin-god Zeus! And what of overhearing
   Your master's secrets?
 
   AEAC. What? I'm mad with joy.
 
   XAN. And blabbing them abroad?
 
   AEAC. O heaven and earth! When I do that, I can't contain myself.
 
   XAN. Phoebus Apollo! clap your hand in mine, Kiss and be kissed: and
   prithee tell me this, Tell me by Zeus, our rascaldom's own god, What's
   all that noise within? What means this hubbub And row?
 
   AEAC. That's Aeschylus and Euripides.
 
   XAN. Eh?
 
   AEAC. Wonderful, wonderful things are going on. The dead are rioting,
   taking different sides.
 
   XAN. Why, what's the matter?
 
   AEAC. There's a custom here
   With all the crafts, the good and noble crafts,
   That the chief master of his art in each
   Shall have his dinner in the assembly hall,
   And sit by Pluto's side.
 
   XAN. I understand.
 
   AEAC. Until another comes, more wise than he
   In the same art: then must the first give way.
 
   XAN. And how has this disturbed our Aeschylus?
 
   AEAC. 'Twas he that occupied the tragic chair,
   As, in his craft, the noblest.
 
   XAN. Who does now?
 
   AEAC. But when Euripides came down, he kept
   Flourishing off before the highwaymen,
   Thieves, burglars, parricides--these form our mob
   In Hades--till with listening to his twists
   And turns, and pleas and counterpleas, they went
   Mad on the man, and hailed him first and wisest:
   Elate with this, he claimed the tragic chair
   Where Aeschylus was seated.
 
   XAN. Wasn't he pelted?
 
   AEAC. Not he: the populace clamoured out to try
   Which of the twain was wiser in his art.
 
   XAN. You mean the rascals?
 
   AEAC. Aye, as high as heaven!
 
   XAN. But were there none to side with Aeschylus?
 
   AEAC. Scanty and sparse the good, (_Regards the audience_) the same as
   here.
 
   XAN. And what does Pluto now propose to do?
 
   AEAC. He means to hold a tournament, and bring
   Their tragedies to the proof.
 
   XAN. But Sophocles, How came not he to claim the tragic chair?
 
   AEAC. Claim it? Not he! When _he_ came down, he kissed
   With reverence Aeschylus, and clasped his hand,
   And yielded willingly the chair to him.
   But now he's going, says Cleidemides,
   To sit third-man: and then if Aeschylus win,
   He'll stay content: if not, for his art's sake,
   He'll fight to the death against Euripides.
 
   XAN. Will it come off?
 
   AEAC. O yes, by Zeus, directly.
   And then, I hear, will wonderful things be done,
   The art poetic will be weighed in scales.
 
   XAN. What! weigh out tragedy, like butcher's meat?
 
   AEAC. Levels they'll bring, and measuring-tapes for words,
   And moulded oblongs.
 
   XAN. Is it bricks they are making?
 
   AEAC. Wedges and compasses: for Euripides Vows that he'll test the
   dramas, word by word.
 
   XAN. Aeschylus chafes at this, I fancy.
 
   AEAC. Well, He lowered his brows, upglaring like a bull.
 
   XAN. And who's to be the judge?
 
   AEAC. There came the rub. Skilled men were hard to find: for with the
   Athenians Aeschylus, somehow, did not hit it off.
 
   XAN. Too many burglars, I expect, he thought.
 
   AEAC. And all the rest, he said, were trash and nonsense
   To judge poetic wits. So then at last
   They chose your lord, an expert in the art.
   But go we in: for when our lords are bent
   On urgent business, that means blows for us.
 
     CHOR. O surely with terrible wrath will the thunder-voiced monarch be
         filled,
     When he sees his opponent beside him, the tonguester, the
         artifice-skilled,
     Stand, whetting his tusks for the fight! O surely, his eyes
         rolling-fell
             Will with terrible madness be fraught!
     O then will be charging of plume-waving words with their
         wild-floating mane,
     And then will be whirling of splinters, and phrases smoothed down
         with the plane,
     When the man would the grand-stepping maxims, the language gigantic,
         repel
             Of the hero-creator of thought.
     There will his shaggy-born crest upbristle for anger and woe,
     Horribly frowning and growling, his fury will launch at the foe
     Huge-clamped masses of words, with exertion Titanic up--tearing
             Great ship-timber planks for the fray.
     But here will the tongue be at work, uncoiling, word-testing
             refining,
     Sophist-creator of phrases, dissecting, detracting, maligning,
     Shaking the envious bits, and with subtle analysis paring
     The lung's large labour away.
 
   EURIPIDES. Don't talk to me; I won't give up the chair, I say I am
   better in the art than he.
 
   DIO. You hear him, Aeschylus: why don't you speak?
 
   EUR. He'll do the grand at first, the juggling trick
   He used to play in all his tragedies.
 
   DIO. Come, my fine fellow, pray don't talk too big.
 
   EUR. I know the man, I've scanned him through and through,
   A savage-creating stubborn-pulling fellow,
   Uncurbed, unfettered, uncontrolled of speech,
   Unperiphrastic, bombastiloquent.
 
   AESCHYLUS. Hah! sayest thou so, child of the garden quean!
   And this to ME, thou chattery-babble-collector,
   Thou pauper-creating rags-and-patches-stitcher?
   Thou shalt abye it dearly!
 
   DIO. Pray, be still; Nor heat thy soul to fury, Aeschylus.
 
   AESCH. Not till I've made you see the sort of man
   This cripple-maker is who crows so loudly.
 
   DIO. Bring out a ewe, a black-fleeced ewe, my boys:
   Here's a typhoon about to burst upon us.
 
   AESCH. Thou picker-up of Cretan monodies,
   Foisting thy tales of incest on the stage--
 
   DIO. Forbear, forbear, most honoured Aeschylus;
   And you, my poor Euripides, begone
   If you are wise, out of this pitiless hail,
   Lest with some heady word he crack your scull
   And batter out your brain-less Telephus.
   And not with passion. Aeschylus, but calmly
   Test and be tested. 'Tis not meet for poets
   To scold each other, like two baking-girls.
   But you go roaring like an oak on fire.
 
   EUR. I'm ready, I!
   I don't draw back one bit.
   I'll lash or, if he will, let him lash first
   The talk, the lays, the sinews of a play:
   Aye and my Peleus, aye and Aeolus,
   And Meleager, aye and Telephus.
 
   DIO. And what do _you_ propose? Speak, Aeschylus.
 
   AESCH. I could have wished to meet him otherwhere.
   We fight not here on equal terms.
 
   DIO. Why not?
 
   AESCH. My poetry survived me: his died with him:
   He's got it here, all handy to recite.
   Howbeit, if so you wish it, so we'll have it.
 
   DIO. O bring me fire, and bring me frankincense.
   I'll pray, or e'er the clash of wits begin,
   To judge the strife with high poetic skill.
   Meanwhile (_to the Chorus_) invoke the Muses with a song.
 
     CHOR. O Muses, the daughters divine of Zeus, the immaculate Nine,
     Who gaze from your mansions serene on intellects subtle and keen,
     When down to the tournament lists, in bright-polished wit they
         descend,
     With wrestling and turnings and twists in the battle of words to
         contend,
     O come and behold what the two antagonist poets can do,
     Whose mouths are the swiftest to teach grand language and filings of
         speech:
     For now of their wits is the sternest encounter commencing in
         earnest.
 
   DIO. Ye two, put up your prayers before ye start.
 
   AESCH. Demeter, mistress, nourisher of my soul,
   O make me worthy of thy mystic rites!
 
   DIO. (_To Eur_.) Now put on incense, you.
 
   EUR. Excuse me, no; My vows are paid to other gods than these.
 
   DIO. What, a new coinage of your own?
 
   EUR. Precisely.
 
   DIO. Pray then to them, those private gods of yours.
 
   EUR. Ether, my pasture, volubly-rolling tongue,
   Intelligent wit and critic nostrils keen,
   O well and neatly may I trounce his plays!
 
     CHOR. We also are yearning from these to be learning
     Some stately measure, some majestic grand
     Movement telling of conflicts nigh.
     Now for battle arrayed they stand,
     Tongues embittered, and anger high.
     Each has got a venturesome will,
     Each an eager and nimble mind;
     One will wield, with artistic skill,
     Clearcut phrases, and wit refined;
     Then the other, with words defiant,
     Stern and strong, like an angry giant
     Laying on with uprooted trees,
     Soon will scatter a world of these
     Superscholastic subtleties.
 
   DIO. Now then, commence your arguments, and mind you both display
   True wit, not metaphors, nor things which any fool could say.
 
   EUR. As for myself, good people all, I'll tell you by-and-by
   My own poetic worth and claims; but first of all I'll try
   To show how this portentous quack beguiled the silly fools
   Whose tastes were nurtured, ere he came, in Phrynichus's schools.
   He'd bring some single mourner on, seated and veiled, 'twould be
   Achilles, say, or Niobe--the face you could not
        see--
   An empty show of tragic woe, who uttered not one thing.
 
   DIO. Tis true.
 
   EUR. Then in the Chorus came, and rattled off a string
   Of four continuous lyric odes: the mourner never stirred.
 
   DIO. I liked it too. I sometimes think that I those mutes preferred
   To all your chatterers now-a-days.
 
   EUR. Because, if you must know,
   You were an ass.
 
   DIO. An ass, no doubt: what made him do it though?
 
   EUR. That was his quackery, don't you see, to set the audience guessing
   When Niobe would speak; meanwhile, the drama was progressing.
 
   DIO. The rascal, how he took me in! 'Twas shameful, was it not?
   (_To Aesch_.) What makes you stamp and fidget so?
 
   EUR. He's catching it so hot.
   So when he had humbugged thus awhile, and now his wretched play
   Was halfway through, a dozen words, great wild-bull words, he'd say,
   Fierce Bugaboos, with bristling crests, and shaggy eyebrows too,
   Which not a soul could understand.
 
   AESCH. O heavens!
 
   DIO. Be quiet, do.
 
   EUR. But not one single word was clear.
 
   DIO. St! don't your teeth be gnashing.
 
   EUR. 'Twas all Scamanders, moated camps, and griffin-eagles flashing In
   burnished copper on the shields, chivalric-precipice-high Expressions,
   hard to comprehend.
 
   DIO. Aye, by the Powers, and I
   Full many a sleepless night have spent in anxious thought, because
   I'd find the tawny cock-horse out, what sort of bird it was!
 
   AESCH. It was a sign, you stupid dolt, engraved the ships upon.
 
   DIO. Eryxis I supposed it was, Philoxenus's son.
 
   EUR. Now really should a cock be brought into a tragic play?
 
   AESCH. You enemy of gods and men, what was _your_ practice, pray?
 
   EUR. No cock-horse in _my_ plays, by Zeus, no goat-stag there you'll
        see,
   Such figures as are blazoned forth in Median tapestry.
   When first I took the art from you, bloated and swoln, poor thing,
   With turgid gasconading words and heavy dieting,
   First I reduced and toned her down, and made her slim and neat
   With wordlets and with exercise and poultices of beet,
   And next a dose of chatterjuice, distilled from books, I gave her,
   And monodies she took, with sharp Cephisophon for flavour.
   I never used haphazard words, or plunged abruptly in;
   Who entered first explained at large the drama's origin
   And source.
 
   DIO. Its source, I really trust, was better than your own.
 
   EUR. Then from the very opening lines no idleness was shown;
   The mistress talked with all her might, the servant talked as much,
   The master talked, the maiden talked, the beldame talked.
 
   AESCH. For such an outrage was not death your due?
 
   EUR. No, by Apollo, no: That was my democratic way.
 
   DIO. Ah, let that topic go. Your record is not there, my friend,
   particularly good.
 
   EUR. Then next I taught all these to speak.
 
   AESCH. You did so, and I would
   That ere such mischief you had wrought, your very lungs had split.
 
   EUR. Canons of verse I introduced, and neatly chiselled wit;
   To look, to scan: to plot, to plan: to twist, to turn, to woo:
   On all to spy; in all to pry.
 
   AESCH. You did: I say so too.
 
   EUR. I showed them scenes of common life, the things we know and see,
   Where any blunder would at once by all detected be.
   I never blustered on, or took their breath and wits away
   By Cycnuses or Memnons clad in terrible array,
   With bells upon their horses' heads, the audience to dismay.
   Look at _his_ pupils, look at mine: and there the contrast view.
   Uncouth Megaenetus is his, and rough Phormisius too;
   Great long-beard-lance-and-trumpet-men, flesh-tearers with the pine:
   But natty smart Theramenes, and Cleitophon are mine.
 
   DIO. Theramenes? a clever man and wonderfully sly:
   Immerse him in a flood of ills, he'll soon be high and dry,
   "A Kian with a kappa, sir, not Chian with a chi."
 
     EUR. I taught them all these knowing ways
     By chopping logic in my plays,
     And making all my speakers try
     To reason out the How and Why.
     So now the people trace the springs,
     The sources and the roots of things,
     And manage all their households too
     Far better than they used to do,
     Scanning and searching _What's amiss?_
     And, _Why was that?_ And, _How is this?_
 
     DIO. Ay, truly, never now a man
     Comes home, but he begins to scan;
     And to his household loudly cries,
     _Why, where's my pitcher? What's the matter?
     'Tis dead and gone my last year's platter.
     Who gnawed these olives? Bless the sprat,
     Who nibbled off the head of that?
     And where's the garlic vanished, pray,
     I purchased only yesterday?_
     --Whereas, of old, our stupid youths
     Would sit, with open mouths and eyes,
     Like any dull-brained Mammacouths.
 
     CHOR. "All this thou beholdest, Achilles our boldest."
     And what wilt thou reply?
     Draw tight the rein
     Lest that fiery soul of thine
     Whirl thee out of the listed plain,
     Past the olives, and o'er the line.
     Dire and grievous the charge he brings.
     See thou answer him, noble heart,
     Not with passionate bickerings.
     Shape thy course with a sailor's art,
     Reef the canvas, shorten the sails,
     Shift them edgewise to shun the gales.
     When the breezes are soft and low,
     Then, well under control, you'll go
     Quick and quicker to strike the foe.
     O first of all the Hellenic bards high loftily-towering verse to
         rear,
     And tragic phrase from the dust to raise, pour forth thy fountain
         with right good cheer.
 
   AESCH. My wrath is hot at this vile mischance, and my spirit revolts at
   the thought that I
   Must bandy words with a fellow like _him_: but lest he should vaunt
   that I can't reply--
   Come, tell me what are the points for which a noble poet our praise
   obtains.
 
   EUR. For his ready wit, and his counsels sage, and because the citizen
   folk he trains
   To be better townsmen and worthier men.
 
   AESCH. If then you have done the very reverse,
   Found noble-hearted and virtuous men, and altered them, each and all,
   for the worse,
   Pray what is the need you deserve to get?
 
   DIO. Nay, ask not _him_. He deserves to die.
 
   AESCH. For just consider what style of men he received from me, great
        six-foot-high
   Heroical souls, who never would blench from a townsman's duties in
        peace or war;
   Not idle loafers, or low buffoons, or rascally scamps such as now they
        are.
   But men who were breathing spears and helms, and the snow-white plume
        in its crested pride
   The greave, and the dart, and the warrior's heart in its seven-fold
        casing of tough bull-hide.
 
   DIO. He'll stun me, I know, with his armoury-work; this business is
   going from bad to worse.
 
   EUR. And how did you manage to make them so grand, exalted, and brave
   with your wonderful verse?
 
   DIO. Come, Aeschylus, answer, and don't stand mute in your self-willed
   pride and arrogant spleen.
 
   AESCH. A drama I wrote with the War-god filled.
 
   DIO. Its name?
 
   AESCH. 'Tis the "Seven against Thebes" that I mean. Which who so
   beheld, with eagerness swelled to rush to the battlefield there and
   then.
 
   DIO. O that was a scandalous thing you did! You have made the Thebans
        mightier men,
   More eager by far for the business of war.
   Now, therefore, receive this punch on the head.
 
   AESCH. Ah, _ye_ might have practised the same yourselves, but ye turned
        to other pursuits instead.
   Then next the "Persians" I wrote, in praise of the noblest deed that
        the world can show,
   And each man longed for the victor's wreath, to fight and to vanquish
        his country's foe.
 
   DIO. I was pleased, I own, when I heard their moan for old Darius,
        their great king, dead;
   When they smote together their hands, like this, and _Evir alake_ the
        Chorus said.
 
   AESCH. Aye, such are the poet's appropriate works: and just consider
        how all along
   From the very first they have wrought you good, the noble bards, the
        masters of song.
   First, Orpheus taught you religious rites, and from bloody murder to
        stay your hands:
   Musaeus healing and oracle lore; and Hesiod all the culture of lands,
   The time to gather, the time to plough. And gat not Homer his glory
        divine
   By singing of valour, and honour, and right, and the sheen of the
        battle-extended line,
   The ranging of troops and the arming of men?
 
   DIO. O ay, but he didn't teach _that_, I opine,
   To Pantacles; when he was leading the show I couldn't imagine what he
        was at,
   He had fastened his helm on the top of his head, he was trying to
        fasten his plume upon that.
 
   AESCH. But others, many and brave, he taught, of whom was Lamachus,
        hero true;
   And thence my spirit the impress took, and many a lion-heart chief I
        drew,
   Parocluses, Teucers, illustrious names; for I fain the citizen-folk
        would spur
   To stretch themselves to _their_ measure and height, when-ever the
        trumpet of war they hear.
   But Phaedras and Stheneboeas? No! no harlotry business deformed my
        plays.
   And none can say that ever I drew a love sick woman in all my days.
 
   EUR. For _you_ no lot or portion had got in Queen Aphrodite.
 
   AESCH. Thank Heaven for that.
   But ever on you and yours, my friend, the mighty goddess mightily sat;
   Yourself she cast to the ground at last.
 
   DIO. O ay, that came uncommonly pat.
   You showed how cuckolds are made, and lo, you were struck yourself by
        the very same fate.
 
   EUR. But say, you cross-grained censor of mine, how _my_ Stheneboeas
   could harm the state.
 
   AESCH. Full many a noble dame, the wife of a noble citizen, hemlock
        took,
   And died, unable the shame and sin of your Bellerophonscenes to brook.
 
   EUR. Was then, I wonder, the tale I told of Phaedra's passionate love
   untrue?
 
   AESCH. Not so: but tales of incestuous vice the sacred poet should hide
        from view,
   Nor ever exhibit and blazon forth on the public stage to the public
        ken.
   For boys a teacher at school is found, but we, the poets, are teachers
        of men.
   We are BOUND things honest and pure to speak.
 
   EUR. And to speak great Lycabettuses, pray,
   And massive blocks of Parnassian rocks, is _that_ things honest and
        pure to say?
   In human fashion we ought to speak.
 
   AESCH. Alas, poor witling, and can't you see
   That for mighty thoughts and heroic aims, the words themselves
        must appropriate be?
   And grander belike on the ear should strike the speech of heroes and
        godlike powers,
   Since even the robes that invest their limbs are statelier, grander
        robes than ours.
   Such was _my_ plan: but when _you_ began, you spoilt and degraded it
        all.
 
   EUR. How so?
 
   AESCH. Your kings in tatters and rags you dressed, and brought them on,
        a beggarly show,
   To move, forsooth, our pity and ruth.
 
   EUR. And what was the harm, I should like to know.
 
   AESCH. No more will a wealthy citizen now equip for the state a galley
   of war. He wraps his limbs in tatters and rags, and whines _he is poor,
   too poor by far_.
 
   DIO. But under his rags he is wearing a vest, as woolly and soft as a
        man could wish.
   Let him gull the state, and he's off to the mart; an eager, extravagant
        buyer of fish.
 
   AESCH. Moreover to prate, to harangue, to debate, is now the ambition
        of all in the state.
   Each exercise-ground is in consequence found deserted and empty: to
        evil repute
   Your lessons have brought our youngsters, and taught our sailors to
        challenge, discuss, and refute
   The orders they get from their captains and yet, when _I_ was alive,
        I protest that the knaves
   Knew nothing at all, save for rations' to call, and to sing "Rhyppapae"
        as they pulled through the waves.
 
   DIO. And bedad to let fly from their sterns in the eye of the fellow
        who tugged at the undermost oar,
   And a jolly young messmate with filth to besmirch, and to land for a
        filching adventure ashore; But now they harangue, and dispute, and
        won't row, And idly and aimlessly float to and fro.
 
   AESCH. Of what ills is he NOT the creator and cause?
   Consider the scandalous scenes that he draws,
   His bawds, and his panders, his women who give
        Give birth in the sacredest shrine,
   Whilst others with brothers are wedded and bedded,
        And others opine
   That "not to be living" is truly "to live."
   And therefore our city is swarming to-day
   With clerks and with demagogue-monkeys, who play
   Their jackanape tricks at all times, in all places,
   Deluding the people of Athens; but none
   Has training enough in athletics to run
        With the torch in his hand at the races.
 
   DIO. By the Powers, you are right! At the Panathenaea
   I laughed till I felt like a potsherd to see a
   Pale, paunchy young gentleman pounding along,
   With his head butting forward, the last of the throng,
   In the direst of straits; and behold at the gates,
   The Ceramites flapped him, and smacked him, and slapped him,
   In the ribs, and the loin, and the flank, and the groin,
   And still, as they spanked him, he puffed and he panted,
   Till at one mighty cuff, he discharged such a puff
        That he blew out his torch and levanted.
 
       CHOR. Dread the battle, and stout the combat, mighty and manifold
        looms the war.
     Hard to decide in the fight they're waging,
     One like a stormy tempest raging,
     One alert in the rally and skirmish, clever to parry and foin and
        spar.
        Nay but don't be content to sit
     Always in one position only: many the fields for your keen-edged wit.
     On then, wrangle in every way,
     Argue, battle, be flayed and flay,
     Old and new from your stores display,
     Yea, and strive with venturesome daring something subtle and neat to
        say.
 
     Fear ye this, that to-day's spectators lack the grace of artistic
        lore,
     Lack the knowledge they need for taking
     All the points ye will soon be making?
     Fear it not: the alarm is groundless: that, be sure, is the case no
        more.
     All have fought the campaign ere this:
     Each a book of the words is holding; never a single point they'll
        miss.
        Bright their natures, and now, I ween,
        Newly whetted, and sharp, and keen.
        Dread not any defect of wit,
   Battle away without misgiving, sure that the audience, at least, are
        fit.
 
   EUR. Well then I'll turn me to your prologues now,
   Beginning first to test the first beginning
   Of this fine poet's plays. Why he's obscure
   Even in the enunciation of the facts.
 
   DIO. Which of them will you test?
 
   EUR. Many: but first give as that famous one from the Oresteia.
 
   DIO. St! Silence all! Now, Aeschylus, begin.
 
   AESCH. _Grave Hermes, witnessing a father's power. Be thou my saviour
   and mine aid to-day, For here I come and hither I return._
 
   DIO. Any fault there?
 
   EUR. A dozen faults and more.
 
   DIO. Eh! why the lines are only three in all.
 
   EUR. But every one contains a score of faults.
 
   DIO. Now Aeschylus, keep silent; if you don't
   You won't get off with three iambic lines.
 
   AESCH. Silent for _him_!
 
   DIO. If _my_ advice you'll take.
 
   EUR. Why, at first starting here's a fault sky high.
 
   AESCH. (_To Dio_.) You see your folly.
 
   DIO. Have your way; I care not.
 
   AESCH. (_To Eur_.) What is my fault?
 
   EUR. Begin the lines again.
 
   AESCH. _Grave Hermes, witnessing a father's power_--
 
   EUR. And this beside his murdered father's grave Orestes speaks?
 
   AESCH. I say not otherwise.
 
   EUR. Then does he mean that when his father fell
   By craft and violence at a woman's hand,
   The god of craft was witnessing the deed?
 
   AESCH. It was not he: it was the Helper Hermes
   He called the grave: and this he showed by adding
   It was his sire's prerogative he held.
 
   EUR. Why this is worse than all. If from his father
   He held this office grave, why then--
 
   DIO. He was A graveyard rifler on his father's side.
 
   AESCH. Bacchus, the wine you drink is stale and fusty.
 
   DIO. Give him another: (_to Eur_.) you, look out for faults.
 
   AESCH. _Be thou my saviour and mine aid to-day, For here I come, and
   hither I return_.
 
   EUR. The same thing twice says clever Aeschylus.
 
   DIO. How twice?
 
   EUR. Why, just consider: I'll explain. "I come," says he; and "I
   return," says he: It's the same thing, to "come" and to "return."
 
   DIO. Aye, just as if you said, "Good fellow, lend me
   A kneading trough: likewise, a trough to knead in."
 
   AESCH. It is not so, you everlasting talker,
   They're not the same, the words are right enough.
 
   DIO. How so? inform me how you use the words.
 
   AESCH. A man, not banished from his home, may "come"
   To any land, with no especial chance.
   A home-bound exile both "returns" and "comes."
 
   DIO. O good, by Apollo! What do you say, Euripides, to that?
 
   EUR. I say Orestes never did "return." He came in secret: nobody
   recalled him.
 
   DIO. O good, by Hermes! (_Aside_.) I've not the least suspicion what he
   means.
 
   EUR. Repeat another line.
 
   DIO. Ay, Aeschylus, Repeat one instantly: _you_, mark what's wrong.
 
   AESCH. _Now on this funeral mound I call my father To hear, to
   hearken._
 
   EUR. There he is again. To "hear," to "hearken"; the same thing,
   exactly.
 
   DIO. Aye, but he's speaking to the dead, you knave,
   Who cannot hear us though we call them thrice.
 
   AESCH. And how do you make _your_ prologues?
 
   EUR. You shall hear; And if you find one single thing said twice,
   Or any useless padding, spit upon me.
 
   DIO. Well, fire away: I'm all agog to hear
   Your very accurate and faultless prologues.
 
   EUR. _A happy man was Oedipus at first_--
 
   AESCH. Not so, by Zeus; a most unhappy man.
   Who, not yet born nor yet conceived, Apollo
   Foretold would be his father's murderer.
   How could he be a happy man at first.
 
   EUR. _Then he became the wretchedest of men._
 
   AESCH. Not so, by Zeus; he never ceased to be. No sooner born, than
   they exposed the babe (And that in winter), in an earthen crock, lest
   he should grow a man, and slay his father. Then with both ankles
   pierced and swoln, he limped away to Polybus: still young, he married
   an ancient crone, and her his mother too. Then scratched out both his
   eyes.
 
   DIO. Happy indeed had he been Erasinides's colleague!
 
   EUR. Nonsense; I say my prologues are first rate.
 
   AESCH. Nay then, by Zeus, no longer line by line I'll maul your
   phrases: but with heaven to aid I'll smash your prologues with a bottle
   of oil.
 
   EUR. You mine with a bottle of oil?
 
   AESCH. With only one. You frame your prologues so that each and all
   Fit in with a "bottle of oil," or "coverlet-skin," Or "reticule-bag."
   I'll prove it here, and now.
 
   EUR. You'll prove it? You?
 
   AESCH. I will.
 
   DIO. Well then, begin.
 
   EUR. _'Aegyptus, sailing with his fifty sons, As ancient legends mostly
   tell the tale, Touching at Argos_,
 
   AESCH. Lost his bottle of oil.
 
   EUR. Hang it, what's that? Confound that bottle of oil!
 
   DIO. Give him another: let him try again.
 
   EUR. _Bacchus, who, clad in fawnskins, leaps and bounds
   With torch and thyrsus in the choral dance Along Parnassus_.
 
   AESCH. Lost his bottle of oil.
 
   DIO. Ah me, we are stricken--with that bottle again!
 
   EUR. Pooh, pooh, that's nothing. I've a prologue here, He'll never tack
   his bottle of oil to this: _No man is blest in every single thing. One
   is of noble birth, but lacking means. Another, baseborn_,
 
   AESCH. Lost his bottle of oil.
 
   DIO. Euripides!
 
   EUR. Well?
 
   DIO. Lower your sails, my boy;
   This bottle of oil is going to blow a gale.
 
   EUR. O, by Demeter, I don't care one bit;
   Now from his hands I'll strike that bottle of oil.
 
   DIO. Go on then, go; but ware the bottle of oil.
 
   EUR. _Once Cadmus, quitting the Sidonian town, Agenor's offspring_
 
   AESCH. Lost his bottle of oil.
 
   DIO. O pray, my man, buy off that bottle of oil, Or else he'll smash
   our prologues all to bits.
 
   EUR. I buy of _him_?
 
   DIO. If my advice you'll take.
 
   EUR. No, no, I've many a prologue yet to say, To which he can't tack on
   his bottle of oil. _Pelops, the son of Tantalus, while driving His
   mares to Pisa_
 
   AESCH. Lost his bottle of oil.
 
   DIO. There! he tacked on the bottle of oil again. O for heaven's sake,
   pay him its price, dear boy; You'll get it for an obol, spick and span.
 
   EUR. Not yet, by Zeus; I've plenty of prologues left. _Oeneus once
   reaping_
 
   AESCH. Lost his bottle of oil.
 
    EUR. Pray let me finish one entire line first. _Oeneus once reaping an
   abundant harvest, Offering the firstfruits_
 
   AESCH. Lost his bottle of oil.
 
   DIO. What in the act of offering? Fie! Who stole it?
 
   EUR. O don't keep bothering! Let him try with this! _Zeus, as by
   Truth's own voice the tale is told,_
 
   DIO. No, he'll cut in with "Lost his bottle of oil!"
   Those bottles of oil on all your prologues seem
   To gather and grow, like styes upon the eye.
   Turn to his melodies now for goodness' sake.
 
   EUR. O I can easily show that he's a poor
   Melody-maker; makes them all alike.
 
       CHOR. What, O what will be done!
     Strange to think that he dare
     Blame the bard who has won,
     More than all in our days,
     Fame and praise for his lays,
     Lays so many and fair.
     Much I marvel to hear
     What the charge he will bring
     'Gainst our tragedy king;
     Yea for himself do I fear.
 
   EUR. Wonderful lays! O yes, you'll see directly. I'll cut down all his
   metrical strains to one.
 
   DIO. And I, I'll take some pebbles, and keep count.
 
   (_A slight pause, during which the music of a flute is heard. The music
   continues to the end of line 1277 as an accompaniment to the
   recitative_.)
 
   EUR. Lord of Phthia, Achilles, _why hearing the voice of the
   hero-dividing. Hah! smiting! approachest thou not to the rescue_? We,
   by the lake who _abide, are adoring our ancestor Hermes. Hah! smiting!
   approachest thou not to the rescue?_
 
   DIO. O Aeschylus, twice art thou smitten!
 
   EUR. Hearken to me, great king; yea, hearken _Atreides, thou noblest of
   all the Achaeans. Hah! smiting! approachest thou not to the rescue_?
 
   DIO. Thrice, Aeschylus, thrice art thou smitten!
 
   EUR. Hush! the bee-wardens are here: they _will quickly the Temple of
   Artemis open. Hah! smiting! approachest thou not to the rescue?_ I will
   expound (for _I know it_) _the omen the chieftains encountered. Hah!
   smiting! approachest thou not to the rescue?_
 
   DIO. O Zeus and King, the terrible lot of smitings! I'll to the bath:
   I'm very sure my kidneys Are quite inflamed and swoln with all these
   smitings.
 
   EUR. Wait till you've heard another batch of lays Culled from his
   lyre-accompanied melodies.
 
   DIO. Go on then, go: but no more smitings, please.
 
   EUR. How the twin-throned powers of _Achaea, the lords of the mighty
   Hellenes_.
   O phlattothrattophlattothrat!
   Sendeth _the Sphinx, the unchancy, the chieftainess blood-hound._
   O phlattothrattophlattothrat!
   Launcheth fierce with brand _and hand the avengers the terrible eagle_.
   O phlattothrattophlattothrat!
   So for the swift-_winged hounds of the air he provided a booty._
   O phlattothrattophlattothrat!
   The throng down-bearing on Aias.
   O phlattothrattophlattothrat!
 
   DIO. Whence comes that phlattothrat? From Marathon, or
   Where picked you up these cable-twister's strains?
 
   AESCH. From noblest source for noblest ends I brought them,
   Unwilling in the Muses' holy field
   The self-same flowers as Phrynichus to cull.
   But _he_ from all things rotten draws his lays,
   From Carian flutings, catches of Meletus,
   Dance-music, dirges. You shall hear directly.
   Bring me the lyre. Yet wherefore need a lyre
   For songs like these? Where's she that bangs and jangles
   Her castanets? Euripides's Muse,
   Present yourself: fit goddess for fit verse.
 
   DIO. The Muse herself can't be a wanton? No!
 
      AESCH. Halcyons, who by the ever-rippling
     Waves of the sea are babbling,
     Dewing your plumes with the drops that fall
     From wings in the salt spray dabbling.
 
     Spiders, ever with twir-r-r-r-r-rling fingers
     Weaving the warp and the woof,
     Little, brittle, network, fretwork,
     Under the coigns of the roof.
 
     The minstrel shuttle's care.
 
     Where in the front of the dark-prowed ships
     Yarely the flute-loving dolphin skips.
 
     Races here and oracles there.
     And the joy of the young vines smiling,
 
     And the tendril of grapes, care-beguiling.
 
          O embrace me, my child, O embrace me.
   (_To Dio_.) You see this foot?
 
   DIO. I do.
 
   AESCH. And this?
 
   DIO. And that one too.
 
        AESCH. (_To Eur_.) You, such stuff who compile,
     Dare my songs to upbraid;
     You, whose songs in the style
     Of Gyrene's embraces are made.
   So much for them: but still I'd like to show
   The way in which your monodies are framed.
       O darkly-light mysterious Night,
     What may this Vision mean,
     Sent from the world unseen
     With baleful omens rife;
     A thing of lifeless life,
     A child of sable night,
     A ghastly curdling sight,
     In black funereal veils,
     With murder, murder in its eyes,
     And great enormous nails?
 
   Light ye the lanterns, my maidens, and dipping your jugs in the stream,
   Draw me the dew of the water, and heat it to boiling and steam,
   So will I wash me away the ill effects of my dream.
 
       "God of the sea!
     My dream's come true.
     Ho, lodgers, ho,
     This portent view.
     Glyce has vanished, carrying off my cock,
     My cock that crew!
     O Mania, help! O reads of the rock
     Pursue! pursue!
     For I poor girl, was working within,
     Holding my distaff heavy and full,
     Twir-r-r-r-r-rling my hand as the threads I spin,
     Weaving an excellent bobbin of wool:
     Thinking 'To-morrow I'll go to the fair,
     In the dusk of the morn, and be selling it there.'
     But he to the blue upflew, upflew,
     On the lightliest tips of his wings outspread;
     To me he bequeathed but woe, but woe,
     And tears, sad tears, from my eyes o'erflow,
     Which I, the bereaved, must shed, must shed.
     O children of Ida, sons of Crete,
     Grasping your bows to the rescue come;
     Twinkle about on your restless feet,
     Stand in a circle around her home.
     O Artemis, thou maid divine,
     Dictynna, huntress, fair to see,
     O bring that keen-nosed pack of thine,
     And hunt through all the house with me.
     O Hecate, with flameful brands,
     O Zeus's daughter, arm thine hands,
     Those swiftliest hands, both right and left;
     Thy rays on Glyce's cottage throw
     That I serenely there may go
     And search by moonlight for the theft."
 
   DIO. Enough of both your odes.
 
   AESCH. Enough for me. Now would I bring the fellow to the scales. That,
   that alone, shall test our poetry now, And prove whose words are
   weightiest, his or mine.
 
   DIO. Then both come hither, since I needs must weigh
   The art poetic like a pound of cheese.
 
   CHOR.
 
     O the labour these wits go through!
     O the wild, extravagant, new,
     Wonderful things they are going to do!
     Who but they would ever have thought of it?
     Why, if a man had happened to meet me
     Out in the street, and intelligence brought of it,
     I should have thought he was trying to cheat me;
     Thought that his story was false and deceiving.
     That were a tale I could never believe in.
 
   DIO. Each of you stand beside his scale.
 
   AESCH. and EUR. We're here.
 
   DIO. And grasp it firmly whilst ye speak your lines,
   And don't let go until I cry "Cuckoo."
 
   AESCH. EUR. Ready!
 
   DIO. Now speak your lines into the scale.
 
   EUR. _O that the Argo had not winged her way_--
   AESCH. _River Spercheius, cattle-grazing haunts_--
 
   DIO. _Cuckoo! let go. O look, by far the lowest_
   His scale sinks down.
 
   EUR. Why, how came that about?
 
   DIO. He threw a river in, like some wool-seller
   Wetting his wool, to make it weight the more.
   But _you_ threw in a light and winged word.
 
   EUR. Come, let him match another verse with mine.
 
   DIO. Each to his scale.
 
   AESCH. EUR. We're ready.
 
   DIO. Speak your lines.
 
   EUR. _Persuasion's only shrine is eloquent speech._
 
   AESCH. _Death loves not gifts, alone amongst the gods_
 
   DIO. Let go, let go. Down goes his scale again. He threw in Death, the
   heaviest ill of all.
 
   EUR. And I Persuasion, the most lovely word.
 
   DIO. A vain and empty sound, devoid of sense.
   Think of some heavier-weighted line of yours,
   To drag your scale down: something strong and big.
 
   EUR. Where have I got one? Where? Let's see.
 
   DIO. I'll tell you. _"Achilles threw two singles and a four_."
   Come, speak your lines: this is your last set-to.
 
   EUR. _In his right hand he grasped an iron-clamped mace_.
 
   AESCH. _Chariot on chariot, corpse on corpse was hurled_.
 
   DIO. There now! again he has done you.
 
   EUR. Done me? How?
 
   DIO. He threw two chariots and two corpses in;
   Five-score Egyptians could not lift that weight.
 
   AESCH. No more of "line for line"; let him--himself,
   His children, wife, Cephisophon--get in,
   With all his books collected in his arms,
   Two lines of mine shall overweigh the lot.
 
   DIO. Both are my friends; I can't decide between them:
   I don't desire to be at odds with either:
   One is so clever, one delights me so.
 
   PLUTO. Then you'll effect nothing for which you came?
 
   DIO. And how, if I decide?
 
   PLUTO. Then take the winner;
   So will your journey not be made in vain.
 
   DIO. Heaven bless your Highness! Listen, I came down
   After a poet.
 
   EUR. To what end?
 
   DIO. That so The city, saved, may keep her choral games.
   Now then, whichever of you two shall best
   Advise the city, _he_ shall come with me.
   And first of Alcibiades, let each
   Say what he thinks; the city travails sore.
 
   EUR. What does she think herself about him?
 
   DIO. What? She loves, and hates, and longs to have him back.
   But give me _your_ advice about the man.
 
   EUR. I loathe a townsman who is slow to aid,
   And swift to hurt, his town: who ways and means
   Finds for himself, but finds not for the state.
 
   DIO. Poseidon, but that's smart! (_To Aesch_.) And what say _you?_
 
   AESCH. 'Twere best to rear no lion in the state:
   But having reared, 'tis best to humour him.
 
   DIO. By Zeus the Saviour, still I can't decide.
   One is so clever, and so clear the other.
   But once again. Let each in turn declare
   What plan of safety for the state ye've got.
 
   EUR. [First with Cinesias wing Cleocritus,
   Then zephyrs waft them o'er the watery plain.
 
   DIO. A funny sight, I own: but where's the sense?
 
   EUR. If, when the fleets engage, they holding cruets
   Should rain down vinegar in the foemen's eyes,]
   I know, and I can tell you.
 
   DIO. Tell away.
 
   EUR. When things, mistrusted now, shall trusted be,
   And trusted things, mistrusted.
 
   DIO. How! I don't quite comprehend.
   Be clear, and not so clever.
 
   EUR. If we mistrust those citizens of ours
   Whom now we trust, and those employ whom now
   We don't employ, the city will be saved.
   If on our present tack we fail, we surely
   Shall find salvation in the opposite course.
 
   DIO. Good, O Palamedes! Good, you genius you. [Is this _your_
   cleverness or Cephisophon's?
 
   EUR. This is my own: the cruet-plan was his.]
 
   DIO. (_To Aesch._) Now, you.
 
   AESCH. But tell me whom the city uses. The good and useful?
 
   DIO. What are you dreaming of? She hates and loathes them.
 
   AESCH. Does she love the bad?
 
   DIO. Not love them, no: she uses them perforce.
 
   AESCH. How can one save a city such as this,
   Whom neither frieze nor woollen tunic suits?
 
   DIO. O, if to earth you rise, find out some way.
 
   AESCH. There will I speak: I cannot answer here.
 
   DIO. Nay, nay; send up your guerdon from below.
 
   AESCH. When they shall count the enemy's soil their own,
   And theirs the enemy's: when they know that ships
   Are their true wealth, their so-called wealth delusion.
 
   DIO. Aye, but the justices suck that down, you know.
 
   PLUTO. Now then, decide.
 
   DIO. I will; and thus I'll do it. I'll choose the man in whom my soul
   delights.
 
   EUR. O, recollect the gods by whom you swore
   You'd take me home again; and choose your friends.
 
   DIO. 'Twas my tongue swore; my choice is--Aeschylus.
 
   EUR. Hah! what have you done?
 
   DIO. Done? Given the victor's prize
   To Aeschylus; why not?
 
   EUR. And do you dare look in my face, after that shameful deed?
 
   DIO. What's shameful, if the audience think not so?
 
   EUR. Have you no heart? Wretch; would you leave me dead?
 
   DIO. Who knows if death be life, and life be death, And breath be
   mutton broth, and sleep a sheepskin?
 
   PLUTO. Now, Dionysus, come ye in.
 
   DIO. What for?
 
   PLUTO. And sup before ye go.
 
   DIO. A bright idea. I' faith, I'm nowise indisposed for that.
 
     CHOR. Blest the man who possesses a
     Keen intelligent mind.
     This full often we find.
     He, the bard of renown,
     Now to earth reascends,
     Goes, a joy to his town,
     Goes, a joy to his friends,
     Just because he possesses a
     Keen intelligent mind.
     RIGHT it is and befitting,
     Not by Socrates sitting,
     Idle talk to pursue,
     Stripping tragedy-art of
     All things noble and true,
     Surely the mind to school
     Fine-drawn quibbles to seek,
     Fine-set phrases to speak,
     Is but the part of a fool!
 
   PLUTO. Farewell then, Aeschylus, great and wise,
   Go, save our state by the maxims rare
   Of thy noble thought; and the fools chastise,
 
   For many a fool dwells there.
   And _this_ to Cleophon give, my friend,
   And _this_ to the revenue-raising crew,
   Nicomachus, Myrmex, next I send,
   And _this_ to Archenomus too.
   And bid them all that without delay,
   To my realm of the dead they hasten away.
   For if they loiter above, I swear
   I'll come myself and arrest them there.
   And branded and fettered the slaves shall go
   With the vilest rascal in all the town,
   Adeimantus, son of Leucolophus, down,
   Down, down to the darkness below.
 
   AESCH. I take the mission. This chair of mine
   Meanwhile to Sophocles here commit,
   (For I count him next in our craft divine,)
   Till I come once more by thy side to sit.
   But as for that rascally scoundrel there,
   That low buffoon, that worker of ill,
   O let him not sit in my vacant chair,
   Not even against his will.
 
   PLUTO. (To the Chorus.) Escort him up with your mystic throngs,
   While the holy torches quiver and blaze.
   Escort him up with his own sweet songs and his noble festival lays.
 
   CHOR. First, as the poet triumphant is passing away to the light,
   Grant him success on his journey, ye powers that are ruling below.
   Grant that he find for the city good counsels to guide her aright;
   So we at last shall be freed from the anguish, the fear, and the woe,
   Freed from the onsets of war. Let Cleophon now and his band
   Battle, if battle they must, far away in their own fatherland.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
